Odd Items
    A cigarette lighter etched with symbols of the sea and whaling. its a large curved bone with a flint-wheel that pulls out to reveal the cotton packed into the hollowed out cavity. It never works reliably the first time its used, and then will burn through all its fuel on the second try, and will burn for 3 hours if fully fueled. The light from the lighter can reveal the presence of Abyssal writing (which is normally invisible).
    The diseased remains of the first king of the land. Died soon after he founded the land, patient zero of a potent plague - High Lord Rolnir's Remains.
    A fairly mundane looking knick-knack like a spinning wheel or a pot or something boring of slight historical significance. It's actually a lich's phylactery.
    A jar of a glue-like oozing substance. When fed bones it will produce a sticky glue, when hungry it turns acidic and vaporous. It can die.
    The claw of the first lycanthrope, preserved in a jar. It's said that a scratch from the preserved claw still harbours a more virulent, primordial strain of the curse. Best it stay in the jar.
    A muzzle, fitted to house four long appendages where a mouth would be on a normal person. There are legends of an ancient race that held the Mind Flayers under their heel, but nowhere else on Earth exists any evidence of such a people, save this.
    A single bottle of pink, fizzy liquid. There is a label affixed to it written in Celestial. It reads "Heaven's Cola" and is sealed with a white cork. A note it attached to it by a thick string and a handwritten note is attached, written in Abyssal, that says, "Happy Birthday Dad".
    A fist-sized gem of a deep red colour. Inside a shadow flicks and twitches like a tadpole in an egg. Rumour has it that this is the seed of a god.
    A pair of gloves that look like bear paws, complete with felt claws. They appear to be quite large, but always change size to fit the wearer perfectly. On full moons, the wearer of the gloves will change into a full-sized brown bear, but will have hands of the wearer. This lasts until sunrise, and will repeat on each night of the full moon. There is a 10% chance that the change is permanent.
    Mimirion- Three oddly shaped seeds, they seem to hate the sun. It grows during the night on moonlight, giving off an odorous scent, before developing a seed again at the end of its life cycle and the morning light.
    A longsword whose blade is split clean in half, with constant searing heat on both edges of the break. The pommel bears the crest of God.
    A tin cup with a bent handle and a dented rim. The base (flipped upside-down) has an inscription written in Common that says "Who Dat Moose?". There is nothing else remarkable about it's appearance. Whomever drinks from the cup, however, will demand to be called "Moose" instead of their real name and will do anything to retain ownership of the cup, including murderous violence.
    A small oil painting of a ferret. To many people it seems completely mundane. Anyone illiterate who views it will see the portrait animate. The ferret inside will speak and insult the onlooker before attempting to teach them how to read.
    A bag of seeds in a burlap sack. There are approximately 500 seeds in the bag. If planted, they will grow into full sized fence posts in approximately six weeks. The posts will never rot and never need painting.
    A young man. No, not a preserved one, a live human male aged about 23. He smells constantly of skunk spray and demands you keep a distance from his display. He is otherwise very inward.
    The Deurggometer - a small black box with an eye-hole in it. "DO NOT LOOK INTO THE BOX" is painted on a sign in big red letters. Inside the box are little clay figures that look like people you know. Ask the person looking into the box to name a failed love. That person is now in the box. Ask them if they like their mother more or their father more. Whichever one they pick is not present. Ask the other player's at the table to place one more person in the box (this can be anyone from the player's life). Then you, as the DM choose one more player at the table to be present in the box. Roll to determine what happens. Mark down each roll so you remember how many times you rolled, and after each roll ask the player if they want to keep looking. Continue to roll until they say they can't watch anymore. For each outcome, roll 2d4 to determine who does what. Then place a verb between them: (Loves, Kisses, Marries, Adventures with, Hides, Dines with, Has Sex with, Bites, Stabs, Betrays, Cries about, Buries, Ostracizes, Eats, Chases, Cleaves, Mocks, Executes, Owns, Comforts.) The number of times you roll equals the amount of days before one of these things comes true.
    A mask of a crow. If worn, the speaker will be attacked by phantom crows until the mask is removed. However, the mask does not want to be removed and will resist by psychically attacking the wearer. If the mask wins the struggle, the wearer will die of his imagined wounds in less than an hour. If the owner wins the struggle, the mask teleports 10-1000 miles in a random direction, but will always end up in a place of civilization, regardless of distance traveled.
    A gold coin minted in some long forgotten time. The face on the coin is of an old man with a short beard and a crown. When flipped the coin always lands heads up.
    A candle that burns in reverse, collecting material from the aether forming it into a water-rich waxy substance that can be eaten. Producing a cup-worth of water takes an hour of burning.
    A pair of sandals that always feel sandy, no matter how often they are washed. The sandals will change shape to fit any sized feet. The benefit of the sandals is the ability to walk on water for up to 1 hour.
    A stuffed skunk the size of a bull. The skunk's black and white fur is reversed, and it has 7 eyes and six legs. The stink gland has been surgically removed, with large unruly stitches in its wake.
    A magical crossbow that is completely ordinary in every regard, except for the fact that whenever the user misses a shot it loudly insults them and their lineage.
    A mockingbird that will appear as a beautiful piece of taxidermy, but will reveal itself to be haunted by the ghost of an angry spirit who mocks the owner relentlessly while in its presence. The mockingbird can never be sold, but can be given away.
    A dull green glass bottle, filled with transparent oil that rolls about like the sea's tides. Its label, written in Undercommon, reads "Immortality." It is sealed with a deep black cork, and if opened reeks of skunk spray.
    "What do you see?" -Whoever looks at this painting will see the room (or place) they grew up in. If you look at it alone, the painting will move and show you a moment from your past. If you crawl into the painting you will inhabit your child body for exactly 10 seconds of real time (long enough to say one thing that you do) before being ejected from the painting.
    A set of 6 jars of preserves in a calico-lined wooden basket. The jam will raise the dead, but requires the owner to give up something precious to them - this includes family members, property, and memories.
    A six sided die which will occasionally land on 7.
    A flintlock pistol/hand-crossbow (Depending on the setting) That will invariably shoot through the heart of the nearest living creature. It is important to remember that the user is usually the nearest living creature.
    Your childhood stuffed animal. The plaque under it reads "First stuffed animal of [insert PC] retrieved from his gravesite."
    A writing quill that when used, the words of the text will periodically change to synonyms of the original text while unobserved.
    A kid’s doll that seems to animate when no-one is looking. It is depressed or has other issues as it can nearly always be found attempting to kill itself (by impalement or in a fire). As it is magical it is not easily destroyed (it might actually be a phylactery).
    An umbilical cord in a neat wooden box, lined with velvet. The cord itself has small, glassy eyes over its surface.
    A wig that when put on makes your character look like you, the player.
    A living spell in a container. It presses its face on the glass, breathes, then writes cryptic messages in the form of incantations in the glass-fog.
    A set of dragon's teeth in a carved wooden box. On the bottom of the box the name "Ray" has been carved hastily and with an amateur hand. If the teeth are planted, a single skeleton will rise for each tooth and will obey the owner's commands to the best of their ability until destroyed.
    A viking who has no idea what he is doing in a museum. It's labeled "Perfect recreation of an ancient warrior. Totally not a real person."
    A set of utensils that allow the dead to eat food on the Prime Material Plane. They are made from bone and are ancient and yellowed with age. If a demon can be convinced to use them, it will be forever destroyed.
    A small wooden box with some silver markings on its surface. You can hear something shift inside, however it has neither a lock nor hinges, cutting it open by force reveals it to be solid wood.
    A flashlight. Most natives think its a weapon, or a portal to the Positive Energy Plane, or a trapped elemental. But its just a flashlight.
    A tattoo kit and an image of a door on parchment. If you tattoo that door on living flesh, you can open the door and enter a dungeon.
    A bird cage that will kill any living thing placed inside it, but if left alone, will slowly manifest an Infernal-equivalent over 30 days. This hell-pet will act like a real pet, unless its owner is ever alone with it, at which point, it will try and escape. Its ability to breed with creatures on the Prime Material Plane is unparalleled.
    A dried-up rose that will come to life when pure hatred is nearby.
    A mirror that reflects an image from .5 seconds in the future.
    A crystal tea kettle, with what looks like an ocean raging inside of it. If boiled, the temperature of the coasts will rise dramatically. If drunk, the tides will receed further and further back.
    A set of scrolls that will allow conversation between them, insofar that a message written on one will appear on the other, no matter the distance. However, the words always become twisted away from their original meaning, with the intention of doing as much harm to the receiver's life or situation as it can.
    An archaic videogame controller. If plugged into the brain of a living creature (figure that one out) you can control them in a very robotic and simplistic way. Oh, and the cord is only 30ft.
    A chess set of all Queens and 2 Kings. If a game is played, the loser is Banished to the Demi-Plane of Chess.
    A pair of sunglasses that reverses everything the wearer sees. Friends become rivals, enemies charging become friends running with open arms.
    A pair of shoes that grant the ability to jump at great height. Was sold to the museum by a Djinn who claims to have found them floating above the atmosphere.
    An egg-shaped cage made of willow branches. Its craft seems simple, however it can hold magical creatures as if it had anti-magical properties.
    A red pill that takes you to the Modron Plane, and a blue pill that takes you to the PMP
    A set of armor, each piece a different type, e.g., chain chestplate, plate gauntlets, leather greaves, etc.... When in combat, the wearer can sacrifice a piece of the armor to completely avoid a successful hit, but their AC decreases a small amount. If the armor is completely sacrificed, it will return, whole, in 7 days.
    A book on sewing, knitting, and weaving problems and their solutions. Anyone who reads this book will encounter these issues when they next attempt to sew, knit, or weave. Some of these problems should not be possible in a 3 dimensional plane.
    A hookah that, when smoked, gradually transports the smoker into the ethereal plane. If not smoked to completion, the smoker becomes semi-impermeable, randomly phasing from solid to gaseous.
    A sundial that shows the correct time regardless to whether the sun is in the correct orientation or even present.
    A helmet with a mouth where your forehead is. If you say the word "Delicious" the mouth will open up and eat 1 thing in front of you and give you one of it's powers for 10 minutes. Example, you can eat a deck of cards and split into 52 tiny versions of yourself.
    A copper heron statue that, if placed near water, will act as if alive and life-like. Its copper belly is often found full of rotten and fermented fish.
    A set of glass playing cards, with symbols and numerals unknown to scholars. If shuffled, the deck will transport the owner to the 450TH ANNUAL RYL'AKS'HOOM TOURNAMENT and be automatically registered for the Final Death Match.
    A boardgame that requires the players to travel through the planes to complete the game. its called "FUN WITH SCIENCE"
    A set of faerie fire lanterns that only show the dead and obscure the living as if they were invisible. Once per month the effect can be made permanent in a location if the lantern is left behind and blessed by a cleric of at least 3rd level.
    A paintbrush that paint will never ever stick to.
    A stuffed lion's head that will devour any lich's phylactery permanently. The lion's name is Bernard.
    A candle that will grant a wish if blown out on your birthday.
    A tiny doll version of yourself that you can embody, but your regular body will become a doll in the meantime
    A whistle that only dragons can hear
    A normal sized carrot that weighs 300lbs.
    Two gold coins that when rubbed together reproduce.
    A birthday cake that will feed a group of 8. Once a piece is consumed, the owner drops into a deep sleep for 24 hours, but will awaken fully refreshed and healed of all diseases, curse or afflictions. However, an astral parasite now feeds on the victim and will permanently drain 1 HP per day until the host is dead. The parasite can be removed by a cleric of at least 9th level. The cake only ever appears in dungeons
    A crab cracker that only works when operated by dwarves.
    A life-sized unicorn that claims the gods are false and the true meaning of life can only be found in the old ways. The unicorn refuses all saddles, bridles, or hats.
    A wool blanket that will occasionally ‘’bleat’’ as a sheep.
    A tiny statue of Hastur. If the statue is rubbed, and Hastur's name is spoken, there is a 75% chance that the user's wish will come true, and a 25% chance that Hastur will manifest and punish the offender.
    A single rusted scale from a piece of scalemail. It seems to attract rust, and when in contact with other metals it will let them gleam and shine (collecting all rust already present and preventing new). When it disintegrated (due to collecting too much rust, or otherwise) the magic is released and all the collected rust will affect the nearest metal things instantly.
    A toy otyugh that vomits cloth garbage when you pull the string on its back
    A harpoon that will spear a fish from any liquid it is thrust into. If asked the curator will demonstrate by spearing a tuna from a glass of milk.
    A brass hippopotamus. Life sized. When its snout is rubbed there is a 50% chance the hippo will transform into a real hippopotamus, and a 50% chance that the victim is turned into a life-sized brass hippopotamus.
    A fake beard that changes your gender.
    A 10' foot pole made of wood that is incapable of displacing any object.
    A Skeleton Key. You can use it to unlock a heart (to make someone love the first thing they see), a bladder (to make them pee), or any other part of the body. Does not unlock doors.
    A set of tools for installing a door, including hinges and a knob. When placed into an existing door frame, will open upon the name of any plane that is written upon its face in chalk. Cannot connect physical spaces on the same plane.
    A pair of wedding rings that pull towards one another if the player using them is single, and repels if they're married.
    A portable brewery and distillery kit that is semi-automatic. It is however slightly damaged and will produce loads of methanol (causing blindness and death).
    A brush that changes your hair color when you use it.
    A (fake) plant, made of some sort of organic fiber, resembling a tiny Shambling Mound, that will clean your room and leave a slightly slimy trail.
    A baseball bat that deals damage equal to the amount of tattoos and piercings you have.
    A puppet in the form of a human or an animal, it depends on the desire of the one who claims it. It has a string to open and close the mouth and its limbs are fully articulated. The puppet has a name tag stitched to it, and its always the same name as the person who claims it. Over the course of 30 days the puppet will attempt to switch the owners mind into the doll, while it occupies the owner's body. If it is successful, it will live the most mundane, boring life it can, not trying to destroy anything, but not helping either, and will become listless and only interested in food and sleeping. After 30 days of this it will become bored and switch back. If it is not successful, it will be forced to wait 30 days before it can try again.
    A small glass bulb that gives off a bit of bluish light when touched. The light it shines counts as moonlight for the purpose of revealing things.
    A small stone that ticks. Everyone who hears the stone becomes convinced that the stone must remain locked away or something very bad will happen.
    a painting of an old hag wearing a cloak and hood in a bad frame. If hung on the wall, over the next 30 days, it will slowly transform into the painting of a beautiful man or woman. After the painting has fully changed, the owner will meet the subject of the painting and fall madly in love with them, and the feeling will be mutual. The painting will then teleport away.
    A dagger that doesn't harm anything stabbed by it, but displays the memories of what it stabs instead.
    A coin that when flipped tells you something nice about the person you're looking at.
    A set of brass chimes that will calm all the animals who can hear its ringing, regardless of their current mood.
    Two little birds in cages that tweet when they are apart and will do anything to come together.
    A bowl that whistles if the food in it is too hot to consume.
    A wooden stool that is unusually comfortable, despite it's simple construction.
    A pitcher that always pours the owner's favorite drink, and restores 1d4 HP. The drawback is that the entire pitcher must be consumed to gain the effect, and the drink becomes alcoholic, regardless of its original composition.
    An orb that swallows a negative emotion and spits out a black butterfly.
    A monocle that changes every person the wearer sees to be happy.
    A tiny clay man wearing a tiny hat. If a name is scratched into its chest, it will come to life and perform complicated dances, but only when the owner is alone.
    A deep blue pistol, which compels the wielder to shoot their own head. When done, the wielder's subconscious will become a physical manifestation, and have an honest conversation with them.
    A lost letter that will attempt to fold itself into a tiny bird, but fails to do so. It is completely crumpled by now but it still attempts to origami itself every hour or so.
    A brick of modeling clay that when used to sculpt small creatures they come to life. If two of these creatures encounter each other they will battle to the death, the loser reverting into a blob of clay.
    A beautiful painting of the sea. It moves when you look at it. You see yourself floating on your back. You're smiling.
    A bar of bitter cocoa that banishes doubt when eaten.
    A book that contains all the alternate universes where your life is worse than it is now, to show you how great you've done so far.
    A cloak with a hood that smells of lavender and repels all disease while worn. It is bright orange and stitched with embroidered smiling cat faces.
    A necklace with rough cut stones and glass strung on it. It makes the wearer feel comfortable in all conditions.
    A dragon hoodie with a zip-up hood. When the hood is zipped up you can roar like a dragon and fly for 10 seconds at a time.
    A jar of honey, with matching wand. Never empties.
    A piece of pavement with a partial rune on both sides. When placed on another stone surface it either turns hastens or slows a walking creature in a small area (by 5 ft., 20 ft radius) depending on the side that touches the stone surface.
    A tiny house, two stories, beautiful and always the perfect temperature. It can travel anywhere. But you have to be tiny to enter.
    A history book written about a long collapsed empire. When touched the user experiences the last 12 days of Emperor Callifax Corentius IIIV, leading up to his assassination.
    A small honey bee token, carved from soap. When crushed, it summons a honeybee familiar to serve you. It can only give advice in a soft, kind tone.
    Empty flower pot. If you collect a flower from a place and plant it in the pot, you can smell that place by sniffing the flower.
    A map of the solar system in 3 dimensions. Any alterations to the map move the cosmos.
    A set of gingerbread men molds that only work on human flesh, and will create homonculi that will serve the owner until they are destroyed.
    An invisible, invincible creature trapped in a lead box. It kills something random once a year if released.
    A floor tile with a footprint on it that reads: "Step here to summon Balog." The tile is slightly charred.
    Ear warmers that heighten the environmental sounds around you, but drowns out conversations.
    A tongue that replaces your tongue. It can extend 10' and has a hyper-sensitive sense of smell
    A set of knitting needles that are capable of knitting together dreams of multiple people or even the same person. once complete, if the dreamcoat is worn, the memories are able to be changed, but only once, and never again.
    A 6 inch tall horse.
    A tool designed to crack nuts. It disintegrates shells, leaving the nuts untouched. Bloody marks between the teeth and weird stains on the handle leave disturbing thoughts as to what it has been used for recently.
    A group of 7 mushrooms, each with the abbreviation of a day of the week (Sun-Sat), eating one takes you back to the last occurence of that day.
    A wooden handle that contains every tool ever conceived within. The ultimate swiss army knife. Good luck finding what you need, though.
    A snowglobe of (insert city from your world), shaking it makes it snow there.
    A full sized 110-pipe organ, complete with padded bench. It comes with a songbook of the greatest hits of Heaven and Hell. If played by a skilled performer, will draw a host of the appropriate type to come and judge the performance. A poor performance will have unpleasant consequences, while a good one will grant the player a Boon. The organ will then teleport in a random direction.
    A small music box that makes sounds when opened as if it was connected to another object somewhere else. Effects could include: Busy tavern, Snoring man, Diner table, Street sounds, Whispering meeting, Bedroom noises, Playing kids, People begging for mercy before being murdered
    A tiny hand mirror that will reflect the owner at any age it desires, including into the future. there is a 10% chance that Shael will gaze back at the owner.
    A bell that summons a horse when rung. 10% chance it summons Shael on a pegasus.
    A cold Iron spade labeled "THE SPOON OF BALOG."
    A pouch containing one pound of the most potent drug in the universe. A single molecule is enough to kill a man instantly, while he experiences 1000 mental years of pure ecstasy.
    A red liquid that when drank turns you into an old King long thought to be dead. 10% chance of turning you into Shael.
    A set of tiny iron soldiers wearing the livery of Kalan, The Unspeakable. if the soldiers are arranged into an attack position, there is a 50% chance they will animate and become full sized, obeying the commands of the owner, and a 50% chance that the owner will be forced to wear the livery of Kalan for the next year, losing their name completely.
    A music box that plays pleasant music. 5% chance of invoking the curse of Shael when the song completes.
    A hand-written diary by a young girl professing her hatred of Balog, the Spoon Thief.
    One hundred carved wooden ducks each bearing the name of a constellation. They are unremarkable otherwise.
    A fingernail sized blade that can cut through anything, even subatomic particles.
    A lantern that burns brighter the more the wielder is afraid.
    A disembodied head of a Modron. The creature will accurately guess the weight of anyone who stands within 1' of it.
    A silver eye-mask not unlike the one famously donned by Balog, the Spoon Thief. Allows the wearer total knowledge of every spoon on the plane they are currently in.
    A small tea kettle that fill with acid if the phrase. "be careful with that one, he's a biter." Is spoken within a 2 mile radius.
    A flask with an unknown liquid. It cannot be poured out unless it is standing upright (in which case nothing happens since gravity). The flask is very sturdy and in inscription reads ‘’Those that drink smart and slow will drink this drink made long ago.’’.
    A set of dueling blades that refuse to deal a killing blow. the individual cases are marked "His" and "Hers" in High Elven
    A small set of silver dining spoons. Scrying is impossible within a 10foot bubble centered on them.
    A group of seven swords, each with a day of the week on them. They can only be used on the week that is on their blade. When used they always hit and always cut off a limb.
    A fork that causes any edible substance stabbed with it to be transmogrified into cooked pork. Was retrieved from the possession of an infamous serial murderer.
    A dagger that only hurts those who are feeling angry
    A candlestick that ignites things that are inserted.
    A noose that only tightens around the necks of thieves who stole because they were starving.
    A gold coin that can only be stolen
    A coin that changes metals every time its flipped
    A dagger that can only strike its target in the dark
    A set of dishes that can summon rotting food that will fully heal any lycanthropic curses, but will permanently give the user bad breath.
    A wineskin that at random will take out the alcohol of the substance it contains before adding it some time later. It is a health risk to drink from, but often invokes quick inebriation or not at all.
    A Deck of One Thing. This magically imbued deck contains 31 of 40 cards. When a card is drawn, the drawer of the card has their pockets filled with pewter spoons.

Rumor 
    Did you hear the news?
    A Child
    A Fat merchant
    A Temple priest
    A Sailor
    A Soldier
    A Magician
    A Noble
    A Rogue
    A Crazy monk
    A Drunken farmer

    1d10 AND THEY
    Got drunk
    Got washed out to sea
    Got stuck on a runaway horse
    Found an old well
    Disappeared for 3 days
    Found an old tomb
    Met a weird stranger
    Found a magic item
    Were sleepwalking
    Walked off into the forest

    1d10 AND DISCOVERED
    A new disease
    A powerful artifact
    A cursed item
    A sleeping monster
    A treasure map
    A hero/villain thought dead, returned to life
    A book of secrets
    A key to a vast fortune
    A supressed truth about the ruling kingdom
    A door to another Plane

    1d10 AND NOW
    People are disappearing!
    People are sick!
    The king has decreed strange new laws!
    The temple has issued strange new tenets!
    The sun might not come back up!
    The moon might fracture!
    The world might be invaded!
    People are having bad dreams every night!
    People are unable to sleep!
    People are afraid to come outside!



    Motivations
    d4 - You Asked, So I'll
    Tell you a blatant lie, because I don't like you or because I'm afraid.
    Tell you a half-truth, because I don't trust you or because I'm afraid.
    Tell you the truth, but mix up all the details, because I want to trust you, but I'm afraid.
    Tell you the truth, because I like and trust you, or I need help.

    d20 - Why Am I Doing This?
    To gain wealth.
    To gain power.
    To fulfill a promise.
    To get revenge.
    To get justice.
    For the glory.
    To gain the favor of someone.
    To help a friend.
    To stop an event.
    To pay a debt.
    To solve a mystery.
    To escape from a problem.
    To thwart an enemy.
    To expose the truth.
    To cover up the truth.
    To gain my freedom.
    To liberate others.
    To oppress others.
    To keep the status quo.
    To upset the status quo.


    d4 - When Will I Give Up?
    As soon as I meet a serious setback or if I, or anyone else gets hurt.
    As soon as there are a lot of obstacles, or if I, or anyone else gets seriously hurt.
    As soon as someone dies.
    Never. I will die before I give up.

Villain Motivation
    Betrayal - the person feels that they have been wronged and deeply desire revenge, thinking it will make them feel better. We all know that it rarely does. This leads to feelings of injustice and that can spiral out of control and lead to all sorts of damaging thoughts that can escalate into treating others as if they have no value.
    Disenfranchisement - Someone who feels that they have no place in society can become deeply bitter and that can escalate to any number of emotional outlooks - anger, hatred, rage, rape, murder, terrorism, zealotry, and nationalism.
    Trauma - life events that have shattered someone's psyche are probably the most common reason people "go bad". They might have been abused as children or adults - physically, sexually or psychologically. This sets up a cycle of depression and anger that can sometimes spiral out of control and the next thing you know they are walking the streets with a rifle.
    Envy/Greed - when people are denied the things they feel they deserve, they can sometimes feel deeply resentful and start to make bad decisions in an effort to get what they want. This always leads to a grab for power, and as we all know, absolute power corrupts absolutely.


    Goal
    Get revenge
    Steal an item
    Murder an NPC/PC
    Become the Boss of a Company/Guild/Whatever
    Become Wealthy
    Raise an Army to Conquer an Area
    Murder a Particular Species/People
    Enslave a Particular Species/People
    Start a Rebellion Against Whatever
    Build/Steal an artefact
    Become the King/Queen/Whatever
    Take over the Empire(s)
    Raise a Dead/Sleeping/Banished God
    Become a Deity/Lich/Whatever
    Destroy/Remake the World

strange shops
    Imp Imporium - This store is small and boxy, and entirely made of redwood. A tall devil stands behind the counter wearing a suit and tie, and imps are chained to the walls. He offers you the services of one of his imps for a small price- the rights to the imp's memories of what they did when you're done. He requires a much larger material collateral for if you don't return the imp or it dies/is irreparably maimed in your service.
    Coagulation Station - A seemingly normal (if ugly) old woman runs this roadside popup store. It is nothing more than a cart with a sign next to it reading "Coagulation Station" painted roughly in red over a lime background. She offers healing supplies, potions, and rations in return for a small vial of your blood. (Feel free to come up with consequences for buying from her, such as her being a hag or using it for a strange ritual, etc.)
    Elemental Extras - An air, earth, fire and water elemental stand in the four corners of this (entirely brick) shop. Unfortunately, the "shopkeepers" only speak primordial, so good luck if you don't. They each offer to put special elemental effects on whatever you own, such as a fire effect on your sword, an ice effect on your armor to freeze whatever hits you, or an earth effect on an arrow to have surrounding dirt swallow whoever it hits. Everything here is understandably very expensive.
    Vraug aks stor - A very tall, older orc hero enthusiastically tries to sell his weapons in this shop in order to retire. They're hung up on the walls, all showing varying signs of use. Some appear to be magical. Vraug also tries to tell his customers stories about each weapon before they buy (and especially before they ask.) The weapon most prominently displayed is a +4 Great Axe, with obsidian blades, a dragon-scale tip on the end and golden threads running down the handle. There are a few chinks in it, and the tip somehow has a dent in it, but the damage only seems to add to the charm. He charges an extraordinary price for this axe.
    Angel Bazaar - Apparently recently the churches haven't been generating enough coin to keep the local deity fiscally afloat, and some angels have taken it upon themselves to raise that extra money. Some are selling more regular items for cheaper prices, such as healing items, some are selling more extravagant magical items, and even others are offering "miracles." They're all set up in a series of stands in a small square that you swear wasn't here before.
    Betsie's Black Cauldron- everything is black, especially Betsie. From black oak ethanol to black licorice she has ingredients and potions unique to her gimmick. u/LateLolth96
    The Fleeting Flyer's Fast Findings- if the item floats, flies, or is otherwise airborne this shop might have it. Limited time only and has (randomized) a rare three uncommons and six commons but the more you travel the more likely you are to come across it because it's on a one man spell jammer with two carnival cars behind it. u/LateLolth96
    The Kyuss Kasino- a worm themed casino where the main attraction is the purple tunnel which is a purple worm in a metal harness designed to prevent it from moving and to keep its mouth open. The wager, and incidentally, the show is if you can make it out the other end alive you [win]. There are scrying orbs that display a live feed of the current "adventurer" in the worm for 5 silver lasting 30 min before the next five silver (no refunds). Quest hook? u/LateLolth96
    Djinni Gin Jamboree- a once a month festival celebrating a moon cycle of the dm's choosing. Marids sell their distilled saliva as well as various forms of never-before-seen-by-man fish dishes, and water elementals play live music which more or less sounds like the rhythmic gurgling of a muddy brook. u/LateLolth96
    The Crossroads Corridor - An invite only shop, given to adventures who have a number of their own magical items. When the invitation is slid under any closed doorway, said doorway will become the doorway to the shop. Operated by The Masked Man, it is a magical item shop that trades magical items for magical items of similar value. Leaving will exit out the door you originally put the invitation under. u/Hacknslaasher
    Bottom's Bottomless Meatpies - It's cheap, delicious (although a bit gamey and hard to chew) and the servings are enormous. The shop is run by an old goblin with an enormous smile, his name is Toothy Bottom, less so because of his bum, and more so because of a secret that he isn't telling any one, the secret that has made his Meatpie-shop the most well visited in the entire area, at least by those not able to afford fine dining in the upper districts.For you see, underneath this humble shopped, staffed every hour of every day with more goblins than you can count on one hand, or two hands if you have taken ABM (Advanced Barbarian Maths), lies a large, cavernous mining operation.You enter it through a set of large trap-doors found in the cold-store basement where you find the literal wheelbarrows of meat that allow every customer to order however much meat they want in (or on) their pies, as long as the Goblins can lift it up to the counter (the largest order so far was, according to the Goblins managing the front of the house, "the weight of a small baby wrapped in a nasty hunting dog." they have made no comment as to how they know that specific measurement).Once you are through the trap-doors, you'll find a rail-system rivaling that of the largest Dwarven mines, with rail-master goblins timing and directing all the in- and out- going traffic, and every cart that comes in is absolutely and utterly loaded with meat, which is then loaded on wheelbarrows and carted up through the trapdoor.If you were to follow the rails as deep as they go, through all of the winding tunnels, across chasms, past various cave-dwelling monsters that try to snack on the meat or goblins or, well, you, then you'll eventually find yourself at the namesake of mr. Toothy Bottom.A large, mass of rock-hard skin, covered in spines and horns and other sharp shapes, it has been split open, and the dark flesh underneath is mined ceaselessly by a small army of Goblins. They aren't violent, in fact, they are quite cowardly, but they are as professional as any Goblin can be, and they are also fighting a continuous fight against the flesh with their pickaxes.For you see, the open wound is constantly trying to close itself, regenerating at a blinding speed that the Goblins have learned to keep up with after opening the wound large enough to allow for their massive excavation progress.This may be the toothy bottom of the pits and chasms.But it is also a small area of the sleeping Tarrasque, regenerating fast enough that it does not notice the harm being done to it, and with a large enough Goblin Workforce to drive the economy of what is, essentially, a small Goblin Kingdom in these tunnels, complete with blacksmiths making new Meat-axes and monster-hide-leathercrafters making workboots and pants for the Goblins working down in that caustic blood.And let's not forget, that the entire lower class of the city has eaten Tarrasque meat at least once, some of them for years.But it's only two silver pieces for as much pie as you want (or can carry), so who cares to ask where it's all coming from? u/Neknoh
    Sarah’s sewing shop, “World class Seamstress.” - She means world class! She can repair even magical fabric to like new condition. Everything she makes alterations to gives them a +1 to charisma for 24hrs or until dirtied. Bonus returns after being thoroughly washed and dried (some items are dry clean only)She’s also a dry cleaners. u/rab-byte
    The Philosopher’s Time Shop - Sundials, watches, windup clocks, candle clocks, hourglasses the size of mites up to the size of your average goliath, the Philosopher has a range to suit almost any buyer in need of a way to measure time. Be careful, the hours you spend there fly away like seconds! u/ElZoof
    Oakshot Saddliery - Gwinnett Oakshot caters to a select clientele, those looking for clothes, armour, weapons and equipment specifically designed to suit those who spend at least part of their days in a different body shape. Minor magic at most, it’s mostly just very well designed to suit your Druid on the go or werebeing out for a night on the town. u/ElZoof
    Jasper, Goldhand, Bloodstrangler and Smith - What does “‘til death us do part” mean if your wife is now a lich? Does a lifetime guarantee still stand if the object in question broke before the manufacturers were born? What exactly is an annuity? The firm of JGB&S is on hand to assist with non-devilish contracts of any kind. u/ElZoof
    Morogh's "Pet's" - This pet shelter is run by an older halfling named Morogh. He's kindhearted and only wants the best for his little animal companions he sells. From apes over hawks to wolfs, he just has every animal companion you could think of, but his store also has a back area. Not everyone is welcomed there as he also sells abandoned monster hatchlings, like griffons, owlbears, pseudodragons and even a red dragon wyrmling. Those monsters are all tamed so no danger there, Morogh just wants to know his customers better before trying to sell one of his more 'exotic' assets.The adventurers maybe can persuade him or do a favor for him (possible quest), like acquiring some exotic food for the more demanding beasts and monsters he houses. After this Morogh decides to sell them one of his monsters as a companion. u/Th3Banzaii
    Plane Ole' Butcher - A butcher shop that sells meat from an unknown plane of origin. One day a small portal opened up from the ground and strange-smelling exotic meats have been extruding from the portal. A shop was built around the portal which has been active and pumping for 50 years. People come to see the wonder firsthand but they stay for the dirt-cheap meats. The meats are char-grilled and heavily spiced to soften the meat's naturally pungent flavor. u/HeyShipmate
    Looters Late Return (aka LooLaRe)- A seedy smelling store run by an androgynous goblin who wears overly fancy clothes. This goblin sells in bulk only, and at discounted prices. The catch is that if you make a purchase, you must sign a contract guaranteeing repeated weekly purchases. Your bulk discount increases the more product you are able to move, but if you are unable to maintain your weekly purchases, the goblin’s secret network of enforcers comes for it’s dues. Or your life. u/pikkl_rikk
    Sandman Fisheries - This tightly packed stall smells or marine air and salty nets. It has all the sea can offer to the gourmet with a striking emphasis on huge fish: tuna, spadefish, and the occasional gargantuan squid. The product is impeccably fresh. Always. Sandman (a desert dweller and camel race aficionado) doesn't seem to understand what you're asking about the supply chain and how come his shop ever exists at hundred of miles from the nearest sea! u/Banuken
    T'zargo's fine wares - This shop can be mysteriously seen in any plane, but always appears as an identical modern convenience store looking building. Inside is a tabaxi named T'zargo, always advertising his "fine wares at reasonable prices." He sells extremely rare and powerful items for millions of gold, along with random everyday items. Some of these rare items include an axe once wielded by Baphomet, and draws from a deck of many things. His mundane items he always pulls out of a box on his counter, and they include a full rowboat and 30 chairs. u/Kellen1013
    The Magic Commoner - A basic magic item shop owned by a young elf wizard named Tavon Ilidan. He sells all sorts of magical things from armor to weapons and rings an such.The thing about his shop even though on the outside it looked like a regular building despite being one solid color; purple, orange, green ect. But when you walk inside it's much larger than its outward appearance.The shop also travels via a magical door. Tavon has a set of different keys he keeps with him representing the different cities of the land/world. He first closes the front door, locks it, then unlocks it with a new city key and when he opens it, it opens to the new city.Tavon's appearance reflects on which city he is in and what color his shop is. If is shop is blue his robes are blue as well. Tavon also has a secret. Even though he looks like a young elf he is actually an ancient gold dragon that simply likes to travel and meet new people without the stigma of being a dragon. He likes to play tricks on people and test them to see if they are worthy of specific items in his shop, (IE a wand of fireballs he made himself.) u/nota_person
    Mallard Maladies - A veterinary clinic for ducks. The shop keeper is an old blind man who refuses to heal non duck creatures, but can be tricked into healing non ducks with a high enough deception ability. Despite the name, the clinic services male and female ducks. u/El_Jewbacabra
    The Exploding Wand Shop- A shop that is characterized by an explosion that lifts the roof of the building off the walls and expelled black smoke every few hours - followed by the owner shouting from inside "I'M FINE, EVERYTHING'S OKAY!"The owner is a young Eladrin Artificer named Seyf Melorathian who experiments on new wands and other magical wonders. His face is a black charcoal from the soot of the explosions but otherwise would be a light brown. He has a pair of glasses that protects his eyes from being covered in soot. He has blond hair and wears a Smith's apron. He sells common rarity wands, up to rare rarity wonderous items, and has been working on an experimental wand of fireballs. You can only purchase an experimental wand if you do a material gathering quest for him.If you buy one of his wand of fireballs (2000gp and a waiver signed to not sue) there's a 10% chance that when used the wand will cast a second fireball centered on you during the spell.He also offers enchanting services at various speeds depending on the rarity of the requested enchantment. He will also willingly take on apprentices or teach enchantment to anyone. u/xBramStokerx
    Fishman’s Man Fry – A Triton, named Vamras Vogalath, with broken Common serves delectable seafood dishes. If asked about the name, he explains that it is food FOR men, not for fishes.Side note- this is shop is not anywhere near any large body of water. Nobody in town is sure exactly where the fish come from. u/Unprincipled
    Shwarma Tent - delicious herb infused fried flatbread with cured meats and shredded carrot and cucumber. The tent has small tripod tables and stools of worn wood. Patrons carve their names and other messages into the tabletops. Among the mundane names can be found the names of previous characters and NPCs that the party met, BBEGs they defeated, dated long ago, the current ruler of the land and the name of an old lover with a heart around it, Ash Ketchum, Drizzt, The Doctor, and the original Avengers. Searching carefully can also reveal a cryptic message to the party, seemingly carved years prior, but naming the PCs. u/bluecor
    Threads of Fate - three old sisters weave spidersilk and mundane silk into beautiful garments with embroidery that sometimes changes its image. For instance, a nightrobe has the moon and a starry sky embroidered, and the moon changes its phase with the real moon. On another, a dragon slowly chases its own tail, with its wingtips pointing to the time, as a clock. Yet another displays an hourglass which constantly drains, and runs out when the wearer dies. Other images might show great moving battles, gently waving flags that slowly fade and dilapidate as the empire becomes more corrupt, or ruins that become progressively overgrown with vines. The theme of the garments deal with the passage of time and the inevitable end of life. u/bluecor
    Salty's - the owner Saltamancia sells salt of differing coarseness and colors, and is an expert on which textures best compliment which purposes, from baking fine rolls to soaking one's feet after a days march. He has certain rare salts from distant lands with rare properties. For abjuring circles, he has a blessed salt that cannot be dispersed by gusts of wind. For healing, he has a fine blue salt that, when mixed with honey and packed into a wound, prevents infection and scarring. Another salt taken with hot peppermint tea can remove an additional level of exhaustion with a rest. True to his name, Saltamancia is old and curmudgeonly u/bluecor
    Bestboots - Bestboots sells custom footwear of exceeding quality, made from rare materials. The footwear can be light for nimble moves or heavy for kicking doors. With the right materials (possibly a quest) minor advantages can be built into the footwear. For example, a sole of felted yeti hair can give normal traction on ice, and a sole of gummed soapwood sap can allow the wearer to ignore a casting of grease underfoot. u/bluecor
    Hap's Microbrews - Hap claims to have perfected the means of beer portability, in that his brews are bottled and sealed under pressure in containers of lightweight spun cellulose which dont shatter when dropped. Opening his bottled beer releases a small localized burst of cold, chilling the beer just shy of freezing. The locals generally ignore his cart and "ice cold beer" sign, as ales are meant to be drunk at room temperature so that they don't unsettle the stomach. A discouraged Hap sits by his cart of beer bemoaning his own foolishness at sinking his fortune into such a folly. u/bluecor
    Indelible - this quiet dusty alcove sells the magical inks, parchment, paper, vellum, papyrus, and delicate quills needed to prepare arcane and divine scrolls. Also sketch artistry, heraldry, and calligraphy supplies. Blank spellbooks, charcoal, pastels, and a few unique items are sold. Glowing chalk leaves marks that remain luminous for several hours. A special lightly waxed paper is waterproof and can be written on underwater with a special pencil. A waterproof scrollcase holds six tightly rolled papers in individual tubes, designed so you can immediately draw out the scroll you desire without searching through a sheaf of papers. The proprietor Abagnale is a gifted forger, and can make needed documents for the right fee, but only those skilled in thieve's cant would be able to recognize this based on a small glyph carved above the lintel. u/bluecor
    The Magical Arts - this is a totally mundane shop which sells shaved and marked decks of cards, scarves for pulling from your sleeves, salted nuts cans that shoot a confetti burst when opened, squirting lapel flowers, palm buzzers, chewing gum that turns your teeth black, whoopie cushions, and stink spray. The guy working there isn't the owner, but is happy to teach you how to use his goods. While distracting you with a card trick, he will also attempt to shortchange you or pickpocket something (minus 4 to notice his ledgerdemain). If caught, he will only say "check your pocket" and there you will find the item you thought he pickpocketed. "Its all part of the trick, man," he will say, as he pulls a coin from your ear. u/bluecor
    The Bee's Knees - honey from different types of flowers with exceptional flavors. Meads of each type are also sold, as well as bee pollen and honey candies. A honey from frostclover will quickly dispell a hangover. Phasebee royal jelly can allow an additional use of misty step for a character with that feature, but the cost is exorbitant. The affogatto with honeycomb, coffee, and ice cream is delicious, and gives the benefits of a short rest when consumed in the shop over the course of an hour. u/bluecor
    Wacky Backy - Mr. C. Marin runs this fine tobacconist. House blends of pipe and cigarette tobacco can have classic Gandolf effects: controllable luminous smoke rings of various colors, and custom flavors and scents. The halfling weed is also sold. A self-lighting pipe is available, as well as a "peace pipe," which is a heavy iron pipe useable as a club (but you can also smoke out of it). Mr. Marin can craft custom peace pipes of nearly any light weapon. u/bluecor
    Wild Bill's Skins - Bill buys and sells tanned and untanned hides of all types. All. Types. Bill can craft armor and other leather goods from nearly any type of hide. Custom saddles can be made for any beast. A saddle on display is embossed "ride me hard and put me away wet." It isn't for sale, and it looks like it would fit Bill. He can craft a skin-tight custom leather armor that is concealable under clothing, but the customer must go into the back of the shop for a very long and invasive fitting. Rumor has it that some customers never emerge. u/bluecor
    Yellow Dancer - This is a musical instrument store run by a purple-haired elf named Lancer who was a freedom fighter in the past. His sister, Yellow Dancer herself, a famous concert performer who is a recognized star, is sometimes there in his place. Instruments of high quality and beginner pieces are sold. On commission, Lancer can craft an instrument which contains a secret sheath for a hidden weapon or wand. Also sold is "the Axe," a battleaxe/guitar combo, with a magical property of sound amplification that allows it to be heard in the largest venue, and allows for unique distortion effects. At DM Option, the Axe can also be used for ranged sonic attacks, mimicking the effects of Eldritch Blast. u/bluecor
    The Titty Twister: an adult entertainment venue, mostly for merchants and caravan guards. A goblin barker in a tophat and coattails out front gives a spirited pitch about the feminine wonders to be found within. Inside is a seedy establishment styled to look like an ancient temple. Billiards and darts games line the walls, and a poker game is playing out at a table near the center. Its a rough crowd, and fights that break out are settled with the loser being dragged away by the bouncers and the winner buying a round for the house. Beautiful dancers take turns on stage and mingle with clients between songs. Private shows are available. During the day the massive door is barred and the place is eerily silent, but from dusk til dawn raucous action is there for the taking. Locals stay well clear and pray for protection if they must pass near this den of sin. u/bluecor
    The Campus Martius: This strange storefront is a place for games of strategy, including draughts and card games, as well as sandtable war strategy matches involving miniature army figurines, played out with dice and measuring sticks. Arguments over rules are common, and are arbitrated by a robed and wigged judge on a low dias at one end, who often consults an enormous tome of rules which only he is allowed to read from. 1sp per game, per player, but by convention, the loser pays the fees of his opponents. A sweet green drink called mountain brew is popular here. It enhances focus, adding +1 to concentration saves for an hour, but leaves one tired, -1 to all saves for an hour thereafter. u/bluecor
    Millenium Sustainable Armory: run by an elvish druid, Millenium sells "murder free" armor made from silk, giant leaves, sustainably harvested ironwood and similar materials. The armor otherwise has the properties of normal light and medium armors, but contains no leather, bone, or metal. Cost is about double. Heavy armor is not available. The leaves making up the armor do not wilt or turn brown. u/bluecor
    The Meat Market: run by a shadowy figure in torn robes, this odd shop gives permanent magical effects in exchange for body parts. The more important the organ or body part, the better the effect. The effect goes to whoever the part comes from, so don’t get greedy!
    Fernado's Fish Frenzy - in a village where magic and fishing collide, you might run into a man who can be at multiple places at a time, Fernado. He is a mystical fisherman who sets up booths in town squares, where the fish fight to the death in gladiator-style combat. The loser, is placed on his selling slab and the victor becomes larger in size. He has a 'leaderboard' that updates magically after every battle, accounting for all of the places Fernado is at in your world. u/BEZERK0xD
    A rickety old shop plastered with the title of some famous adventuring party / adventurer on it. The entire shop is run by a near delusional fan of the party/individual, and sells merchandise about them, as well as weirdly specific information that you aren't sure how they know. (If your party is famous enough, the store might be dedicated to them) u/bladeraptor3

nonmagical shops
    Artificial Artifice - sells miscellaneous good luck charms and baubles without any enchantments
    Harroc's Fresh Kill - a lizard folk that sells the meat he hunts/catches for a reasonable price
    The Dragon's Hammer - smithy manned by two jovial dragonborn brothers
    Charmed - very high end clothing store owned and operated by an old halfling and his apprentices
    Fleukh agh Mounavuks (Meat and Mounts)- A well off butchery and livery stable ran by a half-orc and several of their full orc half-siblings. u/Th3R3493r
    Cat's Resting Blanket- a quilting and knitting shop ran by a few old tabaxi women who all lived long and varied lives. An thief is bound to be spotted and have a near death with a few expertly thrown knitting needle. u/Th3R3493r
    McClanny's Forge-Forge that was ran by an amnesic dwarf who does not know how he got there. He forgot almost everything about his life but how to forge and about metallurgy. He set up shop in a town's meager forge which expanded over time by the dwarf and the former mayor. u/Th3R3493r
    Dormin & Hormin & 01000101 (069 or E) - Two gnomes and a warforged who make contraptions and do more complex or simple repair jobs. Dormin wants the business to thrive. Hormin wants to invent something that will make him rich. 01000101 (069 or E) wants to win the "war on prices" without causality and capture "most of the repair and technical support contracts" without restrainment or extortion after Dormin and Hormin repair him to functioning order. u/Th3R3493r
    The One Armed Bandit- A tavern with a slot machine in the corner ran by a halfling. The tavern is the run of the mill pub and bed place but the dwarven themed slot machine is what is marvelous. It blinks, it drinks, it wisecracks a win or lose, dare i say it thinks. Everyone seems to win but, always loses more than they won if they do not walk away. (the slot machine is ran by a gnome and kenku bard who can make his voice sound like a warforged). u/Th3R3493r
    Xildi's Herbiary and Nature Education Grove- Xildi is a figborg who took a odd habit of socializing with humanoids after taking a group of lumberjacks to not cut down the new trees and go for the dying side of the forest where the sprites left. As she saw with teaching the humanoids to respect the forest, she made a greenhouse to reduce incidences of humanoids explore or exploiting the forest. She is commonly found with a group of children following her and a flock of songbirds on her robe and back. u/Th3R3493r
    Pedro's Puzzles - Pedro is a wood carver who specializes is puzzle boxes and children's toys. He also makes furniture that can double as puzzle boxes. u/briocheRose123
    Eldrannen Elixirs: a vineyard that bottles its wine in flasks that resemble large potion bottles, run by a high elf who combines the local grape varieties with his homeland's winemaking process. u/fomorianking
    The Crawling Vine; Naturopath, sells hallucinogens, healing kits, etc. u/Boney137
    He Who Smelt It; Blacksmith, sells armor, weapons, etc. will repair armor, weapons, etc. u/Boney137
    The Delirious Adventurer; Tavern/Inn, popular among locals, fairly unknown for outsiders, mid price range. u/Boney137
    The Golden Spider; Tavern/inn, popular among outsiders, locals stay away, scam-y, high price range. u/Boney137
    The Early Owl; Tavern, unpopular, run-down, front for the underground/black market. u/Boney137
    Donuts and Dragons: A pastry shop run by a group of kobolds and a kind elderly dragonborn lady. u/Dragon_Overlord
    Siritharm's herbs: a half-elf is selling assorted herbs, salts, and other seasonings for food. The only thing that could be considered magic is an enchanted lamp with a flame that changes color to keep the area lit and to attract attention, but it's not for sale. u/Tgaghammerstrike
    Grolaina's Inn: A small cozy tavern and inn, owned by an incredibly friendly (and surprisingly attractive) half-orc. u/Tgaghammerstrike
    Deepforest Goods: A human druid and her awakened shrub friend are selling assorted teas, edible mushrooms and berries, and also finely-carved wooden figurines. u/Tgaghammerstrike

charlatain backgrounds
    Leaving an acquaintance to blame for selling fake drugs to a noble [/u/Sleepy_Bandit]
    Tampering with a competitor's equipment to cause them to lose a competition so you can win a bet [/u/Sleepy_Bandit]
    Stealing candy from a child who has now grown up to become a rage-filled barbarian [/u/Sleepy_Bandit]
    Selling fake love potions to a desperate noble who ended up being embarrassed in public [/u/Sleepy_Bandit]
    Using a friend's identity for an illegal deal and getting them arrested / questioned by the authorities [/u/Sleepy_Bandit]
    Seducing away a minor noble’s daughter while posing as a noble, leaving them both destitute. [/u/Marksman157 ]
    Bank fraud, resulting in the economic collapse of a village; a few deaths by despair, starvation or incidental robbery involved [/u/LordsOfJoop ]
    planting fake evidence of involvement with a string of robberies, resulting in a local noble being exiled for life [/u/LordsOfJoop ]
    popularizing a song that portrays a church in a strongly negative light, resulting in a purge from the region [/u/LordsOfJoop ]
    selling a crate of shoddy weapons and armor to a local militia, resulting in a humiliating defeat [/u/LordsOfJoop ]
    Playing both sides of a minor dispute between nobles that resulted in closed borders between the 2 regions (cold war situation). [/u/always_gamer_hair]
    Farting at a very inopportune moment in front of a noble's child. [/u/always_gamer_hair]
    Keeping a memento from a battle that should have gone back to the soldier's significant other or child. [/u/always_gamer_hair]
    Climbing up a wall with clearly posted "no climbing" signs, causing part of the wall to collapse [/u/always_gamer_hair]
    Accidentally melting the ice sculptures at a local ice festival. [/u/always_gamer_hair]
    Reselling stolen goods to the wrong merchant. [/u/always_gamer_hair]
    Informing the local captain of the guard that their wife is having an affair when, in fact, she is most certainly not. [/u/always_gamer_hair]
    Joined a convent for 9 months to hide from debt collectors, then burned the place down in a botched attempt at faking their death. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Let a refugee family use their name to get into a safe city, having forgotten that they are a wanted criminal there. The family was detained, brutally interrogated as potential accomplices, and then thrown out. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Used a set of vestments stolen from a cleric's wardrobe following a one night stand to sell fake indulgences and de-cursings. Many people were injured, and the cleric has been banished from their temple. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Made up a really impressive sounding fake name off the cuff while being arrested which turned out to be a real, very important person. Interpreting the announcement of their arrest as some sort of provocation, a series of insults and slights escalated into an actual border war... in which the character was an active profiteer. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Deflowered one of the participants in a critical political marriage the night before the ceremony, derailing a critical peace settlement and destabilizing the entire region for years [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Participated in a rebellion against an evil overlord, and named names when captured by the guards. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Hocked a critical spare part from an irrigation system for beer money, causing a massive crop failure when that part was needed and couldn't be found in time. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Engaged in some petty abuse of the local populace while wearing a guard uniform (stolen as part of another petty crime), which provoked a clash between the local peasants and the local law, resulting in many injuries and some deaths. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Took a large sum of money to act as a surveyor and just copied a previous surveyor's work, resulting in multiple recently founded villages being destroyed when a dam was built down-river from them. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Accidentally started a race war by spouting off about how much better elves are than dwarves...in a dwarf bar [/u/WSHIII]
    Accidentally started a three way religious war by claiming Torm was better than Ilmater...in Tyrian temple. [/u/WSHIII]
    Accidentally started the Blood War by pissing through a portal into Graz’zt’s throne room...while dressed as a devil for Halloween [/u/WSHIII]
    Betting (and losing) a party member on a gamble after already having lost all their money. The winner has ties to the slave trade and is not happy. [/u/Zekaito]
    Sold a man a bridge who was subsequently eaten by a very persistent troll. [/u/Wolfenight]
    The significant other of a person killed in a fireball mistake turned out to be a renowned and feared bounty hunter. [/u/supersteve320]
    Tricking a family member or friend into buying pointless insurance. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Tricking a family or friend into investing in a company that never existed. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Convincing a friend not to marry by using a loaded die / coin. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Upcharging significantly for beer/wine/mead at a close friend’s wedding. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Taking and completing a contract to kill or bankrupt a close relation’s parent, friend or lover. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Betting and losing a deed that wasn’t theirs to bet. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Stealing a horse. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Rewriting their parents’/grandparents’ will to their benefit. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Laundering money for a gang / beholder / trading company that then ruined the charlatan’s ancestral lands or city. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Convincing a former ally to make a pact with a shady entity at great personal cost in the name of wealth. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Extorting, blackmailing or embezzling from an orphanage. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Running an orphanage as a front. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Skimming/stealing tithes. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Hanging on to a memento from a cursed forest / temple, which must be returned lest extremely bad luck continue to befall them. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Selling a cursed memento to an acquaintance that granted them exceptionally bad luck. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Working with a troll/ogre to collect bridge tolls at great cost to life and limb for others. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Contributing to the extinction of a local beast / bird after selling snake oil made from its bits. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Conning a respected warrior into buying a weapon the charlatan enchanted to return to his/her position when the command word was spoken. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Secretly working with a nothic to learn too much at great cost. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Destroying a family’s crops and livelihood with shoddy agricultural remedies to cause their business and lands’ value to decline. [/u/Umkynareth]
    Eating that last slice of pie... it was not a good idea... [/u/dermitdog]
    Instigating a gang war between two shady (yet wealthy) casinos by cheating and pretending to be from the other casino. [/u/dermitdog]
    Sinking the prize ship of a navy while pretending to be a nautical carpenter [/u/dermitdog]
    Crashing the lord's masquerade by spilling all of the swindled gold lining your clothes while on the stage, then escaping and therefore discrediting the lord for allowing a vagabond to steal so much money and get away with it leaving the (generous and generally beloved) noble house destitute. [/u/dermitdog]
    Selling 'magical' 'snake' oil that, caused a child to die of blood poisoning instead of their terminal (yet curable) illness. [/u/dermitdog]
    Reading from the wrong scripture while posing as a preacher, causing a devout acolyte to be executed for heresy after reciting your teachings. [/u/dermitdog]
    Lying about your identity to someone while becoming their lover for a scheme. The love was eventually genuine from your side, but the scheme wasn't exactly for the other's benefit. The revelation of your lie has left them heartbroken and angry at you. [/u/dermitdog]
    Laundering money so well that it got into wider circulation and put multiple people into prison as they tried to use the money in more rigorous markets. [/u/dermitdog]
    Telling someone that you could make them fly, leading to their suicide. [/u/dermitdog]
    Selling family heirlooms while posing as a moving company worker, scattering the heritage of a dwindling noble family. [/u/dermitdog]
    Leaving your home city abruptly, cutting all ties and never looking back on the people you knew. [/u/dermitdog]
    Not stopping a clear case of marital abuse because doing so would blow your cover. [/u/dermitdog]
    Stealing the bricks from a historic building and selling them at extortionate prices while replacing them with weaker materials, causing the building to collapse during a busy day. [/u/dermitdog]
    Misquoting a holy passage, causing a schism in the church. [/u/dermitdog]
    Pressured an accomplice to not seek medical aid for a serious injury, fearing it would result in the detection of a criminal plot, only to wreck the plot themselves by running their mouth in a tavern while drunk. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Not wanting to be outdone telling tawdry tales at the inn, the character made up an atrociously lurid fib about their activities with a young princess they had never actually met. A bard heard it, made it into song, and completely ruined her marriage prospects. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Sold a map of the city catacombs to what they thought were drug smugglers for 50 gold and a cask of nice wine. The "drug smugglers" were an engineering crew from a rival city, and in a siege 6 months later used the plans to great effect by setting explosives under critical defense structures. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Convinced a young accomplice to take the fall for a crime they committed, on the logic that the character would be able to break them out later. Character instead got arrested for partying too hard in the next town over, and jumped a ship out of the country instead of trying to go back for their fall guy. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Persuaded several friends to bankroll them for a surefire gambling scheme, based on a plan to use advanced math to calculate the "true" odds of any particular play. Lost everything when they got too drunk to properly carry the "1". [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    While rummaging through a church for things to steal, they found an old bottle of wine, drank it, and put the empty bottle back in it's nook. The bottle was one of the earthly possessions of a man who ascended to a higher plane, and it's consumption was seen as a sign of his return. Several pretenders appeared, triggering a violent schism in the religion. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    When travelling, they met the last survivor of a pilgrimage, clutching a golden chest in his hands. They were attempting to return a holy relic to a temple, in accordance with an oath sworn by the founder of their order over 150 years ago. With their last breath, they begged the character to deliver the relic in the chest to their destination. The character, headed the other direction, chose to throw the relic in a creek and hock the chest for 10 gold. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    In a moment of cocky bravado, the character gloated over the fallen body of a dangerous litch, telling them that they were an idiot for not hiding their phylactery better, rattling off several examples. The lich then used a contingency spell to transport themselves and their phylactery away. The phylactery hasn't been seen since, but the lich has been a plague on the land for years... [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Accidentally fell in with a group of highway robbers and cutthroats, who told the character they were freedom fighters against a corrupt regime. The character found out after a week, but stuck around for a whole month because the "rebel leader" was just too hot. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Attempting to get a lover to leave them so as to not feel the guilt of initiating a breakup, the character went too far, gaslighting their SO to the point of actual madness. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Sold samples of their own blood to a group they knew to be demon summoning cultists as "virgin blood" (lol, no). They successfully summoned the demon, but completely failed at containing or dismissing it. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Got drunk and took a piss in a holy fountain, deconsecrating it. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Fiddled around with an elaborate sundial because they were bored, not knowing that it served an important role in timing the local planting cycle and triggering massive crop failure. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Agreed to act as a fraudulent guardian for a group of orphans who needed parental consent to join the Army. The "military recruiter" was actually an agent for a slave trader. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Hid the body of a dead man in a well, contaminating the only ready source of clean water within 5 miles of a small town. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Received a key to the city for services rendered, and then got drunk and lost it. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Sold a large pile of colored flour to a church, telling them it was rare medicinal powder. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Stole a statue from a town square and sold it for cheap to an art collector. The statue was actually the petrified body of a legendary hero, prophecied to return to life in the time of greatest need, and the "art collector" her ancient nemesis. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Yelled "do a flip" at a despondent man standing on a ledge. They did the flip. It was horrible. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Spent years convincing an old, half-blind noblewoman that they were their adult grandchild. When the real grandchild came to visit, the guards shot them as an impostor. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Knowingly gave a group of pirates a map of the harbor defenses of a city that had banished them for multiple crimes. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Blamed a rash of robberies they had committed on an in-city goblin community, giving their enemies a pretense to persecute and exile them, uprooting families that had been living there for generations and turning "Goblintown" from a thriving community to an urban blight. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Knowingly sold defective spell components to a group of student wizards, causing them to fail their final exams when the spells misfired. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    While drunk and in a fighty mood, played "devil's advocate" in an argument with a paladin, turning them Oathbreaker. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    After being saved from a shipwreck by a merperson, told a group of pirates where to find them in exchange for a fixed fee per fin they cut off. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Participated in a scheme to breed and train mimics to act as guard animals and security devices. It worked great for about 72 hours, and then people started getting beaten to death by their own nightstands. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Blamed a friendly old healer woman for cursing them, so they wouldn't need to explain certain symptoms of a STI to their significant other. The healer was a druid who was single-handedly responsible for keeping the Fair Folk at bay and placated, and after she was driven away as a witch they moved in on the town. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Sold swords with defective heat treating to a local militia, many of which shattered in their hands when they were attempting to defend their town from bandits. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Having come down ill before the night of a major party, the character paid a spellcaster to glamor them to hide the symptoms so they could go, carouse and steal. The party was in turn the epicenter of a massive disease outbreak, as many attendees were travelers from afar. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Deliberately triggered a trap on the way out of a dungeon to reduce the number of people with whom they would have to share the treasure. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Built a fake dungeon, and then spread about it at inns and taverns, so they could ambush the adventurers who came to "save the townsfolk" and take their stuff. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Bought a group of slaves on the intention of freeing them... and then changed their mind once they found out how good they were at keeping house and cooking meals. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Tuned out during a conversation with a significant other, giving them the "yeah, sure honey, sounds good" treatment when the SO was a young artificer asking for guidance on what ingredients to use, causing a large explosion. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    Gave someone's name to the Inquisition because they figured it would be easier to rob their house when they were too busy being stabbed with hot irons in a dungeon to do anything about it. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]

bard instrument
    A lute that was carved from an enchanted tree. When played, the illusion of sheet music and music notes can be seen flowing around the player.
    A set of reed pipes made by a Satyr. Their sweet and mysterious sound grants disadvantage on saving throws to resist being charmed by the musician.
    A vuvuzela that, when blown, sobers every person up within a 20 foot radius.
    A tuba that spits out water, the pressure is determined by the quality of the music.
    A comically long recorder that’s long enough to be used as a functioning quarter staff.
    The Hydrophary – A species of aquatic plant that is vaguely octopus-shaped and can be played like a bagpipe. It wiggles its tentacles with delight when played.
    Any type of string instrument that, when the command word is spoken, turns into a type of axe. The size of the instrument decides what type of ax it is: violin is a handaxe, guitar and lute are battle-axe, and bass is a greataxe. Speak the command word again to revert back to instrument.
    The Phomenflumphen: You’re not sure what this is. It appears to be equal parts accordion, bagpipe and drum. The Gnome playing it seems to know what they’re doing though. Without training, all checks with this bizarre instrument are made at disadvantage.
    A conductor’s baton that allows you to shift the pitch of someone talking to make it sound musical.
    Cetacean Song – An ocarina seemingly crafted from snowflake obsidian that produces some decently low notes, and is shaped somewhat like an aquatic animal of some sort (inspired by this)
    Conductor’s Instrumental – At first glance, it just looks like a typical conductor’s baton. However, depending on the direction and speed it is moved, it will softly hum a note.
    Hidden Headbanger – It doesn’t look like too much, just a simple polished wooden 6-string guitar. When a bard plays it, however, it sounds as if it were an overdriven electric guitar. Has a disclaimer on the bottom written in small text: ‘FOR THOSE ABOUT TO ROCK’
    Zamchroma – A zampogna with tubes made of a special glass that ‘catch and toss’ light that passes through them, giving them the appearance of being made of solidified and slowly shifting rainbows. It produces notes that echo very slightly, and overall sound heavenly or ethereal in nature.
    A saxophone with special compartments for storing rations. A snacksophone.
    The Dread Lute – Found deep in a dungeon on the corpse of a powerful bard. The wood is rotting and the strings are long gone, but “playing” it still produces beautiful music, as if it were brand new.
    The Flute of Love – The mage who sold this to you said it would make any listener fall in love. That doesn’t seem to be true, but any music you try to play comes out as the same love song, every single time.
    Goblin Drums – A pair of small hand-played drums that can be worn around your neck with an old bit of rope. Whenever you use them to grant inspiration, any goblins in earshot also become inspired.
    Chance the Rapier – This intelligent sword speaks with incredible creativity and rhyme. You can sing along with it to get the same benefits of a bardic instrument.
    An enchanted accordion. Whoever plays it will slowly but steadily increases the tempo of whatever song they are playing.
    A Stroh violin with the horn decorated with dwarven runes.
    Namic’s Bladder – A set of Uilleann Pipes, black as ebony and with an incredibly clear sound. Said to have been created from the bones and bladder of a Black Dragon by Hersem Grelelian, who defeated the dragon on the way to her wedding and presented them to her husband.
    A member of the violin family made out of iridescent ivory. It changes sizes and transforms into the different forms of the family depending on the phase of the moon, starting as a violin on the full moon and growing into a double bass by the new moon.
    A very worn looking banjo with the peg head made out of a carved piece of driftwood. Grants the performer the benefits the rustic hospitality feature with anybody that listens to a successful enough (DC 14) performance using the banjo.
    A foldable grand piano that also doubles up as a boat.
    The mouthpiece of a flute. When held to the mouth, the rest of the flute is revealed. It’s ghostly blue and produces sweet but strangely sad notes.
    A small flute carved from bone. When played, it sounds like a massive pipe organ, and even the liveliest of tunes has an unnerving, ominous tone.
    Shoes of Tap: Tap dancing shoes that when you click the heels, as bonus an action, allows one to tap dance on any surface. Movement speed decreases by 10, because you are dancing, but ignore difficult terrain, can dance on water, and can dance on walls when tapping magic is in use.
    The Pipe Pipe: A smoking pipe that doubles as a playing pipe. If you smoke and play at the same time you can magically control the shape of the smoke.
    Brass Plate: This large brass instrument wraps around you and acts as plate armor. When you roll a 1 on sneak the instrument starts playing mocking music as you move.
    A set of wooden spoons, ebony black with a glossy finish and silver inlay. After attunement, when the phrase ‘Spoonblades, to my aid!’ is called within a 15-foot area, the spoons transform into two spoon-shaped shortswords (Treat as a +1 weapon).
    A set of four elderwood carved string instruments: The Shining Violin, The Viola Melodious, The Morning Cello, and The Bass Sonorous. The four instruments have a deep amethyst luster, and golden inscriptions in an elvish script. The inscriptions tell of a tryst between the God of Forest, and the Mountain Goddess. The quartet hasn’t been played together in 500 years.
    The Bass Bass. It’s a large contrabass that looks like a fish. If you press a button on the neck of the bass, the fish head will tell a bad joke.
    The Brass Bass Bass. A Double Bass, also fish shaped. Playing the bass gives you the ability to breathe underwater when playing the bass, and advantage while doing so.
    The Brass Sass Bass Bass. An octobass carved for a giant, also piscine. When played with enough skill and force, able to deal structural damage to walls, doors, and other nearby objects. Will randomly interject with cutting remarks aimed at any nearby hostile creatures in their native tongue.
    A jaw harp carved from a peacock’s bone. Can cast feather fall once per day. The performer has a faint image of a peacock’s tail appear behind them when playing.
    Pearl – An undersized lute that slowly (yet constantly) drips water while it is being played. The water is fresh and potable, but only drips while the music continues.
    The Golden Fiddle of Georg Ja. Legends say that he played this fiddle at the wedding of the ancient Queen Kershaw, banishing a demonic presence that had plagued her for a decade.
    The Silver Fiddle of Georg Ja. Legends say that Georg played this fiddle as Kershaw’s kingdom burned, swearing revenge on the armies that had destroyed his lover’s domain.
    The Brass Fiddle of Georg Ja. Legends say that Georg never really liked this fiddle.
    Fae Flute: an intricate flute whose music is understood as language by Fae creatures. While playing this flute you have Sylvan as a language.
    Dread Drums of Doom: Deep booming drums that make creatures uneasy. Enemy creatures have disadvantage on save vs. frightened condition. Creatures who are immune to fear/frightened condition are unaffected.
    First Mate’s Harmonica: An old harmonica engraved with a compass card and a variety of fish. When played on land it summons a fresh breeze smelling of salt and seaweed, putting everyone in a melancholic mood missing the sea. Playing the harmonica on a boat or ship of any size however grants the mercy of the sea. As long as the bard is playing the creatures of the deep show now interest in attacking the ship, an aft wind drives the ship forward and rogue waves lose most of their power before hitting the ship. When the music ends the effect slowly wears off and things return to normal over the next 30 minutes.
    An ancient set of pipes made from the hollowed out finger bones of a dead bard, with his soul still bound to them. When music is played from the instrument, listeners can faintly make out a gentle vocal accompaniment that perfectly fits whatever is being played.
    A wooden, roughly carved hunting horn that still has patches of bark remaining on its surface. The deep, haunting sound it makes is dark, foreboding, and above all else, wild, with its notes echoing far longer than they should. Once per week, the player of the pipes may use their action to mark a creature. At the start of the player’s next turn, a pack of 2d4 spectral wolves coalesce into being near them and begin to hound the marked creature. The wolves pursue and attack the marked creature relentlessly, being completely immune to mental manipulation of any kind, and otherwise have the same stats as regular wolves. If a spectral wolf dies, it dissipates into the air for 24 hours, after which it reassembles itself within 100 feet of the target and continues its hunt. This effect persists until the marked creature dies or a week has passed, at which point the wolves give a final howl before evaporating and returning to the hunting horn, eagerly awaiting their next prey.
    An intelligent banjo of common, almost aggressively average craft. Insecure about its own worth and fantasizing of respect and honor, it refuses to sound like a banjo and instead sounds like a grand piano through sheer force of will.
    A magical harp that causes whatever false legend sung while playing it to become true.
    A set of panpipes made from a tree struck by lightning. Playing the pipes allows the piper to subtly and slowly alter the weather to either induce or reduce thunderstorms.
    The Dijj- a long, hollowed out greatclub, the Dijj makes a deep and oddly pleasant sound if blown into. If used as a greatclub, the strikes make powerful echoes, adding an extra 1d6 thunder damage to each hit.
    The Paltry Psaltery- A diminutive dulcimer-like instrument, in the hands of a talented bard, this instrument can bring bad luck and meager gains for enemies. As an action once per rest, a bard can play the Paltry Psaltery and force all enemies he sees to make a Charisma save (DC 10+ the Bard’s performance modifier) or be subjected to the effects of the Bane spell. The effect lasts for as long as the bard plays, plus 1d6 rounds.
    Old Man’s Shawm- This otherwise nondescript brown shawm has three wrinkled old faces carved into the bell. If a command word is spoken and then the instrument is played, one of the faces will open its mouth, creating a strange overtone. Anyone hearing the resultant music for one full round must make a constitution saving throw or gain one level of exhaustion.
    A small drum with a symbol etched on the skin. Closer inspection reveals that the symbol is in fact a tattoo denoting membership to a now-defunct bandit group. (Things did not end well!)
    An ocarina made out of a large beetle exoskeleton. The sound is not dissimilar to a cricket’s chirp.
    A 2-meter long string instrument with a thin slate body and metal strings (4 of them). Easy to play and far more durable than it looks. It has no name and nobody knows where it is from.
    It looks like an axe but it’s completely blunt, hollow and riddled with holes. When swung it makes whistling sounds of different pitch – depending on the speed and direction of the swing.
    A didgeridoo. Spiraling around it’s length is an epic saga of a great war from history, but key details are false including the victors.
    A shamisen that has leaves growing out of the tuning pegs. If removed, they grow back very quickly.
    An aged fiddle made of bits and junk, the finish is patchy and the pegs might even be bits of hardened cork, but an upbeat tune played on this fiddle never fails to get people wiggling fingers and doing a jig. If the listeners resist, they make a Charisma saving throw and dance uncontrollably for 1 minute on a failed save.
    A white Japanese-style flute delicately inlaid with strange runes of blue-black metal. Close examination will reveal that the flute is carved from a human femur. It always sounds beautiful, but breathtakingly mournful.
    An old and damaged wooden flute, held together with bandages. Inexplicably, there is a small plant growing out of one of the finger holes. It produces surprisingly beautiful music considering its condition.
    Bamboongos: A set of bongos made outta bamboo, that when played, summons 1d4 musicians that will give advantage to any bard song or inspiration. For every musician above the first one that is summoned, the inspiration/song gains a +2 bonus, for a total of +6.
    A lute with the body made out a giant tortoise shell. Grants +1 to AC when not being played and is strapped to the bard’s back.
    A french horn decorated with black bronze dwarven runes that can only play melodies in minor key.
    A fiddle made out of pure white wood and engraved with elven runes that can only play melodies in the major key.
    A harp with a body made out of an opaque golden glass that seem to glow as the instrument is played.
    A bassoon with the bell joint carved into the shape of a dragon’s head that shoots smoke rings when played.
    A cornett with an axe blade attached to the lower half that allows it to be used as a handaxe.
    A shield with two metal sticks that can be taken out of the back. When hit, may either sound like a steel drum, a gong, or an odd snare drum, depending on which side of the stick the bard is hitting with, and where on the shield they strike.
    The Whistles of The Deep – A set of stone chimes, expertly crafted by dwarven musicians in absolute darkness. The expert player can, while maintaining a proper rhythm, cast stone shape once per long rest.
    A shoulder brace that can be inflated. When a pipe is inserted into the end, it can act as a small, high-pitched bagpipe.
    A smaller lute that plays pluckier tones called a lute-kelele.
    A banjo called the ‘Banjo of Truth’ that once per day allows the performer to play a bad country song to cast one charge of Zone of Truth.
    A bedazzled flute called a Jewel that blows out different scented vapor.
    Boots of the Dawn Chorus. A collection of bellows, whistles and trumpets adorn the soles of these shoes. Each dance the bard performs sounds like an ethereal birdsong. However, when the bard is fleeing from battle, it sounds a lot like a gaggle of honking geese.
    A magically enchanted Glass Harmonica; when picked up it will float in front of the musician and start to spin as fast or slowly as the musician asks it to.
    A shamisen that is always cold to the touch. When played, the leaves fall off every tree within a 100′ radius.
    The squire’s hurdy-gurdy: the soul of the squire who last owned this instrument is bound to it. When it’s played, a ghostly voice sings praise of the nearest warrior deemed worthy (with varying degrees of accuracy).
    A lyre that sounds inexplicably familiar to everyone that hears it. No matter what song is played, it always makes the listener feel nostalgic.
    The Thunderhorn: A horn with a polished white-gold exterior. No matter how hard you blow into this horn, it is always comically loud.
    A whistle that only people you choose can hear.
    A tiny brass bell wrapped in silk cloth. When the cloth is removed, the slightest disturbance unleashes a deafening ring.
    A 15ft Alphorn that when blown summons icy winds and frost. Oddly enough, it also causes a chance of summoning a St. Bernard with a small keg of brandy around its neck. (Roll a d20, if natural 20, dog is summoned.)
    A mountain dulcimer made of black locust wood. The sound-holes are intricately carved in the shape of stars. It re-tunes itself on clear nights.
    A lyre that suspiciously resembles the description of one belonging to a certain sun god. It seems to glow with radiance when played. Creatures associated with the moon visibly cringe when they see it, as if they do not like the thought of it’s existence.
    A hurdy-gurdy made from darkwood, with enchanted strings that produce illusions while being played. The illusions are clearly illusions, and won’t trick anybody, but are entertaining nonetheless. The form of the illusions range from a tiny ship sailing across a wall, to sapling growing out of the floor. The illusions are always transparent to an extent, and appear almost holographic.
    The Phoenix Egg – A beautifully constructed Red xun, said to be made from the egg of a Phoenix. It is said that, if it is played correctly, it will restore those who die around it to life (mimicking the effect of the revivify spell).
    An Upright piano that is actually a highly mobile construct built with adjustable legs to be able to move in different terrain. If the piano is played badly or a less than favorable song is played then the constructs personality will take over and it will slam the lid shut, possibly on the musician’s fingers.
    A string instrument created by and for Elven musicians. The strings are made of specialized bowstring. When they are plucked in the right way they can shoot an ethereal arrow, which deals sonic damage and leaves a ringing in the targets ears.
    The Dragpipes: A set of bagpipes where the bag itself resembles a dragon’s skull. The horns are exaggerated to form the reeds while the player blows through the mouthpiece connected to the back of the neck. The sound of the Dragpipes mimics the roars of different dragons so the player can convince or cause frightening presence to people making them think there is one, or many dragons.
    The Barbarian’s Cello: A cello carved from ironwood by dwarves. Its music, when played correctly, instills resolution, confidence, and defense in others.
    Conch Shell of the Officer: Legend says that this trumpet-like instrument was used by the Captain of the Guards in one of the ancient merfolk kingdoms. Used to rally troops to protect its nation. Sometimes it will drip out water, even when it is completely dry. It is inscribed with the words ‘take me up’.
    Fairy Bell: A tiny bell (not fairy-tiny, but regular human tiny) formed from silver and bronze. It has three icons on it. The longer it is rung in rhythm, the more cumulative the effect.
    Harp of Hades: Necromantic magic flows off this instrument. Though it looks like any angelic harp, its music has been known to drive people to depression, sorrow, and madness. Any necromantic magic in the area increases in potency. Those unfortunate to hear its song are likely to see visions of horrifying events that they never knew about, such as the murder of a loved one that was disguised as a natural death or a repressed memory.
    Marimba of the Wind: Under each tone bar is a secret compartment, perfect for a rogue to hide things. It also seems to bring impossible good luck to the player, though this cannot be proven.
    The Triangle: If arcane words are invoked (which can be seen inscribed on the triangle if exposed to temperatures either hot or cold strong enough to kill a man), the center of the triangle becomes an invisible dimensional portal, like a bag of holding.
    Organ of the Dreaming Land: When played, the nearest sleeping person will begin dreaming of the circumstances around the player. It cannot be played by anyone not of noble birth.
    Drum, That Which Calls Thunder: A drum of unknown origin. It appears to be made from traditional methods, with clay and perhaps crocodile skin. But there is something more ancient about this drum that you can’t quite put your finger on. It turns any attack back toward the source (like turning back arrows to the people who shot them).
    Perfect Stillness – This strange instrument appears to make no sound when played; however, all those listening become hyper-aware of all of the sounds around them.
    The Master’s Desk – An exquisitely smooth guqin, carved of cherry wood and perfectly tuned every time it is uncovered. Believed to have belonged to Guit Prox, the ancient Minotaur sage of lore.
    The Bann’s Fiddle – A light green Fiddle with a bow like a sapling, it is impossible to play the Bann’s Fiddle sadly. Every song has an upbeat, cheery tone. When sad songs are sung on the fiddle, there is a strange magic that turns them happy by the end, resulting in a strange retelling of many tragic sagas.
    Red Chuk – A small red box with a wooden handle, the Red Chuk creates an impressive percussive sound when struck. Anyone playing has advantage on any persuasion or performance check to act in accordance with courtly formalities for the next hour.

rings
    Ring of Blood: a ring with a clear crystal band filled with blood. As a bonus action the wearer can focus on the ring and the blood inside the ring will flow. When the blood in the ring flows the wielders next physical attack deals an extra 1d6 necrotic damage and all damage dealt in that attack will heal the wearer. This effect can be used once every long rest.
    Ring of The Stone Giant: a +1 ring made of iron. The wearer can cast the stoneskin spell once a day.
    Occam’s Ring: a +1 ring made of silver with a pearl in the center. The wearer once attuned gains a +2 in wisdom and proficiency in wisdom saves but a -1 in intelligence as well as disadvantage on all intelligence saving throws. If the wearer has proficiency in wisdom saving throws already then they gain a +3 in wisdom saving throws.
    Ring of The Blue Dagger: a +1 gold ring that is worn by Blue Dagger members when making shady deals. The ring will turn copper for one minute when it touches a fake gold coin.
    Ring of Light: a +2 golden ring with a glowing ruby. Once a day the wearer can cast color spray at the third level.
    Ancient Dragons Band: a red stained platinum ring with a diamond that once attuned grants the wearer resistance to their choice of fire, cold, acid, poison, or lightning damage as well as the ability to speak draconic. The wearer also gains a +2 in persuasion and intimidation.
    Ring of The Eldritch Eye: a +1 black steel ring with a green eye in the center. Once attuned the wearer gains a +5 in perception and has resistance to psychic damage.
    Ring of Dwarvenkind: a +2 golden band ring with a black opal center. Once attuned the wearer gains 1 hit point for every level they are. The ring also grants resistance to poison damage.
    Ring of The Kings Tournament: a +3 platinum band ring with three 5000gp diamonds studded around it. Once attuned the wearer can use action surge as if they were a fighter. This feature can be used once every short it long rest. Additionally the wearer gains an extra attack when making an attack action.
    Ring of The Black Waters: a rusty iron band ring with an amethyst gemstone. The wearer can cast black tentacles once a day.
    Fury of Orcus: a +2 steel band with a pink gold horned devil with a ruby in its mouth. The wearer once attuned can summon four quasits. One of the quasits is a king quasit. King quasits are a small creature and have 14 hit points instead of 7.
    Ring of Magic Bullet: While wearing the ring, you can shoot a bullet of magical energy while pointing your index finger. Deals 1d4 damage.
    Ring of Iron Grip: The hand on which the ring is attached becomes detachable at will, and if detached while grabbing onto something, the grip is as strong as iron. The wearer has psychic knowledge of where their detached hand is at all times.
    Ring of The Druid: a +1 bronze ring with an emerald that once attuned allows the wearer to turn into a small beast once a day.
    Ring of Hadar: a +3 ring forged in the frost of the deepest depths in hell. The wearer once attuned becomes immune to cold damage and grants the wearer a favor from a devil king.
    Ring of Medicine: a +1 ring that grants the wearer proficiency in medicine.
    Ring of Spiders: a +1 ring that grants the wearer climbing speed equal to their walking speed. The wearer also gains resistance to poison damage.
    Ring of The Grand Blacksmith: a ring that once attuned to can summon a +3 simple or martial weapon. The weapon also does an additional 1d4 of either fire, cold, or lightning damage.
    Ring of Hinalia: a ring forged by a cleric of Hinalia, a goddess of luck. The ring is made of platinum with a diamond gem. Every morning the wearer wakes up with a platinum piece.
    Ring of Broma: an ancient ring made of an unknown metal with a dune etched into the side of a language long forgotten. Attuning to the ring grants the wearer +2 dexterity and +2 charisma. When touched with the Ring of Vistal and the Ring of Shevo the effects of each ring are imbued into the three wearers permanently giving the three their benefits before each ring crumbles to dust.
    Ring of Vistal: an ancient ring made of an unknown metal with a dune etched into the side of a language long forgotten. Attuning to the ring grants the wearer +2 constitution and +2 wisdom. When touched with the Ring of Vistal and the Ring of Shevo the effects of each ring are imbued into the three wearers permanently giving the three their benefits before each ring crumbles to dust.
    Ring of Shevo: an ancient ring made of an unknown metal with a dune etched into the side of a language long forgotten. Attuning to the ring grants the wearer +2 strength and +2 intelligence. When touched with the Ring of Vistal and the Ring of Shevo the effects of each ring are imbued into the three wearers permanently giving the three their benefits before each ring crumbles to dust.
    Ring of Malice: a ring made of black crystal and has a glowing purple gem set into it. Anyone who looks into the gem thinks of their most hated foe. As an action, the wearer can picture someone they've come into contact with before and cast Locate Creature on them without expending a spell slot or material components. The wearer can do this once per day, the ability recharging at midnight.
    Fairy Ring: looks like a small band made of toadstools. Once attuned can be used as a one time use portal into (or out of) they feywild. The portal appears to be a 5ft radius fairy ring on the floor made of red toadstools. This can be used once every sunrise.
    Ring of Poison Detection: a simple brass band with a snake engraved around it. When the wearer is wearing the ring and comes into contact with a poisonous liquid it will turn shiny and silver.
    Peephole Ring: an ordinary looking ring with the symbol of an eye engraved in it. When the ring is placed against any solid surface it acts as a peephole. Peephole can be used to see through up to 3ft of any solid matter except lead. Note there is no actual hole in the surface the ring only allows you to see through it as if there was a peephole at the location of the ring.
    Ring of Honesty: a +2 glass ring with an emerald gem. The wearer once attuned has disadvantage on deception checks. Three times a day the wearer can lay a curse on another creature. The creature must make a DC 20 wisdom save or be forced to say whatever they are thinking for 24 hours.
    Ring of Renewed Resolve: When wearing this ring, and being the target of a healing spell from a source other than yourself, as a reaction you may use one hit die.
    Ring of Rosies: This ring with a delightful tiny metal rose grants its wearer the Cantrip known as Druidcraft and the ability to cause flowers to bloom or revitalise simply by touching them.
    Coffee Ring: Strange ring that, when dropped in hot water, causes the liquid to turn brown and take on a bitter, yet enjoyable taste identical to coffee... just be careful not to forget about the ring. You don’t want to know what it does to your insides...
    Ring of Recalling: Each holder of the ring may bestow it a memory. Once stored, this memory is lost to you without the ring. It could be a secret hiding hole, a safe combination or the last time you saw your beloved wife. Either way, the memory says with the ring and is remembered by anyone else who uses it. This ring is special, requiring attunement, but not counting against your attunement cap. To attune you must spend a long rest wearing the ring and bestow it a memory. Once done, you will have access to all the stored memories, including your own.
    Ring of the Rooster: Although a bit larger than the average finger ring (yet smaller than a wrist bangle) this peculiar golden ring, engraved with a rooster mark, conveys certain benefits befitting its animal. You can cause your voice to boom out much louder than normal (as of using the Thaumaturgy cantrip) as a free action similar to a Cock’s crow. This increases the spell range of sound based abilities and spells (such as those of a Bard) by 15 feet. You may also cast Featherfall for free once per day, landing in a cloud of white feathers.
    Cling Ring: a silver ring shaped like two hands clutching each other. The wearer is immune to effects that drain their maximum HP or prevent healing.
    Ring of the Iron Golem: Thick cast iron ring that never rusts. The wearer’s Constitution score becomes 24 if it’s not already equal or higher. They also become magnetic; ferrous metal objects up to ten pounds in weight will stick to them, and attacks against them with metal weapons can’t miss.
    War Oath Ring: A wide band made of old papyrus, strangely impervious to any kind of damage, with an evergreen tree drawn on it surrounded by angular runes. The wearer becomes proficient with all weapons. If they gain four levels or three years pass by wherein the wearer only ever used one non-magical sword, it becomes a +3 magical weapon which can cast a 1st level Cleric spell of the wearer’s choice, once a day.
    Ring of Aves: a +1 ring with a pearl band and a sapphire gem. Once attuned the wearer can cast featherfall once every short rest and can speak auran.
    Dead Man's Ring: a simple metal righ found off of a dead npc. A while after wearing the ring, the ghost of the original owner will start to appear only the the current person wearing the ring.
    Spiked Ring - This simple black stone band has a series of small spikes around it. As a bonus action, the ring causes the wearer to grow stone spikes from their knuckles, which deal an extra 1d4 piercing damage when attacking unarmed. The user may use an action to fire the spikes from their fist, making a ranged attack roll on 1 creature, on a successful fit, the spikes deal 1d8 + dex piercing damage (range (20/60), and the spike effect on the knuckles ends immediately. otherwise, the knuckles last for 1 hour or until dismissed.
    Ring of Signets: A favorite of spies and saboteurs, this ring can be used to copy and replicate other seals. Once per day the wearer can press it against a wax seal to 'learn' that design or command the ring to switch to some previously learned design. The ring also grants +1 AC and a +2 in stealth.
    Ring of Chet: a +3 ring made out of a strange rainbow material. The ring grants the wearer the ability to cast color spray and prismatic wall once a day. Additionally very rarely an ancient wizard named Chet known for his pageantry and his boyfriend Tim will give advice to the wearer.
    Ring of Elven Grace: a +1 ring with a cedar wood band and an emerald gem that once attuned to grants the wearer +10 to movement and a +2 to all ranged attack rolls.
    Ring of the Right Path: Once per day, if the wearer is presented with a decision that has some physical representation, such as a fork in the road, or selecting a person, they can bid the ring to make a decision. The ring will tug the wearer's hand towards the best, or least-bad option at that precise moment, subject to DM interpretation.
    Ring of Remote: The wearer of this ring can cast the Mage Hand cantrip. The hand that the ring is worn on detaches, and acts as the mage hand, becoming transparent and made of force energy until the end of the spell. When the spell ends, the wearer's hand reappears.
    Ring of The Desert: a +1 clay band ring with a yellow diamond gem. The ring when attuned to the wearer no longer requires water and can transmute water into sand.
    Lich Ring: a +2 pitch black ring with a green flame burning in the center. Once attuned the wearer is invisible to undead with challenge ratings below 6.
    Ring of The Far Travelers: a +1 ring made of a grey alloy with a diamond gem. Once attuned the wearer gains resistance to fire and cold damage.
    Winters Breath Ring: a blueish metal alloy band with a wolfs head holding a sapphire in it’s mouth. Once attuned to the wearer can summon a friendly winter wolf named winter who will protect the ring wearer to the best of her abilities. If winter dies the ring wearer can do an hour ritual to bring her back to life. The ring cannot be attuned to by evil creatures.
    Ring of Linguistic Achievement: After wearing this ring for one week, the ring will dissolve into the skin of the wearer, leaving a magical tattoo of a rotating script that the wearer understands. Once dissolved, the DM chooses a language the wearer does not understand, and that language becomes known to the wearer. Only one of these can exist in the world, and will magically avoid the party of anyone who has already used the ring.
    Ring of Past Sight: a glossy ebon ring with a small vein of material running through it that is either green or red, depending on the lighting. When attuned, the wearer can choose to experience the recent past of the area they are currently in by going to sleep for at least five minutes. While asleep, the wearer can choose any point between mere seconds ago and up to ten days, although the further back they go the longer they remain asleep in the present. Alternatively, they can attempt to view the past without going to sleep first, but the strain on one's consciousness immediately forces an INT save of 15 to avoid 2d8 psychic damage. If the save is failed the wearer must try again.
    Monkey's Tail Ring: two tiny smoky quartz gems dangle from this loop of twine. Anyone wearing it cannot fail climb-related checks, their long jump distance increases by 10 ft, their high jump distance increases by 5 ft, and Athletics checks related to jumping are made with advantage. When attuned, the wearer is treated as if persistently under the effect of Spider Climb.
    Ring of Animal Dowsing: this four-sided ring is made of teak-like wood with a band of amber running across each side. When attuned, the wearer can press the ring to any solid surface to know the location and species of living creatures within 60 feet. The ring stores three charges, and regains one each dawn. An attuned wearer can use one charge to cast Animal Friendship on any animal the ring has recently detected, ignoring the spell's restrictions on both line of sight and the animal needing to see and hear the caster.
    Ring of Love: This gold plated ring has a ruby shaped like a heart set in the center and allows charm person to be cast once per short rest by the wearer once attuned. The ring is valued around 250gp.
    Ring of Shadows: an invisible ring that can only be seen in dim light as a band made of darkness. Once attuned the wearers attacks deal an extra 1d6 necrotic and the target's Strength score is reduced by 1d4. The target dies if this reduces its Strength to 0. Otherwise, the reduction lasts until the target finishes a short or long rest. The ring has no effects in broad daylight.
    Pink Key Ring: This small pink ring can be used once a day to unlock a non magical lock. When activated the finger on which it is worn temporarily transmutes into a skeleton key which can be used to unlock the lock.
    Kobara’s Ring: a +2 ring made of iron with a pearl in the middle made by an infamous illusionist. As an action the wearer can produce 2d10 caltrops which disappear after 5 minutes.
    Ring of Spells: a +3 lead and gold ring that allows the wearer to cast a level three spell of their choice once every long rest.
    Luck Ring: a golden ring with vine patterns carved in and an emerald gem. The wearer once attuned gets +1 to all saving throws and gets advantage on one saving throw every long rest.
    Ring of The Artisan: an oak wood ring that grants the wearer proficiency in one tool of their choice. That tool can be changed every long rest.
    Ring of Chronos: a +1 silver ring that triples the wearers expected lifetime.
    Ring of The Navigator: a bronze ring with an opal gem. The wearer can once every sunrise ask the ring for water, civilization, or a cave and the ring will glow when pointed in the direction of the object desired. This ring was made by Druids as a gift to a local farm town.
    Ring of The Forgotten Glade: the ring is spotted green copper (but doesn't leave stains on the wearers' skin) with a ruby in the shape of a bear set on top. When it is worn, add +2 to Performance checks as the wearer is suddenly inspired with visions of a peaceful forest glade to ease their spirit, and Advantages on saves vs mental or emotional magical attacks.
    Ring of The Stars: a black iron ring with platinum spots that once attuned grants the wearer +1 to all saving throws and the wearer no longer requires sleep.
    Ring of The Sun: a golden ring with a sun carved into it. Once attuned to the wearer gains +2 AC and +2 on all saving throws. The wearer gains resistance to radiant damage and an immunity to blindness. Once every sunrise the wearer can release a burst of radiant energy as an action dealing 4d6 radiant damage and healing the wearer for 4d6 hit points.
    Ring of The Moon: a silver ring with a moon carved into it. Once attuned to the wearer gains +2 AC and +2 on all saving throws. The wearer gains resistance to necrotic damage and immunity to deafness. Once every midnight the wearer can release a burst of shadowy energy as an action dealing 4d6 necrotic damage and healing the wearer for 4d6 hit points.
    Ring of Shrooms: a ring made by a spore druid that once attuned allows the wearer to cast crown of madness a number of times a day equal to their wisdom modifier.
    Ring of The Scholar: a bronze ring with an amethyst gem. The ring once attuned gives the wearer +2 intelligence and can summon a book of lore in the wearers hand at will.
    Ring of The City: a ring that changes the metal the band is made of depending on the city the wearer is in. The wearer can summon a map of the city or town that the wearer is in.
    Spiked Ring: a +2 steel ring with spikes covered around the ring. Puttong on the ring deals 4d4 piercing damage. Once attuned to the ring grants the wearer resistance to piercing damage.
    Ring of Jaq: a +1 purple band ring with dwarven runes carved into it. Once attuned to the wearer becomes immune to poisoning and has advantage on constitution and charisma saving throws.
    Ring of Lightning: a glass ring with lightning trapped inside of the band. the ring has 6 charges. The wearer can expend one charge to cast absorb element, two charges for thunderclap, or three charges for either lightning bolt or thunderstep.
    Ring of Displacement: as a reaction after an enemy has hit, you may use this rings charge to swap places with one other creature. If the creature is willing it happens instantaneously, but if its not, it must first succeed on a wisdom saving throw of dc 15. This ring has one charge and recharges daily at dawn.
    Ring of Freshwater: a +1 blue porcelain ring that when touched to saltwater transmutes it into freshwater. The rings effects do not work on bodies of water larger than 100 feet in diameter.
    Ring of Saltwater: a +1 blue porcelain ring that when touched to freshwater transmutes it into saltwater. The rings effects do not work on bodies of water larger than 100 feet in diameter.
    Invisible Ring: This ring is impossible to find unless you have an ability to see invisible things. When worn, it looks like the wearer is missing the finger the ring is on.
    Ring of The Woodcarver: a mahogany ring with a ruby gem that once attuned to grants the wearer a +5 to woodcarving.
    Ring of Sylvanus: a +1 ring with an emerald band that once attuned to grants the wearer the ability to speak to plants. The wearee can also regenerate 1d6 hit points every hour tgey are in sunlight.
    Holy Ward of The Templar: a +2 red and white steel ring that grants the wearer advantage on initiative rolls.
    Great Leviathans Eyes: a red leather ring that grants the wearer +2 perception, an additional 30 feet of darkvision, and the ability to sense any fiends in a 60 foot radius.
    Ring of Freshness: a golden ring with a pink diamond carved into a heart shape. Once attuned the wearee gains a +2 charisma and always smells wonderful.
    Ring of illusion: a ring that looks platinum with a diamond gem. The ring is actually a regular tarnished copper ring disguised as something more valuable.
    Ring of Autumn: a mahogany ring with an orange gem carved into a leaf on it. The ring when touched to a tree will turn all of it's leaves red orange and brown.
    Ring of The Professor: a white marble band that once attuned to gives the wearer +2 intelligence and the ability to calculate numbers with precision.
    Ring of The Thief: a cast iron ring with runes scratched on it. the wearer has advantage on all slight of hand checks
    Rangers Ring: an elvenwood ring that his glowing elven runes written on it. Once attuned all ranged attacks gain a 1d6 to damage rolls and all bolts or arrows become replenished if the attack hits.
    Ring of Arthur: a +2 golden ring studded with rubies. Once attuned the wearer gains a +1 to attack rolls and can counterspell a spell that is an abjuration spells at level 5 or lower a number of times a day equal to the wearers intelligence modifier to a minimum of 1.
    Barbers Ring: a porcelain blue and red ring that can summon a pair of scissors at will.
    Ring of kinetic storage: During combat, this ring stores the kinetic energy of all your attacks both hits and misses. Each hit adds 1 charge and each miss adds 3 charges for a max of 20 charges. On a hit after making an attack (spell attack or melee) you may consume any increment of 5 (5,10,15 or 20) charges and add that number as force damage in addition to your damage roll. Alternatively, you may make an unarmed strike as a bonus action and add the force damage on a hit.
    Ring of Mage Sight: a ring that once attuned to grants the wearer a +1 on all saving throws and the wearer can cast detect magic 3 times a day.
    Ring of Air: a silver band with and a smoothed stone. When knocked prone a gust of wind immediately picks the wearer back up on their feet making the wearer immune to being knocked prone.
    Ring of Safe Passage: These rings vary widely in their appearance. Each of these rings is attuned to a specific place. The wearer can safely pass through any area the ring is keyed to without setting off any magical traps or wards. Any magical guardians will treat the wearer as if they are guest of the rightful owner. The ring will also unlock specific magically locked doors.
    Ring Golem: Upon command the ring unfolds itself into a tiny 3 inch tall golem. It's strong enough to carry about 1 pound. It's uses may require some imagination like "crawl inside that lock an unlock it from the inside".
    The Pilgrims Knowledge: a copper ring that once attuned to grants the wearer +2 intelligence and gives the wearer the ability to know the name of any creature they see.
    Ring of The Farmer: a copper ring that once attuned to grants the wearer +2 wisdom and proficiency in survival. The ring when touched to soil makes the soil very fertile.
    Ring of Gluttony: a thick iron band that once attuned grants the wearer +2 constitution and advantage on all constitution saving throws, however, every day the ring is worn the wearer gains 2d6 pounds and requires twice the amount of food and water.
    Ring of The Imprisoned One: a +2 ring made out of a mysterious glowing yellow material. Once attuned to the wearer can choose to replace their movement speed for teleportation equal to their movement speed.
    Ring of The Dark Count: a black and red ring with a ruby gem that can cast bestie curse once a day.
    Ring of Divine Invisibility: a golden and silver ring. Once worn celestial and fiend creatures cannot see the wearer.
    Ring of Necromancy: a +1 ring that grants the wearer immunity to necrotic damage and allows the wearer the option to replace any bludgeoning, piercing, and slashing damage with necrotic damage.
    Ring of the Windweaver: While attuned to this ring of twisted platinum wire, you may expend the ring's seven charges to create the following effects. The DC for any saving throw is 15, and the ring regains 1d6+1 charges daily at dawn. Updraft (2 charges) You cast levitate, targeting one creature within 120 feet of you and requiring no concentration. Alternatively, you cast feather fall, with a range of 120 feet and requiring no concentration. Downdraft (1 charge) A creature of your choice within 120 feet of you can't jump for 1 minute unless it passes a Strength check. If the creature is flying, it is forced down at 60 feet per round unless it passes the check, landing safely if it hits the ground. Tailwind (2 charges) One creature within 120 feet of you may Dash as a bonus action for 1 minute. You may target additional creatures by spending 1 charge per creature. Wind Spear (3 charges) Lashing out with a gust of violent air, you create a line up to 120 feet long and 5 feet wide, originating from you. It deals 3d6 bludgeoning damage to all creatures in the line, with a DEX save for half damage. Gale (4 charges) You create a sphere of turbulent wind with a radius of 20 feet within 120 feet of you. This area counts as difficult terrain, and a creature that enters the area for the first time on its turn or starts its turn there takes 1d6 bludgeoning damage. The sphere lasts for 1 minute. Hurricane (7 charges) A 120 foot wide, 40 foot tall cylinder centered on you is filled with a raging storm. Creatures in the area and take 3d6 bludgeoning damage when they enter the area for the first time on their turn or start their turn there. When moving in the area, a creature must pass a Strength check or be forced to move in a circle around you (clockwise or anticlockwise, determined when you use the ring. You and up to 6 other creatures of your choice are immune to these effects.
    Ring of The Weave-spinning Warrior: A +3 ring made by a powerful evocation wizard, a war cleric, and a solar. The ring is made of pure diamond and has a crystal filled with diamond dust. The ring has one charge and the charge replenishes every week. When the wearer casts a spell the wearer can choose the expend one charge to double the damage of the spell being casted. One the charge is used the wearer gains exhaustion levels equal to the spell level -1 divided by two.

street encounters
    A homeless urchin approaches the party and claims that he used to be a great magician. He says that if the party were to give him a gold piece, he could make one of them disappear. The urchin has a teleportation sigil on the ground in front of him that is incredibly difficult to see and only activates with his command word, which happens to be 'PRESTO!'. The character standing on the sigil is teleported to an alleyway 3 blocks down the road, into a trash pile. [/u/dndspeak]
    Three semi-attractive ladies boldly harass a PC saying that s/he slept with all three of them. Creating a diversion for a pickpocket to snagged the purse of the PC's while they are distracted by the ladies. Once the pickpocket is gone they apologize and say that the PC looks like someone they know. [/u/Austiniuliano]
    Down the street, a person is being chased by the city guard. The guard are yelling for the thief to stop. As the thief gets close a 2nd thief causes a distraction to the guard such as overturning a wagon full of manure. The pair of thieves round the corner close to the PCs. what do the PC's do? [/u/Austiniuliano]
    As you pass an alleyway, a male goblin rushes out frantically and flags down your group. “Help, help, my wife is giving birth! Please, someone help us!” You look past him into the alley, and sure enough, there is a pregnant goblin grimacing and bracing herself against a crate. You get to name their firstborn if you help out, and the father will buy your party a round of drinks at the tavern he works at. [/u/ASzinhaz]
    A charlatan offers to give a party member some fancy jewelry to advertise their business. Little did they know this jewelry has a scrying enchantment and will be used to see where the party is staying and how well defended they are and rob them that night. [/u/11110000110011]
    Roll a DC 15 Dexterity check to not get hit with the contents of an emptied chamberpot. If anyone in the party fails the check, the party rolls all Charisma checks at a disadvantage until the unlucky ones take a proper bath. [/u/ASzinhaz]
    You see an older man yelling at his apprentice for making some mistake. The apprentice seems near tears because he's trying to explain himself but can't get a word in edgewise. [/u/jheiner227]
    You are walking down the street when you are bumped violently aside, but when you look for the perpetrator all you see is a stray cat which seems to part the crowd wherever it goes (It's actually a dragon casting major illusion to better mingle). [/u/callhimbob]
    A child with an obvious injury begging for money pleads to the party for money. Later that day the party sees the same kid running around playing tag. [/u/callhimbob]
    A shopper in the market starts going mad trying to bite the other patrons. Minutes later the shopper collapses with no memory of what happened. (In my game the person had been possessed by an animal spirit) [/u/callhimbob]
    The party comes upon an ongoing street performance of a popular play. It's an enjoyable show, until the actors start looking for members in the audience to call on stage (whether that's because they're malicious or they pick the most socially awkward member of the part) [/u/callhimbob]
    A group of miners are protesting outside of a noble's estate over poor working conditions [/u/callhimbob]
    A gaggle of students run up to the party and demand that the oddball (genasi, orc, kenku, etc...) come back to the university with them so they can win the scavenger hunt they're competing in [/u/callhimbob]
    You come across 4 old men sitting and playing cards. If you want to join, they let you, but because this is what they do with their lives, they are very good. [/u/jheiner227]
    You see a man/woman locked away in a prison cairrage, they beckon to you they are innocent and will compensate you handsomely should you aid in their escape. [/u/Oniguumo]
    A street performer is making music, hoping that people will pay him. If he's very good, there's a large crowd. If he's bad, people walk by, averting their eyes. If the party is musical, he's happy to perform together and split the take. He may not be honest about the split, though. [/u/jheiner227]
    A friendly looking man in light brown robes approaches the party. He is surrounded by 7 golden birds. He offers to read the fortune of the party in exchange for enough coin to buy a meal and bed for the night (I usually use 5 GP). If they acquiesce, he asks them to ask a question and he answers using the Divination spell. A successful perception check (DC 15, ARC skill of +5 or higher automatically succeeds) will reveal that he hasn't actually cast any spell, but his answers are always truthful. Once he is out of sight of the party, he disappears. [/u/[deleted]]
    A homeless man/woman approaches begging for food and or shelter for the evening. Party agrees, they'll wake up and a large sum of money sits by them but he or she is gone. If they refuse, then days later they hear in the news a man shown kindness in a person's time of need. Billionaire gives man money. [/u/SychsisOPhrenia]
    A raving madwoman stops everyone she sees, telling the story of how she was the mistress of the Mayor or King. Her mind is broken and her speech is rambling, but the stories she tells are very consistant and convincing. [/u/Alphachicken]
    A voice calls out from a darkened alleyway, it sounds in distress, but is quickly muffled. [/u/Kiyohara]
    The cobble pavement collapses in a major street revealing a dungeon (or unknown sewer beneath. In a short period of time a large portion of the city guard will come to inspect and clear crowds. A single old crippled man will climb from within the hole and collapse once he reaches the light [/u/mechanical_banana42]
    A parade blocks traffic while many people stop what they are doing to watch. [/u/Kiyohara]
    A circus strongman flexes and struts in a chalk ring. A halfling barker stands on a soap box, challenging anyone walking by to test their mettle against the steel thews of Kourteous the Mighty, Terror of the Ring! Best out of three clinches wins. [/u/nlitherl]
    A very large wild animal calmly walks down the street. People run away and shout, but the beast seems uninterested in them. [/u/Kiyohara]
    A merchant offers the exact same items the party already owns, but if they buy anything they will find the exact object missing from there bag. If confronted about it, the merchant will flee leaving the party with all the items, but there bags are empty (they have one of each item again). The players can buy and keep two of any item by taking it out of there backpack and holding it while buying the duplicate. [/u/Sappique]
    Several acrobats occupy a part of the street and display great skill and dexterity in their movements and contortions. [/u/Kiyohara]
    A tower full of boiling molasses/oil/etc groans and collapses from atop the roof of a local apothecary/wizard. Any caught in the rushing wave of scorching liquid stand to have the flesh melted from their very bones! [/u/revderrick]
    The doors to a brewery explode open and thousands of gallons of beer rush out and swamp the streets. Many townsfolk quickly gather buckets, pitchers, and other containers and start scooping up what they can. [/u/Kiyohara]
    Two gentlemen or women, surrounded by guards seem to be getting into a bit of a fight. They're yelling loudly and making convincing swings at each other. They position themselves, and as one swings with all his/her might, the other ducks, and they manage to knock over one of the guards, dashing out of the circle as quickly as possible. As they pass your party, one of them tosses you a mysterious object as they pass. Along with the object is a hastily scribbled note that reads, "MIDNIGHT, <name of landmark in your city>, MEET". [/u/TheDirtyDeal]
    Two merchants stand nose to nose screaming at each other, their carts are intertwined and they are blocking traffic. Their horses seem to be nonplussed and nibble at nearby grass. [/u/Kiyohara]
    You find a potion seller that had all the labels to his potions torn of in the middle of the night by a trickster rouge that has been terrorizing the city in recent weeks. To make matters worse, due to the "discrete" nature his clientele, all of the potions have been bewitched so they are immune to the use of an Identify spell. He is desperately trying to sell the rest of his unusable stock at a discount to anybody passing by. Each potion is 20gp or comes in bulk packs of 12 for 200gp. Roll a d20 to determine what the potion is. 1| Sorcerer Spirit: A random magic effect from the wild magic surge table occurs. If a Wild Magic sorcerer drinks the potion, roll twice on the table 2| Chug Jug: Gain 4d10 temporary hit points for 1 hour 3| Potion of speed 4| Potion of sluggishness: instantly grants 2 ranks of exhaustion 5| Potion of resistance (resistance chosen randomly) 6| Potion of vulnerability: works identically to potion of resistance, but grants vulnerability instead of resistance 7| Temperance Tonic: makes all alcohol consumed for the next 1d4 days taste vile 8| A non-magical sugary carbonated drink 9| Potion of healing 10| Potion of Poison 11| Potion of Growth 12| Potion of Diminution 13| Potion of Animal Friendship 13| Potion of Animal Hatred: All undomesticated animals are hostile on sight for one hour Perfume. Smells nice, tastes horrible 14| Holy water 15| Unholy water (all healing magic is half as effective for the next hour) 16| Dragon pepper hot sauce: Make a DC 17 Constitution check. On a failure, the user is incapacitated for 1 hour. On a success, the user gains a fire breath weapon attack for 1 hour. Any character with resistance to fire automatically succeeds on the check 17| Discount potion of water breathing: Works like a regular potion of water breathing, but removes user's ability to breathe air for the duration. Lasts one hour. 18| Cheap whiskey [/u/Jacknerik]
    A man runs by, screaming, seemingly battling an large octopus that has latched itself to his head and is spraying ink everywhere. No one recognizes the man and fewer know where one could find a large octopus. [/u/Kiyohara]
    You bump into a figure in a sharp travelers cloak. The figure either places a magic item in your pocket that is being hunted by the town guards or the figure steals a magic item from you and runs. Upon finding the figure either way you come to learn they are a royalty among the criminal underworld and want to hire you for their next big score. [/u/TaleBinder]
    A skilled bard is performing in a local noble's garden. The sounds can be heard clearly outside and a small crowd of passers by has stopped to appreciate. The Noble's guards are debating if they can/should disperse the crowd. [/u/Kiyohara]
    The party hears an alarm bell ringing loudly a few blocks out of sight, which is quickly picked up other alarm bells around the city. Large flagpoles around the party's section of the city of quickly raise up orange flags, and a general call of "code orange" is taken up by everyone nearby as citizens rapidly pack up stalls and evacuate the streets with practiced ease. The ground begins to tremble by the time all nearby citizens are tucked into alleys or taking shelter indoors, and within seconds of the street clearing, a stampede of brightly colored oxen round a corner and barrel down the party's street. If the party has taken shelter, they are trapped where they are for the next 30 seconds as the small flood of animals passes by them, after which the locals quickly go about setting up shop as if nothing had happened. If the party is in the path of the oxen, they take 3d6 bludgeoning damage and are dragged 40 feet in the direction of the stampede for each turn that they remain in it, with the stampede counting as difficult terrain in any area it occupies. If the party manage to get someone to explain the situation, it is revealed a powerful but unstable sorcerer named Wizbo often conducts strange "experiments" in his "wizard tower", and that the particular section of the city he belongs to has adapted and developed a warning system to alert the locals to incoming magical shenanigans. In this case, a code orange indicates actual potential danger and advises citizens to clear the streets and take shelter indoors until the alarm has passed. [/u/ThePragmaticPimp]
    A local baker has created a new type of baked good and is giving samples to everyone. From the sounds of appreciation, it is quite good and there is already a line to both try the food and to enter the store. [/u/Kiyohara]
    Some of the citizens are exchanging messages in thieves cant. Messages like “it begins in 30 minutes” and “get in position”. 50% chance it’s a daring heist and 50% chance it’s a flash mob. [/u/Patergia]
    A horse, saddled and with a large pack slowly ambles down the street, the stays and ties having clearly been broken. Surely the owner will want it back. [/u/Kiyohara]
    The Laughing Prince, a controversial thief, has been captured. Half of the populace think he's a hero of the people; the other half think he's a ruthless cutthroat. His public execution is scheduled for midday in the town square, and the crowd on both sides is getting increasingly reckless and ugly... [/u/Courtholomew]
    Several guardsmen can be seen checking strangers to see if they paid their gate tax or if they are residents. Most people seem to have a piece of paper indicating one or the other. [/u/Kiyohara]
    A fire has broken out in the Market District, and is growing fast. The party can work to put out the fire, can try to alleviate the panic, or perhaps try to pick up some abandoned items for a *substantial* discount... [/u/Courtholomew]
    A well dressed man accompanied by two rough looking guards is politely inquiring if anyone has paid the Thieves's Guild Tax and if they need to renew their licenses. As soon as he spots the party, he smiles widely and approaches. [/u/Kiyohara]
    It's the Regent's/Mayor's birthday and the streets are awash with celebrations. An amiable man wearing the city colours and crest persuades (DC15 CHAR) the party to go on a discounted city tour (subsidised by the city council) of some of its less famous sites with his colleague sat in the box-seat of an elegant carriage. It is in fact a dodgy scheme to eek money out of travellers. The coachman venerates the cities beautiful attractions, recklessly hurtling the rig through the foot traffic. He deposits you at the first stop. A temple. Here a weasely monk attempts to persuade (DC10 CHAR) the party to generously donate to the temple and depart with earthly possessions. The coachman will be very encouraging and optimistic about the next stop being enticing, and is according to the coachman a renowned tailors. In the dingy shop a short scowling man will stalk the players as they browse the store, seizing any opportunity to try and convince them to buy his garments. At this point the players will have little sense of where they are without some means of navigation. The coachmen is adamant that the last stop will make it all worth it. The final stop from the outside appears to be a theatre with elaborate decorations and promotions. An attractive host recieves them at the doors, and leads them down a dimly lit hall, through another set of doors and into an empty auditorium. She tells them to take a seat at the front by the stage before retreating to the double doors and locking them. (2d8+3) thugs rise from the concessions stands with loaded crossbows aimed at the players heads, and the amiable man strides out on to the stage. He demands the party's valuables in exchange for their lives. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    One of the PCs trips over something in the street.Reaching down they find a coin purse, heavy and clinking. Just then an angry voice bellows, "My money! I've been robbed!" The crowd steps back and a well dressed noble points to the party and screams, "Thieves!" [/u/Kiyohara]
    A frail looking stray cat follows you no matter where you go in town, the cat seemingly following you with intent [/u/forgoten_mad_man]
    A cloaked figure ask's where the local library is. You can hear the muffled sounds of chewing paper while he talks. And in his wake he leaves shreds of pages. [/u/KeenanAXQuinn]
    A loud, colorful troupe of dwarves enter the city square; they pitch a tent and within a few hours, they announce that the traveling unarmed fight championship will be held - all who deem themselves worthy can try and earn a goblet full of gems and honor, for a small fee. Inside, a large, wooden octagonal platform sits on the center stage... but there is a trick: it stands a few feet above the ground, balancing and tilting on a stout pole on its center, and a ring-out is an immediate disqualification. The tricky dwarven fighters have specialized on pushing off opponents as soon as they enter, and those who are hardier and can hold their ground and reach the finals find that the surface starts to spin, using centrifugal force to slide them off (the champion, of course, doesn't even try to fight and just holds to the post) [/u/VaranusNiloticus]
    A group of city guards are clustered around the entrance to an alleyway. They look concerned and serious. One guard exits the alleyway, and abruptly bends over and vomits with gusto all over the pavement. If any approach, they are waved away — "Nothing to see here. Go about your business." [/u/garumoo]
    A sign outside a shop selling manuscripts is crooked and jutting out into your path. If straightened or moved, a shelf of books falls over, knocking over another shelf of small paintings. Four servant boys appear in fresh finery. In the distance, the wail of a siren. [/u/garumoo]
    In a nearby back alley, an observant party member spots a lone cur, that whimpers and withdraws deeper into shadow. With skill checks, a player approaches to find:A hungry stray grateful for a bite, that reveals a secret tunnel it uses to navigate the city. Or the hungry "cur" is companion to a Ranger, judging by the collar he wears. Another Ranger can communicate with him, following him to an injured/dead/captured fellow ranger.The "cur" is a formidable hound badly treated by his owner. It might be a wealthy arrogant merchant, an animal handler in a traveling circus, etc. The hound can become a follower/familiar/companion. [/u/NorthEasternNomad]
    A nearby building explodes and trees rapidly grow from the rubble. Bystanders explain that this is the third attack like this in a month, and that they are the work of an anarchist collective of druids that believe cities are blasphemy upon nature. [/u/Jacknerik]
    Near the wizard's college is a stand selling ice cream. Occasionally, the bound elemental keeping it coll will try to break free, causing the cart to shake. The bored teenage girl running the stand takes no notice of this. [/u/911roofer]
    A miniature stage is set up on the side of a street, within it, small illusions tell the story of great adventures slaying a beast like a magical puppet show. A crowd of children sit on the floor in fron of this and adults stand a little further behind. When it ends, all the kids run off to wherever they're going, and a member of the party feels their purse get a little lighter in the commotion [/u/BobaPhobic]
    A child runs up to you and tries to sneakily stab you. •Her eyes pierce through her long black hair that covers her face. This little girl stares at you. You can feel an evil and malicious presence. [/u/BeboTheMaster]
    A doll or easel falls from a nearby multi-story building and nearly lands on the head of someone in the party! Anyone who looks at it feels a faint sense of unease, but it also looks expensive and valuable. You can hear an argument from the loft whose window it seemed to have dropped out of, and soon enough someone will lean out of it and ask the party if they can bring it upstairs, since they aren't finished with their artwork. If pressed, the artist says that he has other matters to attend to and can't come downstairs, but it's urgent that he get that piece back and soon. Is he just rude and bad at interacting with other people? Is he afraid of the outside? Is he in danger, or is he luring the party into some kind of trap? Will he even reward the party for giving him his work back? It's up to the DM. [/u/archDeaconstructor]
    1d4+1 Students of the nearby wizarding academy try out their newly learned spells in the alleyway and accidentaly a firebolt hits the party members. [/u/AdmiralCita]
    A man with a strange accent whose clothes incorporate the bones of animals is convincing nearby townsfolk to join him on a hunt on the morrow. Given the way that people are talking about him, he seems to be very convincing and jovial. He's just finished talking to a couple down the street, and he's eyed your party. He seems to be headed your way! [/u/archDeaconstructor]
    2d6 of friendly drunken hobbits ask the party to join their celebration of their newborn family member. They offeer good ale and raspberry flavoured tobacco.qq [/u/AdmiralCita]
    A bald man in robes is busy eating from a plate while also kickboxing a couple of brawny-looking folks in the regalia of the city guard. He seems to be making a fool of them. Given the crowd of onlookers, you're not sure if this is some kind of performance or just a hilariously failed attempt by the guard to arrest this man. [/u/archDeaconstructor]
    3d6 of spectral butterflies briefly circle around a party member with the highest wisdom and then fly away. People say it brings good luck, but noone knows. [/u/AdmiralCita]
    A famous, beloved explorer will be delivering new relics to the local museum or gallery, and wants to unveil them all in a brand new wing of the building in a few days. One of the menial guilds has backed out on contract, though, so she's short on manpower to actually set everything up and guard the exhibition until opening day. If you're interested, she's hiring- and she'll pay handsomely. Suspiciously handsomely, for menial work. [/u/archDeaconstructor]
    Random friendly dog happily brings a leather pouch containing 1d6 silver pieces and 1d4 human fingers. [/u/AdmiralCita]
    You come across several guardsmen hoisting a large battering ram so they can heave it against a gate. It seems the city official whose mansion is behind that gate is unwilling to leave- not only are the gates barred, but the window drapes are drawn down, and the doors are bolted shut. They were supposed to show up for an important meeting yesterday, and were going to make a speech today, but no one's heard anything from anyone inside. Most of the locals are worried- though some seem to be happy about it. [/u/archDeaconstructor]
    The players hear humming coming from underneath a manhole cover. If they open said manhole cover, they find a male gnome with a monocle and a top hat. He explains that he was trapped down there in a storm and that the manhole cover is a portal to a different realm. If the players walk into it, they end up in limbo. [/u/ThatMedian]
    A man in beggars robes appears. 7 tiny canaries with him. He asks the players to spare some food or coin. He is actually Bahamut in human form. If they help him, he grants them his blessing. They have advantage on WIS rolls for the next hour. If they don’t he moves along. If they attack the canaries become Wyvern. After players are subdued Bahamut gives them a lecture on justice and charity. [/u/BraveEagle]
    A city-guard is busy giving a lecture to a newbie. They use the players as an example, either positively or negatively, depending on their status in the city's eyes. For example: "Stop and Frisk" if the party are scofflaws, or "Soliciting Bribe" if the setting is somewhat fascist or corrupt. If the city views the players positively, the interaction is along the lines of "Did you see that ludicrous display last night? (Sports)" or "Good day, Squire" or something germaine to the overall plot. ("You be safe out there, I hear the masked bandit has struck again!") It could also be used as a way for the guards to deliver an message/invitation to the players: "Stop by the Station, the Lieutenant would like a word with ye". In an espionage campaign, the Player-Guard interaction may be used to communicate with the team secretly; falsely arresting and then slipping a message, or dragging in to talk in a theatrical manner. It could also be used as an intimidation tactic by a well connected political figure who controls the guards and has made enemies of the players... ("This is a message! *smash!*") [/u/MaxSizeIs]
    A gaggle of urchins hurries through the crowd city streets towards the party. One of them makes eye contact, before hurrying past and heading a round a corner. The city guard pushes their way forward asking everyone if they saw which way the kids went. [/u/Tounsley]
    The noonday bells only chimes twice before the rope holding the bell snaps and it plummets down the steeple, landing with a resounding gong, blowing the temples door open, and making many townsfolk believe there is devilry afoot. [/u/Tounsley]
    While walking by the stocks, one of the prisoners recognizes someone from the party, and asks a favour. Could be something as simple as scratching an itch they can't reach themselves, or perhaps something more involved, [/u/Tounsley]
    A intelligent huge mimic on a sturdy roof top of a one story building with other several buildings snug down on both sides. The mimic mainly stays on the edge of the roof draping a part of itself down the side of the tight alley side outside wall. It forms itself as a wet metal ladder. As an added incentive the mimic drops coins from pervious victims a few at a time to bait its ladder. When someone graps hold of the ladder (both hands and a foot hold), the mimic exudes its adhesive and grapples by rolling up its ladder/self at the same time. The mimic eats atop the roof. [/u/jjskellie]
    A woman is being attacked by thugs. If you ignore her cries for help she gets taken away. If you help her she takes you to her home where she and her sisters reveal themselves as succubi and try to kill you [/u/LordoftheFaff]
    You see a drunkard stumbling about. He greets your PCs in a friendly if overly affectionate manner before shuffling off singing at the top of his lungs. [/u/Sobek6]
    There is a striped carriage with the number 53 on the side that is someone moving uncontrollably without any houses (or driver for more modern RPG). [/u/need-original-name]
    A War-priest with a flaming sword steps in your way. He's limping and looks beaten up but holds himself proudly. "So here it ends." he speaks as a bewildered look slowly enters his face. "You're not them. I'm very sorry, please go along." [/u/MerionLial]
    A small critter (of the DM's choice) appears to be causing chaos, as everywhere it scampers people flee in horror.[/u/Ever_Impetuous]
    You stumble upon an alleyway chat and discover one stall in a nearby busy market is rigged to detonate in a Fireball when a specific noble approaches. [/u/Ever_Impetuous]
    You step in some viscous green goo... and it slithers away from you into a nearby sewer grate. The ground rumbles.[/u/Ever_Impetuous]
    The street is literally alive. This part of the city was built over a large Earth Elemental but it doesn't seem bothered to carry people to their destinations. However, it decides to block the adventurers from entering the street. [/u/Ever_Impetuous]
    A bird plummets from the sky right on a party member's head (1d4 physical). There is an arrow right through it... and a missive attached to its back. Someone didn't want this getting to its destination [/u/Ever_Impetuous]
    A street magician decides to turn your party's most anger-prone member into a joke. He uses prestidigitation to cover them in slick oil, change the color of their hair, and untie their shoelaces, all while mocking them.[/u/Ever_Impetuous]
    A piano crashes down 1d4 meters away from a party member. It must have been pushed off the balcony of that nearby building. But who would toss a piano out of a balcony?[/u/Ever_Impetuous]
    A person explodes in a gout of fire. Then 2 more nearby. A creature is possessing these victims before they ignite. Then the creature turns on the players! It could be that the victims (or at least one of them) are connected somehow. Are there more victims throughout the city? It's clear that the heroes must find this out before it happens again! [/u/MaxSizeIs]
    Household "Otto-Servant" warforged automatons have recently become a trend among the well to do. Their inventor sends a message to the players asking for help using an unassuming middleman as as a messenger. It seems the inventor fears for their life, as they narrowly escaped a lethal attack by one of their inventions! Tales of similar attacks spread like wildfire the following days - copycat attacks seem to be happening! Can the players protect the life of the inventor, and discover the conspiracy behind the attacks? [/u/MaxSizeIs]
    A rag-picker with his towering cart of discards rushes into your path. They stumble on a cobblestone, bringing the entire trolley crashing down on the street. You see glints amongst the strewn linen and furs ... [/u/ArtyNinja]
    A promoter catches sight of the party and seizes the opportunity. Each player must take a DC 10 CHA check or have a wrist-band for the all new bar 'The Whore's Shoe'. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    A throng of protestors block the road, bearing banners with slogans such as "Ditch the Witch" and "The hag's a hack". The leaders of the group, a human druid in am impressive headdress, and a dwarf Bard with a powerful voice are getting the frustrated crowd riled up with a powerful speech about the decadence, intransigence and failures of the powers that be. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    A few guards march past with a scrawny street urchin in tow. The child is manacled and clearly in pain. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    An unkempt mage is staring at a lamp-post, seemingly transfixed. He stands with a relaxed posture and smells of ozone.[/u/ArtyNinja]
    You spot a fruit seller dragging a cart through a solid wall and vanish. Inspecting the wall it appears to just be the solid outer wall of a general store.[/u/ArtyNinja]
    A street artist is making portraits for a reasonable price. The images seem to have a life of their own, with the faces smiling and winking at passers by. Some complete examples on the flagstones around him showing detailed backgrounds and activity but no actual muse. None the less the frames have the 'depicted' individuals name painted in gold letters. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    3 drunk students from the mages college are causing a ruckus in the street, causing hijinks and hilarity with their cantrips. One of them takes issue with the PCs, mistaking them for a reviled enemy. The gang tries to assert their dominance, and challenges the enemy and their 'minions' to a fight. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    A pack of (2d4 +2) rabid dogs bursts from an alley , directly in the path of the party. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    A chieftain born aloft on his vast shield by the shoulders of four tattooed warriors is rushed through the crowd, tailed by a Dwarf with a winged helm and a Goliath in striped pantaloons. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    A man in long white stockings with a glamorous golden quiff and accompanied by a small white dog disturbs the party to ask them if a hairy man with a black beard wearing a tricorne hat has been through here. Apparently the man has stolen something very dear to him and must be found at once.. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    A masked figure in a billowing black cloak leaps across the street from one rooftop to another. Their polished black mail gleams in the light. A smaller figure in a colourful leather jerkin with a quarterstaff strapped to their back jumps after him. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    You walk past an elite's compound as an angsty looking teenager emerges from a side-gate. They glance at the players and slouches off. After a minute or so banshee like screams emerge from the building... [/u/ArtyNinja]
    A building is being demolished on the street. The wrecking crew are on a break. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    A panicked crowd stampedes down the street. In the havoc you see innocents stumble and be crushed by the terrified crowd. Through the wails and screams you can hear one word: Giant. [/u/ArtyNinja]
    A sewer collapses into a sinkhole during heavy rains. Half of a neighborhood is now thirty feet underground. In a poor one: many people may be trapped beneath the rubble and possibly drowning.. but only a few heroes care enough to try and save the victims. Will those greedy land-developers get their way and clear out those dirty poor people once and for all? Was this part of a planned attack? In a wealthier neighborhood: a few gold-pieces and trinkets hint that the sinkhole may hide a treasure cache; a wealthy noble might mourn the loss of their precious object-d'art and pay the heroes to delve the hole to retrieve it. Anywhere: a small horde of 3d6 low-level semi-intelligent sewer monsters emerge, shouting abuse at the "sky-demons" who just invaded their home; swarms of vermin; slip-and-slides; and a labyrinthian network of secret tunnels! [/u/MaxSizeIs]
    A drug addict pleads for money from the players. He is suffering from the shakes, with his eyes darting in separate directions. He stammers unintelligibly in a hoarse voice, wringing his hands desperately. If the players don't help him out, it is revealed the addict is possessed by a Shadow Demon. He has the same stats as a commoner with +2 to DEX, INT, and CHA. He has the same resistances, immunities, vulnerabilities and abilities as a Shadow, and knows the spell Deeper Darkness and Shadow Evocation. [/u/ArtyNinja]

rumor mill
    have you heard that 
        The king.
        The queen.
        The local miller.
        The local blacksmith.
        A retired adventurer.
        A famous assassin.
        An influential guildmaster.
        The mayor.
        An up-and-coming young knight.
        The high priest of Bhaal.
        A powerful Drow Matron.
        A wicked wizard.
        The Knight-Lord of a local order of Paladins.
        Strahd von Zarovich.
        A militant emperor in the West.
        A dragon-tamer in the mountains.
        The local dragon.
        An Orc warlord.
        One of the party members.
        An ancient pharaoh.
        A popular gladiator.
        A teamster who is a local legend for reckless driving.
        The crown prince.
        A master alchemist.
        A high-ranking Hobgoblin commander.
        An elven sage.
        The duchess.
        The duke.
        The local priest.
        An eccentric inventor.
        The town lunatic.
        A notorious pirate captain.
        A travelling monk.
        A famous mystic.
        The housekeeper of a local hostel.
        A Viking king.
        The Great Chief of Ogres.
        A famous trap-maker.
        An influential politician.
        The town beggar.
        The Princess.
        A newly-appointed Lady Knight of the region.
        A newly-appointed Lord Knight of the region.
        The Caesar of Minotaurs.
        The local weaponsmith.
        The BBEG.
        The mysterious man with a long, silver beard and a ragged black cloak.
        The mysterious woman with long, silver hair and an old-fashioned scarlet cloak.
        The local tobacco merchant.
        The kingpin of a crime ring.
        The head of a Tarrasque-worshiping cult.
        A vicious Manticore baron.
        A highly sought-after tailor.
        A highly sough-after baker.
        A highly sought-after physician.
        Every gravedigger in the entire region.
        The king's two-year-old son.
        A kuo-toa diplomat.
        The Bloodlord of Vampires.
        A necromancer.
        The court magician.
        A boatman on the local river.
        A mason building the king's new palace.
        A great athlete.
        The head of a not-so-secret society.
        The local innkeeper.
        A zombie who was voted in as townmaster.
        An Elvish king.
        The Lord of a druidic circle.
        The new 8-year-old king.
        A famous painter.
        One of the PCs' mentor.
        A famous evangelist.
        A Gorgon beauty guru.
        The yuan-ti God-King.
        A powerful Unseelie Fey.
        A goblin warlord.
        The editor of a local newspaper.
        The game warden.
        The king's butler.
        A renowned golem-building wizard.
        A great General.
        A local veteran and war hero.
        A folk-music writer.
        The street-lamp lighter.
        The street sweeper.
        The chimney-sweep.
        The harsh boss of a local factory.
        A far-sailing explorer, back in town after an expedition.
        A local archaeologist.
        The Witchfinder General.
        The Protector Angel of the nearest large city.
        A powerful Seelie Fey.
        The Iron Emperor of Dwarves.
        The Erlking of a local band of monster-hunters.
        A fashion icon.
        The Grand Duke of the Society for the Preservation of Gnomish Vocabulistics and Grammar.
        A famous daredevil.
        The leader of a mostly harmless local cult.
        The leader of an extremely harmful local cult.

        Is disgusted by...
        Hates...
        Weeps tears of joy for...
        Breaks down laughing at the thought of...
        Is worryingly obsessed with...
        Spent all their money on...
        Has asked the Church to forbid...
        Has asked the Church to demand...
        Has formed a society based around...
        Has led an expedition to...
        Once enjoyed...
        Has recently picked up...
        Demands someone to explain to them what all the fuss is with...
        Has forbid the mere mention of...
        Commissioned several murals of...
        Sentenced convicts to....
        Named their new yacht....
        Disowned their child for the child's becoming addicted to...
        Is hopelessly addicted to...
        Has challenged any takers to a contest of...
        Has started a scandal by...
        Has completely ignored the issues of...
        Got drunk and admitted to...
        Firmly denies that they have ever...
        Is hosting a costume ball themed around...
        Suffers nightmares about...
        Wants advice on how to go about...
        Tossed someone out of a window for daring to malign...
        Hired bards to sing the praises of...
        Is trying to quit...
        Divorced their spouse to spend more time...
        Wandered into the desert with the intent of...
        Demanded that any honest man would never stoop to...
        Stole a carriage to go...
        Has paid people to stop...
        Has demanded, against ancient tradition, that they be allowed to...
        Carved a statue of themselves...
        Has never even tried...
        Is ignoring the obvious solution to their current problem, ....
        Gives up all hope for the world when they think about...
        Turns into a panda whenever they try...
        Has been cursed by a witch to ceaselessly wander through the forest, ...
        Loves their spouse, but more so, ...
        Used magic to make 100 people go...
        Got drunk and went...
        Spent all their inheritance on...
        Might start a war over...
        Tattooed themselves with scenes of...
        Ceaselessly talks about...
        Ran 40 miles so as not to be late for...
        Wears their finest clothes to...
        Believes in the Gods but more so in...
        Doesn't even understand...
        Pays good money for people to compete at ... for their amusement.
        Found an ancient urn, worth thousands, depicting...
        Insists that it is a genteel pursuit to...
        Is causing trouble for everyone by...
        Sees it as unseemly to...
        Frequently enjoys...
        Is enraged by...
        Is saddened by...
        Got sick while...
        Broke their foot while...
        Died while...
        Proposed to their true love whilst...
        Is terrified by the prospect of...
        Believes it is a grievous sin to...
        Nearly started a revolution while a nobleman was...
        Clapped a man in irons for trying to...
        Is only ever gladdened by...
        Fully intends to kill their rival, making it look like an accident that occurred while they were...
        Has changed their main pursuit to....
        Denies claims that they ever..., despite solid evidence.
        Has a long history in their family of...
        Was nearly assassinated while...
        Explodes with fury when others ask if they intend to...
        Is enchanted to slowly levitate into the sky should they ever try...
        Has ordered a local noble to stop...
        Is haunted by the ghosts of those who died such that they could...
        Has cured themselves of a terrible illness by simply...
        Arose from the grave when they heard their relatives were... instead of attending their funeral.
        Wrote long and vivid books on the subject of...
        Will not so much as get out of bed until they...
        Rises bright and early to...
        Trained several hawks for the purposes of...
        Breaks into song and dance randomly to distract people from their habit of...
        Says they would rather die than...
        Dreams of...
        Has no appetite on days when they haven't...
        Hired adventurers to...
        Hired a wizard to help them with...
        Built an entire facility dedicated to...
        Used slaves and prisoners for...
        Threw themselves into a lake after a long day of...
        Hosted a banquet in celebration of their successful quest of...
        Frequently boasts about how good they are at...
        Demands that nobody but themselves be allowed to...
        Prays to the gods for success in...
        Recommends that pregnant women try...
        irmly believes that .... is extremely classy and romantic.

        Hunting ogres.
        Digging pit traps.
        Minting gold pieces.
        Falling out of windows.
        Human sacrifice.
        Setting things on fire.
        Raiding small settlements.
        Eating pastries shaped like sacred icons.
        Swimming around in pools of oil.
        Riding horses.
        Painting pictures.
        Sabotaging other people's carriages.
        Hurling radishes at beggars.
        Stepping on people's toes.
        Doing nothing.
        Shutting up.
        Feeling confident.
        Running over small and fluffy animals.
        Tipping over Dominoes.
        Going on shopping sprees.
        Punching sacks of potatoes.
        Building elaborate but useless siege engines.
        Having rap-battles with pixies.
        Doing the conga.
        Convincing other people to do the conga.
        Building extremely comfortable couches.
        Building up an immunity to every kind of poison they can find.
        Studying vaccination.
        Learning how to fly.
        Burying dead bodies.
        Juggling swords.
        Juggling.
        Being a clown.
        Buying elaborate tricorn hats.
        Ringing people's doorbells and running away.
        Writing terrible books.
        Reading scandalous magazines.
        Praising themselves.
        Cow-tipping.
        Throwing china plates across rooms.
        Plating things with solid gold.
        Getting involved in tangled love-triangles.
        Awarding themselves trophies for things they never did.
        Giving long and elaborate speeches.
        Getting drunk.
        Getting high.
        Throwing knives at pictures of their enemies.
        Mixing fake blood in excessive quantities.
        Fighting Treants.
        Inventing new kinds of forks.
        Grave robbing.
        Burning down mansions.
        Writing speeches full of innuendos for pastors.
        Recycling old furniture.
        Playing war-games.
        Playing card games.
        Playing dice games.
        Making loaded dice.
        Starting bar fights.
        Making theatrical declarations of war against nonexistent countries.
        Completely ignoring real-world geography.
        Crashing the economy.
        Hurling cinder-blocks at passerby.
        Teaching Trolls calligraphy.
        Insulting Dragons.
        Writing dramatic Last Wills for themselves regarding fictitious deaths.
        Murdering people to start a murder-investigation romantic drama.
        Brooding on rooftops.
        Doing tuck-and-rolls into wedding ceremonies.
        Hiding treasures in local dungeons.
        Doing the Charleston at funerals.
        Starting moshpits at children's cello recitals.
        Headbanging to the church choir.
        Rolling themselves down hills.
        Giving excessive amounts of charity.
        Joining every secret society they can find.
        Doing somersaults when excited.
        Shooting people with crossbows.
        Designing a new national flag for their country every day, and sending it to the nobility for approval.
        Taming Mimics.
        Hitting people over the head with bar stools.
        Wearing cool cloaks.
        Spontaneously combusting.
        Drag-racing in carriages.
        Trying to ride Displacer Beasts.
        Trying to ride Owlbears.
        Jumping out at people from behind corners and shouting "Boo!"
        Rigging old castles to explode.
        Making silly faces at high-ranking clergy.
        Smoking far too many cigarettes than is advisable.
        Writing fake magazine articles describing wars between closely allied countries.
        Deep-frying books.
        Writing dictionaries of all 89 dialects of Abyssal.
        Pulling pranks.
        Breeding new horses.
        Conducting unethical scientific experiments.
        Building exact replicas of small villages, then demanding that all the villagers from that village move to the replica.
        Giving themselves ludicrous new titles.
        Carrying far too many canes.
        Carrying out exorcisms.

    but then again ... i heard that from 
        The local newspaper.
        The village idiot.
        The gods themselves.
        A giant demon.
        A local magistrate.
        The police chief.
        A drunk in a bar.
        An eerily sober man in a bar.
        The local miser.
        My grandmother's ghost.
        An insane prophet.
        A mercenary captain.
        A mermaid.
        A man who turned out to be a Doppleganger.
        Three gnomes in a trench coat.
        Two halflings in a trench coat.
        Eighty-six pixies in a trench coat.
        An animated, sentient trench coat.
        A Beholder.
        A man cursed to only speak the truth.
        A local jester.
        A mafia hitman.
        A goblin who was on fire.
        A Cloud Giant.
        A group of Azers.
        A man who fell through the roof.
        A Viking warrior.
        A man who rolled through like tumbleweed.
        A Mind Flayer.
        Mordenkainen himself.
        Volo himself.
        A bounty hunter.
        An old soldier.
        An old policeman.
        A former army commander.
        A crusader.
        An occultist.
        A grave robber.
        A mailman.
        An animated reflection of myself in a mirror.
        A man who wore two dark cloaks.
        A one-legged, one-armed, one-eyed man.
        A werewolf.
        A stone golem.
        A tap-dancer.
        A saxophone player.
        The high priest of Kelemvor.
        An entire travelling circus.
        The town crier.
        A retired pirate.
        A retired bandit.
        A slightly insane author.
        A salty old sailor.
        A great-grandmother from a large local clan.
        The greatest clown in the world.
        A suit of Animated Armor that had trapped a man inside it.
        A man selling salt.
        A trickster spirit.
        An imp.
        A regiment of Hobgoblins.
        A tribe of Orcs.
        An Ettin, who also said it wasn't true.
        A Wraith.
        A lich lord.
        A lost traveler.
        The mayor's niece.
        A fisherman.
        A silent and mysterious stranger who recently moved into town.
        A professional spy.
        A stockbroker.
        A tabaxi minstrel.
        A Goliath monk.
        A band of singing Dwarves who sung it to me.
        An Elvish comedian.
        A halfling with a mohawk.
        My evil twin.
        A lost Planeswalker.
        A slightly evil magician.
        A poison dealer.
        A Mob legbreaker.
        Someone covered head to toe in scarves and coats.
        My spouse.
        My son.
        A Tortle with a purple-painted shell.
        Three knights, one in white armor, one in black, one in grey.
        A Kobold with a violent temper who screamed at me about it.
        A dragonborn who was looking for their parents.
        A beautiful forest nymph.
        An old woman who turned out to be a Hag.
        An old man who turned out to be a Vampire.
        A man who refused to stop doing jumping jacks.
        A young woman who started a dance party after telling me.
        A skeleton.
        A morbid man with tired-looking eyes and rumpled suit.
        A talking parrot.
        A wandering preacher.
        A young half-elf who was on a pilgrimage.
        A knight in golden armor.
        Gary Gygax.
        A talking cat.

City roller

    d4 | Town Square
    Water Well
    Bonfire
    Open Market/Bazaar
    Statue or Shrine

    d6 | Lodging
    Relatively safe clearing near town
    Generous Citizen with Vacancy
    Open-Air Campground
    Spare Building (Barn, Empty Home)
    Communal Lodge
    Inn

    d8 | Food
    Plentiful wild game/fish
    Generous Citizen with Food
    Public Vegetable Garden
    Communal Potluck Meals
    Open Pit Barbecue
    Smokehouse
    Marketplace
    Tavern

    2d10 | Shops
    General Store
    Alchemist/Herbalist/Healer
    Blacksmith (Armor, Weapons, Tools)
    Carpenter (Boats, Buildings, Wagons)
    Clothing (Common, Fine)
    Enchanter/Hex Den
    Glassblower
    Leatherworks (Armor, Saddlery)
    Stables
    Exotic Goods (Carpets & Cloth, Jewelry, Perfumes, Curio)


    d12 | Economic Touchstone
    Crossroads
    Crops
    Livestock
    Docks/Harbor
    Ferry/Major Bridge
    Fishery
    Holy Site/Source of Magical Power
    Mill
    Mine
    Trade Hub
    Defense (Barracks, Defending a Strategic Location or Road, Gatehouse, Training)
    Production Industry (Shipyards, Ironworks)

    d20 | Landmark
    Wizard’s Tower (Active, Abandoned)
    College (Arcane, Bardic, Scholarly)
    Combat Training School
    Church/Shrine/Temple
    Fighting Pit
    Tended Gardens
    Guild Hall (Craft, Trade, Fighter, Thieves)
    Library/Knowledge Repository
    Lighthouse or Watchtower
    Racetrack (Dogs, Horses)
    Ruins (Castle, Cathedral, Shipyards)
    Sealed Cave Entrance
    Skirmish Aftermath (Neighboring Town, Invading Horde, Rampaging Beast)
    Spiritual Lodge
    Standing Corporal Punishment Fixture (Stocks, Gallows, Chopping Block)
    Theater/Amphitheater
    A River Runs Through It
    Build into a Hill- or Mountain-Side
    Built into a Canyon or Ravine
    Surrounded by Forest/Wilderness

city entertainment options
    A zoo that showcases famous monsters instead of regular animals.
    A tavern that has a small river running through it. People try balancing on logs and knocking each other off to settle arguments.
    A giant arena filled with water that allows for naval battles to occur.
    A man dressed up as a tree, jumping out to scare passers by. Locals watch him get the tourists. u/jheiner227
    A wizard using his magic to play pranks on people, similar to Just for Laughs Gags. u/jheiner227
    A kenku orchestra. A kenku "plays" their individual part with their mimicry ability. They all come together My Singing Monsters style. u/imthebeaniegenie
    A massive cookout. u/greatGoD67
    Once a year upon invitation, 3 villages within three miles converge at a gnomes wizard tower. (Leaving their homes unprotected) There are premade alchemical cooking pits, bonfires. u/greatGoD67
    Strength contests (wrestling, melees) u/greatGoD67
    Dex contests (darts, knife juggling) u/greatGoD67
    Constitution contests (Eating the spiciest of peppers, holding your breath underwater) u/greatGoD67
    Wis contests (riddle solving) u/greatGoD67
    Int contests (Trivia) u/greatGoD67
    Cha contests (music, comedy and team sports) u/greatGoD67
    A cookout where everyone brings a monster u/greatGoD67
    Watching monsters hunt people.
    Feeding a gelatinous cube. u/greatGoD67
    An all orc gladitorial games. These are captured orcs and trained to fight one another.
    A centaur entering a jousting tournament but some scandalous actions taken with a mare behind closed doors led to him being removed. u/greatGoD67
    A tavern-ship which launches from the top of a large but shallow hill in early evening, meanders down a long and winding river, and crashes over a waterfall into a lake at 2am. At 1:55am, the great iron-bound casks of ale and wine are stoppered, and everybody leaves the tavern to watch from the shore. The tavern's walls and roof are deliberately built flimsy, so they smash upon landing at the bottom of the waterfall, to a chorus of cheers. Afterwards, hundreds of laborers fish the casks, the tavern's hull, and the remnants of its walls and roof out of the lake, and haul them up the hill to rebuild the tavern for the next day. u/camtarn
    A bardic song contest. Most of the bards are using Dancing Lights or Prestidigitation to create minor magical effects for particularly dramatic parts of their songs. u/camtarn
    A cheese-rolling contest, where participants hurl wheels of cheese down a steep hill and chase them to the bottom. Broken ankles or wrists are common. u/camtarn
    Night-fire archery, where participants compete to light small hay-filled lanterns suspended over a lake, using fire arrows. u/camtarn
    A young copper dragon who has taken up residence in a fire-gutted warehouse, and tells fantastical stories to the children of the town in return for something shiny. Her hoard is mostly made up of curiously sparkly pebbles, flakes of mica, and pieces of broken glass. u/camtarn
    A giant musical instrument made of long ropes, tied to huge hollow trees which act as resonators. A local half-ogre bard (chaotic good) plays the instrument by plucking the ropes with a long hooked rod, creating ground-shaking bass tones. u/camtarn
    A pie eating contest. The village is poor, and having good meat pies be devoured in seconds seems like a horrible waste, so the pies are filled with gristle, skin and meat trimmings. They're surprisingly tasty, as long as you don't mind a bit of a crunch. u/camtarn
    A century-old widely-played game of Assassin, where anybody 'killed' by their assassin must enact the most dramatic death scene they can think of, regardless of where they are. The assassin holds a large white flag to avoid alarming passers-by. Locals welcome the regular impromptu street theatre. u/camtarn
    A wine tasting, featuring wines aged in high magic areas. Some of them are quite unusual, and every bottle is unique. u/camtarn
    A face-slapping contest. u/camtarn
    A cave full of delicate purple-and-white crystals, which make a quiet musical tone when touched. Concentrating hard when touching makes the tone louder, and can induce vibrato or change the tone's pitch and timbre. Regular concerts are held here by musicians trained in the use of the crystals. u/camtarn
    A limerick competition. The more obscene the better. u/camtarn
    A miniature elevated railway with a circular track three miles in length, populated by tiny constantly-moving metal golems on wheels. The golems are ancient and need no maintenance; if stolen, they will invariably escape and find their way back to the track. Messages can be clipped onto the golems to be delivered to locations near the railway. At sunset each day, the golems stop in little groups of seven and perform group acrobatics for one minute before resuming scooting along the track. u/camtarn
    A contest to see who can leave the deepest tooth imprints on a chunk of wood. u/camtarn
    A very elaborate derivation of rock paper scissors, featuring 101 different gestures and 5050 different outcomes. u/camtarn
    A tiny zoo with only a single cage, containing an invisible monster. The owner sits on a stool in front, and purports to be able to see the monster, describing its long dripping fangs, its seventeen eyes, its surprisingly plush dense fur which it grooms regularly. If a patron gets too close, there's an almighty roar and the cage shakes violently. Locals' opinions are divided over whether the monster is real. u/camtarm
    A moustache, beard and hair festival. Some of the competitions allow magical assistance, and the results are variously spectacular and hilarious. u/camtarn
    A long downhill race on small wooden carts. Each cart is crewed by two people - one to steer, and the other to constantly drip melted grease onto the wooden axles to keep them from burning up due to friction. u/camtarn
    A ceremony where, once a year, a randomly chosen building is emptied, set on fire, then rebuilt by the entire town. For this reason, no buildings in the town have fixed interior decor above the most basic, but ornate tapestries and wall/ceiling hangings are common. u/camtarn
    An actual non-creepy circus with friendly clowns and happy carnies and non-abused animals and a jolly, gregarious ringmaster in a top hat, coat with long tails, and a waxed mustache. The ringmaster is obviously a woman wearing a fake mustache, but that’s about the most “unusual” thing about this circus. Come have a genuinely good time! u/saro13
    A clowder of friendly, curious stray cats that crave attention. They are basically a public fixture in the town by this point. At worst, they may trip you by standing behind your legs or cover your cloak with stray hairs. u/saro13
    Traveling caravan with an artistic flair and colorful covered wagons. They’re traveling minstrels and playwrights and love putting on a show, even around a simple campfire. They love bawdy jokes and new stories of heroism and adventure. u/saro13
    A local illusionist (who some think has gone a little soft in the head) likes to read heroic fantasy in the local park/commons. While he silently reads, little ethereal illusions of knights on horseback, kidnapped princesses, and snarling dragons materialize around him. Small crowds will gather quietly at a respectful distance to watch. Disturbing the wizard causes him to leave in a huff, and ends the show. It’s not clear if the illusionist is aware he is creating these images. u/saro13
    A magical labyrinth with a lot of traps and monsters. Nobody can die inside, instead they are portet back to the entrance and have to pay again. A grand price waits for the first who will succeed. There is also a magical "leaderboard" with the name and the meters without dying of the top 20 adventurers. A local competition is running and nearly any young adventurer tries to become the one who successfully makes it a little bit deeper into the complex. u/jyscwFirestarter
    Gnome-ball: American football but you use a gnome. The time honored adventuring tradition of throwing gnomes where you need them to be has turned into a sport. (Gnomes are equipped with some way to featherfall for safety.) u/tacuku
    A legendary path of an old war battle, and a measum host doing a talking tour. u/TheGreenJedi
    Shaved ice stand made from ice shaving off ice sculptures. They offer classes in sculpture, syrup making, and frost magics. u/xDarkLlama
    Giant bug racing. Like huge horse sized beetles. u/josh61980
    Cockroach racing. When players enter random tavern they will see crowd cheering up particular cockroach with hilarious name. As soon as race ends player will be able to place bets for next race. (Also you can swap cockroaches with rats or snails) u/knifekillgoeshere
    A once-a-year gala for wealthy nobles, hosted by the thieves guild. Rules are simple, all guests are safe from any type of harm, but thieves must attempt to steal the jewelry and not get caught. The noble with the least stolen from/highest worn wealth gets prestige and fame. The thief with the largest haul, gets a title in the guild. u/Gyrosummers
    A druid convention u/Astr0C4t
    A Thai Ping Pong competition u/ma3thr33x
    Jester Hunt, drunk locals listen to jokes and hurl rocks at individuals who tell bad jokes. Goal is to stay conscious till morning. u/Steamnach
    An insult contest u/Pavoazul
    Criminals displayed publicly, prominently, and perspicuously. Buckets below them raise money to keep both them there and the guard funded. Guard focuses effort on profitable offences only. No taxes exist. u/afourthfool
    Open Mic Night at the tavern. u/NeoMegaRyuMKII
    In an imperial city, there is chariot racing with ferocious and fast beasts out of the monster manual as steeds. u/battleshipryan479
    An insect fighting ring. The current champion is a 10 year old that somehow caught a stag beetle the size of a dog. u/zapzoroath
    One man band. u/shadow-124
    Knife throwing contests. The two contestants face each other and throw the same knife back and forth at each other. The last one standing wins a prize. u/PutridMeatPuppet
    Museum of cursed (or silly) magic items, with a gift shop at the end of course. u/animestory99
    Traveling Hall of Mirrors, it's a wagon that resembles a Traveling Medicine Show that it's entrance is actually a little pocket dimension, people pay 5 silver to enter this pocket dimension that has various mirrors that are warped and make silly reflections back at them. u/DeathBySuplex
    A jail that doubles as a public-shaming petting zoo. u/ThreeAndTwentyChars
    Badger races. Gnomes, goblins, and halflings race around an amusingly small circuit while riding large badgers, while spectators place bets. u/Evisiron
    Religious grounds of an information based god, has trivia based games. u/davidm27
    A puppetry theater that re-enacts historical battles in gory detail. Blood everywhere. u/Gian_Key
    A tavern with only one wine that induces strong hallucinations. u/Gian_Key
    A public pool that no one uses anymore because their is something in the water. u/Gian_Key
    A ghost train that uses actual zombies. u/Gian_Key
    A ferris wheel powered by a friendly giant. u/Gian_Key
    A free fall attraction in which a wizard teleports you into the stratosphere. u/Gian_Key
    A daily fireworks show by a few of wizards trying to outdo one another. (Its getting dangerous) u/Gian_Key
    A pub quiz at a local tavern. Winners get a prize, losers get beat up. u/Gian_Key
    A desert settlement that holds a festival once a year where the hunters track down the largest scorpions they can find and harvest the stingers; the largest one winning. Afterwards, they roast and eat the scorpions. u/Tehwipez
    A town built around a gimp cart that has not been moved in at least 20 or 30 years from the looks of it. Plants have expanded over it and it seems to have become an important piece of it. Every year a lot of people come to this cart, trying to meet the owner, who is the most acclaimed fortuneteller in the country. When asked, they all say (amongst other things): “she will fulfill your needs, winter, spring or fall”like a jingle, it’s wrote on ads on walls and inns. u/Oscaretto
    A dungeon cleared out by previous adventurers made into a tourist trap or theme park. u/FirstChAoS

evil monologue
    01	"Before Me you are a slug in the sun. You are privy to a great Becoming and you recognize nothing. You are an ant in the after-birth. It is in your nature to do one thing correctly: before Me you rightly tremble. Fear is not what you owe Me, you and the other pismires. You owe Me awe."
    02	"You are strong, child, but I am beyond strength. I am the end."
    03	"Lay down your arms...or I will lay them down for you"
    04	"Why don't you understand that I'm just trying to fix all these problems? Whenever you try to help you make things worse, but I make things better. So many things are flawed and I'm just tidying things up."
    05	"So you made it. What do you want? applause? curses? Perhaps a theatrical monologue expressing my certain victory or inevitable ascension? no. You may believe me the villain, but villains only exist in history books written by those whose will triumphs over others. If you defeat me today I won't give you the pleasure of killing a proud man. My path has cost everyone much I know that. Too much now to stop. This never was some children's game. It always was war. and I intend to finish the fight."
    06	"You are weak. Undisciplined. Cowering behind walls. You're not brave. You've merely forgotten the fear of death. Allow me to reacquaint you."
    07	Well, here we are. I ask you, hero, did a single of my skeletons wander forth from my home to harm you? To harm anyone dear to you? Have I, hero, with a thousand years of arcane mysteries laid like treasures in my mind, stolen but a single coin from you? Is not my wealth my own? And yet, hero, you have broken my home, slain my friends and servants, stolen my rightful goods. What do you have that you did not take? All you have learned, hero, all of your experiences, are built on the destruction of others. What, tell me hero, have you ever gained that someone else has not lost by your "righteous" hand? It is true that I sold my soul for power, but have you not done the same piecemeal? And do you not seek yet yet more power at my demise? I cannot fault your intentions, hero, we are kindred in a sense, but now it is time you learn the harsh reality of the inheritance of power. To the eldest goes all.
    08	"So here we are. You know my reasons, and I know yours. I understand, I truly do - and it will not stop me. If that is what you wish, you will need to bring me down yourselves. Come then, let us find the winner of this game once and for all!"
    09	Ohoho, you're approaching me?
    10	“Mercy? You dare ask me for mercy? What mercy was extended to me, broken and bleeding in the snow? What mercy was given to my men, frozen and starving in those long winter nights? … What mercy was given to my wife, whom I left and thought safe in the company of traitors? And of my child, of only three years...? What was given to us but death and befoulment? We were good people… We were good people… And now I am all that is left.”
    11	“Do you think I enjoy this? Being a monster? It is a hell worse than death. But I exist in it. Do you think I like looking at the faces of my brothers-in-arms, knowing that what they once were was robbed from them, never to return? I have told them they are blessed, because without it they are damned. They believe me because they have no one else. They need me as much as I need them. Together we will find our vengeance. We will find our rest.”
    12	“Know that I hold no malice towards you, mortals. You are simply acting on what you perceive to be the right thing to do. You may walk away, leave in peace, if you so choose. I offer that to you now. But I will have my vengeance this day, and I will destroy anything that dares try and stop me. You do what you feel you have to do, mortals. And so will I.”
    13	"This is the best part of the story. The part where you think the hero just might not triumph. That this will be their final journey... fear not, in the end I will prevail."
    14	what? Did you expect a long monologue?
    15	I don't even know who you are / “Do I know you?”
    16	I am...tired. .... I have worked without a will for sleep or rest. Repose was lost to me the minute you people walked into the Court. I had everything within the palm of my hand until you killed the King and seduced the Dragon I had laying in wait in the crypts....HOW DID YOU DO THAT?! ... No...do not answer that question. Don't even strum that cursed lute you utter buffoon. ... I can only rest with your heads on spikes...maybe I'll repaint my chambers in your blood as a grim reminder of what it means to have a good work ethic, which is more than I can say for you sorry lot of purposeless vagabonds!
    17	"God's gift. Your violence. When I came downstairs in my home, and I saw that tree in my living room, it reached out for me... a divine hand. God loves violence. Why else would there be so much of it? It's in us. It's what we are. We wage war, we burn sacrifices, and pillage and plunder and tear at the flesh of our brothers. And why? Because God gave us violence to wage in his honor. There's no moral order as pure as this storm. There's no moral order at all. There's just this: can my violence conquer yours?"
    18	In response to threat by party indicating they will defeat the boss: The boss, looks them up and down, squints, and smirks "How?"
    19	My name is Yoshikage Kira. I'm 33 years old. My house is in the northeast section of Morioh, where all the villas are, and I am not married. I work as an employee for the Kame Yu department stores, and I get home every day by 8 PM at the latest. I don't smoke, but I occasionally drink. I'm in bed by 11 PM, and make sure I get eight hours of sleep, no matter what. After having a glass of warm milk and doing about twenty minutes of stretches before going to bed, I usually have no problems sleeping until morning. Just like a baby, I wake up without any fatigue or stress in the morning. I was told there were no issues at my last check-up. I'm trying to explain that I'm a person who wishes to live a very quiet life. I take care not to trouble myself with any enemies, like winning and losing, that would cause me to lose sleep at night. That is how I deal with society, and I know that is what brings me happiness. Although, if I were to fight I wouldn't lose to anyone. (tailor to suit your setting)
    20	"Rudimentary creatures of blood and flesh, you touch my mind, fumbling in ignorance, incapable of understanding....There is a realm of existence so far beyond your own you cannot even imagine it. I am beyond your comprehension. I am Sovereign...Reaper? A label created by the Protheans to give voice to their destruction. In the end, what they chose to call us is irrelevant. We simply... are...Organic life is nothing but a genetic mutation, an accident. Your lives are measured in years and decades. You wither and die. We are eternal, the pinnacle of evolution and existence. Before us, you are nothing. Your extinction is inevitable. We are the end of everything... You exist because we allow it, and you will end because we demand it... My kind transcends your very understanding. We are each a nation - independent, free of all weakness. You cannot grasp the nature of our existence....We have no beginning. We have no end. We are infinite. Millions of years after your civilization has been eradicated and forgotten, we will endure... We are legion. The time of our return is coming. Our numbers will darken the sky of every world. You cannot escape your doom... Your words are as empty as your future. I am the Vanguard of your destruction. This exchange is over..."
    21	"I will grow, know my name. I am hope, I am the 'Frame. I advance up from the deep. A new chance, the march of the machines"
    22	"Twelve. There were twelve other groups just like yours. Comrades in arms, just like you. Prodigious fighters, just like you. Armed to the teeth with weapons and potions and spells, just like you. Twelve groups of fools who believed that they could band together and defeat me. Twelve groups of fools who believed they wouldn't make the same mistakes as those who came before them. Twelve sets of shallow graves left unmarked. What precisely makes you think that you will be anything other than Group Thirteen?"
    23	For you, the day <BBEG>[graced/attacked/decimtate] your [village/home/realm] was the most important day of your life. But for me, it was Tuesday.
    24	"So you've answered the call, and dug deep into your soul. Did you really believe that this was your legend unfolding? Think again, for now it is my turn to roll!"
    25	"Where there is a God, there must be a Devil. [turns dramatically and bows towards the party] Please, allow me to introduce myself..."
    26	"All I wanted was to provide order to this world. All I wanted was to unite this world under one undisputed rule. All I wanted was a world were everyone knew their place in life. I was this close to creating this utopia... but then you came, blinded by tales of heroics, and branded me a villain. You... idiots... came, and you fucked it all up! Well, if you believe that this world doesn't deserve order... [opens up a portal to a Blood War battlefield]... THEN LET ANARCHY REIGN!!!"
    27	‘You heroes are all the same, frantically running from fight to fight with nary a concern for the consequences you leave in your wake. How many towns did you save, only to move on while farmers try to figure out how to grow crops and feed their family when their farms were burned down? How many did you save from oncoming hordes only to demand their life savings as ‘just reward’. Here is a better question, how many children did you leave to die in this crumbling city, as you chased after me, all in the name of grand heroics? Heroes? Ha! Don’t make me laugh! For all my deeds at least I am under no illusions as to who and what I am.’
    28	“All your adventures, all your efforts and all your hard work. For what? To be defeated my me? How many must You kill just the get a shot at me? All these dead... there would’ve been less casualties without your interventions and intrusions! And what will you have to show for it? Nothing. Nothing at all. I will end you and your self righteousness right now!”
    29	“I know what it’s like to lose. To feel so desperately that you are right, yet to fail nonetheless. Dread it, run from it? Destiny arrives all the same. And now it is here... or should I say, I am.”
    30	Oh that? That was just business.
    31	"It is a strange fate that we should suffer so much fear and doubt over so small a thing. Such a little thing."
    32	"You know, i was actually regarded as a hero once, people would all hail my name. Its funny back then it seemed important but when you arent adventuring anymore people will forget you. They will exclude you. I never stopped being a hero you know. My goals have just shifted, perhaps if you win you will follow my footsteps." -- former hero
    32	Sigh "while i am flattered by your presence i would prefer if you go home, i know you are all astonished by me and such but honestly? heroes arent my type, too preachy. Go home and live another day, i even buy first round at the tavern" -- charmer
    33	"Did you know most small skirmishes last between 6 seconds and a minute, my own statistics says they never last more than 18 seconds" -- bookeeper type
    34	"Have you ever thought about the gods? Like really thought about them? What if the gods arent mercifull, what if they decieve us? What if they just chug us into a great divine incinerstor to power the devine magic they grant their clerics? I decided not to take the risk but if you do find out tell me" --undead
    35	Party indicates some foul deed BBEG has done: "Do you have any idea how little that narrows it down?"
    36	"For someone within range of my magics, you are awfully arrogant. Perhaps this is some kind of depressive death wish. Fear not, once you die I'll raise you and give you something that approaches a purpose."
    37	Darkness and death are all that remains for you here at the end... Your lands, your people, your loved ones will be little more than kindling to my inferno. Gods and devils rightly fear me yet you fools fight on to the last breath... Did you really think there was any other ending? I am infinite... I am inevitable... [1/3]
    38	I'll let you live just long enough to see every light extinguished, when darkness swallows all you shall be last. [2/3]
    39	You may be strong, but I am beyond strength... [3/3]
    40	Bold words for someone in crushing range."
    41	"Ho? You're approaching me? Instead of running away, you're approaching me?"
    50	I understand how you could think what I have done is irredeemable. However, my heart and my actions are utterly unclouded. They are all taken in the name of justice. I am the only one that can save this wretched world, and I'll do whatever it takes to do just that.
    51	"I am frankly embarrassed to have allowed you to get this far, and will be rectifying that oversight with extreme prejudice immediately.
    52	"It doesn't matter who wins, really. The crowds will cheer on the victors, regardless of whether they are motivated by fear, or by adulation. Although, in your case, I suppose it'll just be relief that you didn't fuck up one more time."
    53	"Mercy is not a luxury either of us have anymore. If I slay you, rest assured that your families will follow you soon. It would be wise of you to accept this as a gift."
    54	"When you set off on your tottering quest into the unknown, did you ever expect it to end crushed under the booted heel of the god of the new world?"
    55	You lack of imagination is insulting. Generation after generation you mortals try to hurt me, using the same old methods. Fire and metal? Blood, violence and fury? Pain? Sacrifice? SELF RIGHTEOUS MEAT? Try and try again, you still believe these things make me... weaker?
    56	"Who did you think was behind all of this? The gods? Perhaps the Devils? No... Just me!"
    57	"My child, why do you point that weapon at me? Do you not recognize the one the prophets have predicted? The one destined to put an end to all strife in this world? The one to usher a new age of harmony? The price may be great, but it is all part of the Holy One's plan. The suffering of those you fight for is just a means to that end....."I know that the youngest of my apostles betrayed me, and that is okay. When his corpse hits the soil, all will be forgiven. And I forgive you too, my child....."Of course, you will have to die in order to truly repent."
    58	“So... you finally found me.”
    59	“I’ve been waiting for you to arrive.”
    60	“Just you [insert number of pcs]? That’s it?”
    61	“While you’ve been chasing kobolds and goblins all over the place, I’ve been swinging this big dick in the halls of power. Now, step aside, necro-fodder.”
    62	“Ooh. Lunch has arrived.”
    63	“Minions... bring me my torture kit.”
    64	"Adventurers a lot like toys. When you break them, it makes children cry. Which is, obviously, desirable.”
    65	"It is such an odd thing, seeing others willingly run towards their own death. One would think I would be used to such futile gestures bye now, but it never fails to intrigue me."
    66	“TALKING MAKE KRAG MAD!” (obviously a BBDEG, D for dumb :-) )
    67	”It took hundreds to kill me...but I’ve killed humans by the thousands! I am sublime! I am the true face of evil!”
    68	"It's about legacy. You see, when I have children, I'm going to leave them the world as my legacy. They will wish for nothing. You can't make a comfy nest without spilling a few liters of blood."
    69	You've meddled one too many times. Those idiots I sent to dispatch you were nothing compared to me.
    70	I've watched. I've waited. And now you've made your way to your doom. To me.
    71	I can smell you. The fear. The tension. The rage. It will be an honor to add you and your friends to my collection finally.
    72	"Suppose that you were sitting down at this table. The napkins are in front of you, which napkin would you take? The one on your ‘left’? Or the one on your ‘right’? The one on your left side? Or the one on your right side? Usually you would take the one on your left side. That is ‘correct’ too. But in a larger sense on society, that is wrong. Perhaps I could even substitute ‘society’ with the ‘Universe’. The correct answer is that ‘It is determined by the one who takes his or her own napkin first.’ …Yes? If the first one takes the napkin to their right, then there’s no choice but for others to also take the ‘right’ napkin. The same goes for the left. Everyone else will take the napkin to their left, because they have no other option. This is ‘society’… Who are the ones that determine the price of land first? There must have been someone who determined the value of money, first. The size of the rails on a train track? The magnitude of electricity? Laws and Regulations? Who was the first to determine these things? Did we all do it, because this is a Republic? Or was it Arbitrary? NO! The one who took the napkin first determined all of these things! The rules of this world are determined by that same principle of ‘right or left?’! In a Society like this table, a state of equilibrium, once one makes the first move, everyone must follow! In every era, this World has been operating by this napkin principle. And the one who ‘takes the napkin first’ must be someone who is respected by all. It’s not that anyone can fulfill this role… Those that are despotic or unworthy will be scorned. And those are the ‘losers’. In the case of this table, the ‘eldest’ or the ‘Master of the party’ will take the napkin first… Because everyone ‘respects’ those individuals."
    73	“All your adventures, all your efforts and all your hard work. For what? To be defeated my me? How many must You kill just the get a shot at me? All these dead... there would’ve been less casualties without your interventions and intrusions! And what will you have to show for it? Nothing. Nothing at all. I will end you and your self righteousness right now!”...“I know what it’s like to lose. To feel so desperately that you are right, yet to fail nonetheless. Dread it, run from it? Destiny arrives all the same. And now it is here... or should I say, I am.
    74	You've meddled one too many times. Those idiots I sent to dispatch you were nothing compared to me.
    75	I've watched. I've waited. And now you've made your way to your doom. To me.
    76	Behold true glory! Behold true power! Behold! I am your reckoning!
    77	I can smell you. The fear. The tension. The rage. It will be an honor to add you and your friends to my collection finally.
    78	The Wheel of Time moves forward. Progress moves with it. You are no longer needed for this divine mechanism. 79
    80	It's amusing how hard you tried just to get here. This should be simple.
    81	You've gathered your friends. You've gathered your arms. Yet you did not gather the only thing that matters. 82
    83	Ah. Arrival at last. I was beginning to wonder when you would show. I need your souls please.
    84	I am gifting you relief from the strife and struggle you continue to find yourself in. Why fight this beautiful gift?
    85	You think yourselves clever? Allow me to show you true intellectual prowess.
    86	I am TIRED of you GETTING in MY way! Shut up and DIE ALREADY!
    87	You've fought your way through entire armies. You've solved countless ageless puzzles. And for what? Some sense of righteousness? Some sense of heroism? Fame? Come. I will give you final rest.
    88	I win. Not even all of you working together can stop me. I have thought of every possibility, every move you can make. No matter what you do, you will fail. My master will rise. And this pathetic little world will be brought to its knees by his power. Enjoy your last few days of freedom.
    89	Well, it appears that I am outnumbered seven to one. Heh. You should have brought more people.
    90	Here’s the deal. Your group and I will fight, should I defeat you, I win. Should defeat me, the ancient dragon I am controlling with this staff will break free. Being the hero’s you are, you will go to stop it. I’ll flee and I’ll win. If you chose to kill me before focusing on the dragon, well, I’ll give it one last command to devour you. I win. If you kill me and destroy the staff the dragon will rampage, once again giving you two options. If you don’t fight the dragon, my army will kill it making me a martyr and you the villains who let it lose. If you do fight it my army will kill you in your weakened state. My son will then take over in my stead and take over the world. You have no options. I am Xanatos and you cannot beat me.
    91	You have been tricked. I was never on your side. The items you have been helping me with? They are used to permanently seal the gods away from this world. No. More. Gods. No more magic. It’s ironic really, the power they brought to this world will soon seal them out. If it makes you feel any better, I did enjoy our travels
    92	"Now I judge you. To the charge of betraying your own flesh, guilty. To the charge of being human, when we could have been gods, guilty! The sentence is death.
    93	"Really? That's it? You are the cause of my troubles? This is, this is pathetic! Where are my real nemesis? This ridiculous group of, of nothings!? Of ants?!?! increasing in loudness: This has TO BE A JOKE!!! ARGH! Deep breath, whispering: Keep it together. Normal voice: Who sent you? Nevermind, I'll get it from you in all sorts of ways."
    94	"So, adventurers, you have cut a bloody swath through my home and finally come to me. How many of my servants lie dead at your hands?"
    95	"Hah, evil? I am merely running experiments in my home and you pot smashing murder hobos have come to kill me for glory and gold, not for good or justice."
    96	“You wish to stop me? And yet I could not have accomplished all of this without you. Who sowed the seeds of doubt among the dwarfkin? Who rid the caves of those troublesome abominations? Who deposed the regent, the only one standing between me and the fateful scrolls?
    97	“We are not enemies, you and I. Quite the opposite—you have been my most faithful servants.”
    98	"I started my plans centuries before any of you were born. I fought dragons, enslaved giants and killed hundreds of thousands of people of all races. Why, you ask?... All you need to know is that he will be sent to a circle in Hell especially made for him. And if you don't leave this place right now, you annoyances might just be there to greet the bastard."
    99	Well, I tried.
    100	One step left now, it's almost time, Show you what my determination has still left for you to get back to. You should prepare to just die like all your friends, you'll have a really good time. But guys like you are always just fools. Come at me, try to kill me with your fancy tools. Let's go, now the room gets chiller. Let's go, just another killer."

ancients
    The Swamp Lurker: a six foot tall elven woman with skin lesions and leprosy ulcers. The Swamp Lurker has been spotted in swamps all over the world and is always carrying a lantern. Legends say that she was once a cleric that was desperately trying to cure her city of a deadly disease. Those who make pacts with her have the strange quirk of attracting flies. She has been known to assist travelers as well as kill them.
    Corrin: an artificer that had achieved lichdom through human transmodifications. Corrin is now more machine than man.
    The Chained King: a large creature with black feathers and demon horns. The Chained King was punished by the gods for using forbidden magic. The Chained King now remains locked away by three chains, each will be broken if certain requirements are met. As of now one of the chains was broken when a woman gave birth to a beast.
    Fafnir: a 15 million year old red wyrm that has survived off of his unending list for gold. Fafnir uses his greed as motivation to remain forever living.
    Volk: a primordial living at the bottom of a volcano. Legends say when Volk arises from the volcano the entire continent will be lit aflame.
    Sobrick: a crocodile human hybrid often worshipped by lizardfolk who is said to spring from the bottom of the ocean depths to eat the sky when he escapes a maze of coral he is trapped in.
    Galia: The mother of all dryads, Galia is found in a forest in the feywild and is said to be 100-300 feet tall. Galia is responsible for creating seasonal change. If Galia dies she simply is reborn from her old corpse. Galia is lawful in nature and will only appear to those who she wishes to see.
    The Watcher: an invisible entity with eternal life grated to them by the gods of death. It’s impossible to know how old the watcher is or where they are at any moment but what is certain is they are always gathering information. Warlocks have made pacts with The Watcher but even they have never talked to or seen them.
    The Monolith: a monk that has been meditating for 2000 years. The Monoliths real name is Feng and he has not aged since he had been in meditation. The Monolith while being unconscious still has subconscious defenses. Many assassins have tried to kill The Monolith only to have their mind bombarded with psychic energy.
    William Greyhammer: a dwarven paladin that upon death was offered the opportunity to be the guardian of Celestia. William spends his days at the gates of Celesia making sure the people who enter are allowed there.
    Drakeslayer: a greatsword that was forged by a great cleric. Drakeslayer can speak telepathically and has a hatred for dragonkind. Drakeslayer is a +3 weapon and deals an additional 2d6 to all dragons.
    Behemoth: a 6 legged bear-like creature with chitinous plates and fur, a hairless head and sharp needle like teeth. Roaming the heart of the oldest forest in the land, its roar is audible from the villages near the edge. They say it sounds like the screams of thousands of creatures dying, and the war drums of a legion
    Goliath: a tiger-like creature with one pair of legs and a pair of muscular arms. It’s fur is thick and drips a dark viscous syrup. A head that looks almost reptilian in nature and thick sharp teeth like the heads of spears. It’s roar sounds like a screeching violin. On its stomach is a deep scar, scholars say the Goliath got this scar from a fight it survived with The Behemoth
    Spawn of Orcus: This entity is the result of an ancient summoning ritual gone wrong in the Underdark. 30ft in diameter, the Spawn of Orcus is an amalgamation of over a hundred humanoid corpses and skulls, fused together in a disgusting mutated formation of perpetually rotting flesh and bone. For centuries it has writhed in agony in a gigantic cavern known as the Sepulchre Sanguinis, where the original ritual once took place. Its agonizing wails can be heard for miles, and its only wish is it to spread pain and suffering to those who cross its path.
    Warforged Dragons: a peculiar species that was uncovered only recently. Warforged dragons are the rarest type of dragon and come in all forms of metals like copper, steel, iron, and even aluminum. The largest and most intelligent of the warforged dragons known is Gorashi. Gorashi breaths fire and poison, they have been known to make deals with mortals for knowledge they have gained in their lifetime.
    Barothgar: an orcish sorcerer that steals the remaining life force of the creature he kills. Barothgar has killed so many creatures that his estimated lifespan is 1.3 trillion years. Barothgar is a name feared by all orckin. Some old and sick orcs venture into his mountainous domain so that Barothgar can give them a warriors death.
    Phenrodna: A failed attempt at creating a being with the power of sorcery artificially, Phenrodna is sealed inside a large gemstone through the use of the Imprisonment spell, and has been for many hundreds of years. Originally a normal human, it has lost that humanity, the wild magic coursing through its veins mutating it into a mercurial form that is ever shifting, while also driving it insane, and making it exceptionally powerful. It can be released from imprisonment by three kings simultaneously touching the crystal.
    Karthonon: a lich that lives in the feywild and is worshiped by the fairies living near him. Karthonon uses his worshippers as subjects for his alchemichal experiments. Karthonon is as of now not very well known however many of the feywilds best divination wizards forsee of a dark being using his power to destroy the summer court. Whether the being succeeds is uncertain. The dark being these wizards see is Karthonon.
    The Weeping King: A ghostly apparition that resides in a lonely, decaying long hall in the wetlands. Tears seem to eternally flood from his eyes and his hellish wail drives men to their knees. When he holds aloft his chipped, rusted sword a host of long dead warriors manifest around him
    Kumbaka: a dragonborn bard that was one of the first dragonborn ever born into existence. Kumbaka spent his life learning as many instruments and languages as possible. One day using his charm and cunning Kumbaka made a bet to a god of magic that if they couldn't kill him before he was done with his preformance tomorrow was over then he would be unable to age and won't die until they are finished counting to infinity. The god of magic agrred to this bet with confidence but on the night of the performance Kumbaka was nowhere to be found. Kumbaka had actually preformed in a different plane of existence which bought him enough time to finish his preformance before he could be found. Kumbaka knows that the god is almost done counting to infinity amd is planning one last show three years from now. In his life Kumbaka had learned to play 13 instruments and can speak 6 different languages. Kumbaka is proud of his accomplishments and is ready to die.
    The Hermit of the Glade: No one knows how old he is, but he has always been there, and will always be there. His house is well maintained, though of low quality. For some reason no one ever bothers him, and few even bother to visit. He is always polite, helpful and could even be called friendly by those who have tried to visit. Perhaps he is some old man blessed/cursed with immortality, or perhaps there’s more to his story.
    The Beast: A boar that has lived in the underdark for 1000 years. He was ordinary boar that grew too large. Throughout the ages hunters have tried to slay The Beast, but none have triumphed. The Beast has only grown, both in size and hatred. His thick hide bristles with the spears and blades of the hunters and warriors it has bested.
    Früdwark The Elder Giant: no one is sure if Früdwark is a storm giant or a separate breed of giant entirely. Früdwark is by far the largest and oldest giant known to giant kind. Früdwark has no concern for other giants, dragons, or mortals and simply wants to be left alone. Früdwark has a distaste for dragons especially because dragons seem to be the creatures that are always trying to pester him the most. Früdwark has been known to make deals with mortals so that they can stop bothering him and so that they can kill dragons who bother him.
    Filtara: the oldest dracolich still alive. Filtara was the creature that had taught mortals to achieve lichdom at the cost of their servitude. Filtara was betrayed by her servants and was banished to an endless void somewhere in the shadowfell. When Filtara escapes her prison she will plan to make all humanoids extinct for what they have done to her.
    Ythandr: a pit fiend that owns the endless library which is a huge landmark in the nine layers of hell. The endless library is considered the library with the most books and information within its walls. Those who make too much noise in the library are swiftly dealt with by Ythandr. First time offenders are warned and left with a painful burn mark, second time offenders are taken to an area of the library simply labeled "pain room". It's a mystery what happens in the pain room but each offender spends 20 years in it and always leave with the parts of their brain pretaining to memory removed and given back to them in a jar. Ythandr is one of the very few devils that were born before the nine hells existed.
    The Trader: a quiet, strange being who pulls a cart full of strange magical items for no known reason. They wears a cloak that is always oily for some reason, a mask that completely hides their face, and large leather gauntlets that go up to their elbow. They only accepts other magic items of equal value for trade, and their stock is completely random, one day they may have only a +1 dagger, the next they may have multiple +5 vorpal swords. They are immune to all magical effects, including any forms of divination. If a PC asks a god or being with similar power about them, the god/other being will have no clue who they are talking about. They are friendly to the party, but will refuse to leave their cart or reveal any skin no matter what.
    The Poison Tree: The Primal Aspect of Knowledge, both good and ill. Uncovering new information is to be celebrated, even when it brings about ruin. Some scholars believe the tree is purely a metaphor, written about to conceptualize complex ideas in a primitive age; some believe it to be real, and strike out on lifelong journeys to find it and eat of its fruit.
    Eros: Referred to as "The Mother of Monsters" in common parlance, this entity shares its name with the later goddess of love, though Eros is far more primal. It is love and lust in all of its forms, and its offspring and faithful are hybrids of monsters and humanoid species. Violent and terrible, the Forbidden Plateu of the Cult of Eros is home to rare species of beast and plant life. The very air there is said to corrupt mortals beyond recognition, twisting them into amalgams of man and monster.
    The Iron Pillar: Deep in the earth, it sings an endless song to all who dig toward it, though they do not understand it. Those who find it, fall to their knees in worship and expire in mortal terror.
    The Pig: a very strong woman with the head of a boar. The Pig can be found anywhere and everywhere as long as there is dim light. The Pig is a lawful neutral being that punishes those who try to defile the laws of nature. The Pig is said to be a failed experiment on how to prevent hunger but why the entity has lived for such a long time is beyond explanation. Those who have been killed by the hands of The Pig are found with no face and black ooze bubbling from a hole in their chest.
    The Yawning Willow: A sentient tree that speaks via the wind blowing through its leaves. The Yawning Willow is so old that it invented the language of druidic and has taught some of the first druids the ways of nature.
    Rinoir: he uses the body of a human once sworn in pact to Rinoir, now an avatar to him, as a demonic machine that has twelve mechanical arms protruding from the human’s old, withered, and blackened corpse. Rinoir is desperate to find a new host as his current one is getting more and more fragile as each year goes by.
    The Duke of Stone: a 20 foot tall being made of various stones and metals. The Duke of Stone is near impossible to describe due to their alien nature but some defining features are its many eyes and sharp, jagged body (if that even is a body at all). The Duke of Stone is a creature who takes joy in learning of its prey before petrifying them and engulfing their stone body into its horrendous figure. The Duke is always joking about how it "eats" and "sleeps" like a fleshbag, thinking of any creature smaller than him as a toy.
    Qpljhyt: an entity made of a pink fleshy substance that forms into a circle. The name of this creature cannot be pronounced by any creature except for gods and powerful aberrant mind sorcerers. Qpljhyt has been around since the creation of the material plane and will only give information to those who he wishes to give information to. Qpljhyt cannot attack but can use a special reaction to force a creature to make a DC 28 intelligence saving throw, on a failed save the creature is reduced to 0 hit points and on a successful save the creature take 30+20d12 force damage. Any creature reduced to 0 hit points by Qpljhyt are erased from time and space. Qpljhyt has a hit point total of 4000.
    Talveer: A roughly humanoid figure made of grey living ropes bound together, wearing rough clothing that seems to be made from parts of various clothes and other materials sown together. They wander the wilderness, if encountered by heroes or others with potential, they will offer a strange quest. The rewards will be good, but the consequences of failure morbidly bizarre. Accept the quests at your own peril, follow every letter and you will be rewarded, a single mistake will be worse than death.
    The Night Owl: an immortal being who owns a demiplane where the sun never rises and the party never stops. Those who get trapped on his plane cease to age with the downside of never being able to escape the endless party.
    The Birds: Ancient beings of Shadowfell that seep into the material plane through their disciples. Nobody knows where The Birds came from or what their true intentions are, as each of their followers are given a different set of powers and directives, but they are powerful. Those who know of their existence speak of visions of thousands of voices speaking at once, being in the center of a tornado of black wings, and an overwhelming sense of dread.
    Thornhart: A very old, forgotten god of life and nature, may be offspring of (insert your god of nature). His appearance resembles a massive hart with white fur tinged with green as if moss has been growing over him, with antlers made of interwoven vines covered in blooming flowers of all colors. A rainbow rack, it's called. Once long ago he was worshipped as a god of protection, rewarding those living close with nature. Now all he protects is his own Grove, mostly forgotten by all except the oldest of druids. He is standoffish to an irrational degree towards all but the most reverent of druids.
    Stormpale: A very old, forgotten god of war and death, may be offspring of (insert your god of war). His appearance is a massive falcon (about the size of a young red dragon) whose feathers are so black they seem to drink the light. He appears as though he's a shadow in the sky, or rather, a shadow projected onto the sky. The only part of him that is not inky blackness are his red eyes, which don't so much glow as they seem to reflect light back in a red haze. Seeing him in the sky has long been considered a very ill omen, portending war, famine, or death of some sort. However, at this point, being forgotten for so long, he is simply lonely, and is content to have a conversation with anyone.
    Arachae Cythalia: roughly translated from deep speech meaning queen of spiders, Arachae Cythalia is a spider with an old hags face and human feet on each of its ten spider legs. Arachae Cythalia has been building a web from the deep realm to the material plane and she will soon achieve her goals. Arachae Cythalia believes she deserves to be the goddess of spiders and intents to kill the current god of spiders. Arachae Cythalia gives birth to a freakish human spider hybrid race that has not been seen by anyone in the material plane. The ettercap species is considered a perversion of spiderkin to Arachae Cythalia and plans to cause a mass extinction to all ettercaps.
    Dreamstalker Child: an undead entity that manifests primarily in dreams, travelling from one dreamer to the next. It appears as a young child with an indistinct face that cannot be remembered, wearing a tattered grey linen tunic. If the dreamer reacts with fear or hostility towards the child, it will begin stalking them during waking hours. Small knife cuts will appear on the stalked person's body. If they walk near a dark doorway, they will feel a small hand grab them and try to pull them inside.
    The Golden Thrush: a small, plump bird with large, inquisitive eyes. Its plumage is brilliant gold, with brown spots and a white underbelly. Its song is a sparkling high-pitched trill, audible for miles. It is actually a remnant of the consciousness of an ancient forest spirit. If it witnesses someone damaging the forest or attacking the native creatures therein, it defends its domain by diving at the trespasser at incredible speeds, plunging through their body like a bullet. If fed mistletoe berries, it will grant a boon and safe passage through its forest.
    Warden of Agathys: a large muscular devil with blue skin and horns made of ice as well as a pigs nose. The Warden of Agathys hold the flail of punishment which is a +3 flail that magically causes painful spasms. The Wardens job is to punish sinners who were vile enough to make it into such a deep layer. After doing the same job for three millennia The Warden has perfected the art of torture to a science.
    Duchess of Wasps: a giant wasp with a head set ablaze with purple fire. The Duchess of Wasps can speak telepathically to creatures and loves to feast on mortal flesh. The Duchess of Wasps very rarely allows for deals to be struck with mortals but when she feels generous she allows for them to get power in return for food that her children may eat. The Duchess of Wasps will lay eggs in her victims and wait for them to hatch. Her lair is filled with wasps and corpses of humanoids, goblins, trolls, dragons, beholders, etc. Legends say that The Duchess of Wasps was once a druid that has transformed into a creature as disgusting as her heart, others say she was the first wasp to ever fly, whatever her story is nobody can deny how old and how powerful she is with near impossibly potent venoms, acids, and Psionics capability.
    Epok, Tilin, and Merq: The Planestriders: A trio of Alhoons that travel between planes successfully hiding for decades at a time. Every thirty years, they return to the Material plane to repeat their ritualistic sacrifices to extend their lives. They target weary travelers on quiet secondary roads. The story of these planestriders is thousands of years old.
    Scourge: a giant reptilian beast from a time long before man existed. It resembles a Tyrannosaurus with wings and horns. It can use a sonic roar as a breath weapon and break down fortified walls. It is said any city he visits is depopulated and left in ruins.
    Gnorman, The Gnomish Sythesist Summoner: He's an incredibly old gnome who at this point cant survive outside of his eidolon and is incredibly powerful. He spends most of his time making discount magic gear and supplies for the needy. The eidolon takes the form of a large mass of black tentacles.
    The People's God: A sentient, if simple mind created on accident via the arcane architects when a great ritual tripled the size of their city overnight. The People's God, or 'Ol Watchful, as it's called colloquially, is omniscient within the walls of the city and can be asked questions via prayer, though the answers are vague at best, nonsensical at worst. It's whispered that a band of vigilantes and a handful of neighborhood watches have learned to access it's knowledge in a more precise manner, and will go to extreme lengths to keep that knowledge out of the hands of the law. Many have claimed to see Ol’ Watchful but appearances vary from story to story and usually come from unreliable sources.
    Heart of The Undead: a mass of black flesh and rotten plant matter located in the shadowfell. The Heart will convulse occasionally and create a wave of necrotic energy from its convulsion. Any non undead who are within a 200,000 foot radius of The Heart while it convulses will take 4d12 necrotic damage. Those who die from the necrotic wave are resurrected as zombies. It is uncertain of the connection between The Heart and undead as a whole but it seems like undead try to protect The Heart.
    Shatterquake: An ancient continent-sized Earth Elemental. It is said its steps could cause the very continental plates to shift. It slumbers now, and a family of Halflings have began unknowingly cultivating life from its back. One day, it may awaken.
    Yiith?: Long ago. when a cerebrilith devoured the mind of a minor god, its temple home was sealed away, the whole pocket dimension locked for eons and eons in fear of the demon leaking out divine secrets or power into the rest of the world. When the makeshift tomb was finally unsealed, all that was found besides bones and dust was a single sea snail, dull and healthy. It MIGHT be the cerebrilith Yiith, morphed into this inconspicuous form as a disguise or a side-effect of absorbing the god's magic. Either way, the explorers that raided the ancient home knew of its history, and have taken great care to ensure that this possibly-volatile creature stays under lock and key.
    Saurothid: What remains of an extremely powerful fiendish entity that was heavily wounded long ago. It is mindlessly spawing lesser monsters in its crippled state, and despite having powers that exceed even the most powerful wizards, it wants to die and will not actively resist against the party trying to kill it. Though it’s endless army of lesser devils and its aura of heat and darkness will still make killing Saurothid a difficult task.
    Fuishtar: known by some as The Great Scorcher, Fuishtar is a gargantuan fire elemental that can speak directly to the god of war. Fuishtar is a servant to the god of war and is used as a messenger by the god of war. There is a legend of a battlefield where both sides prayed for the removal of a tarrasque so that they may fight. Their prayers were answered and Fuishtar stayed the monstrosity, the cost of his services is that all tarrasque from them onward had immunity to fire.
    The Illumin: They are not known to engage with humans openly. But now and then, those who went spelunking or miners trapped in caves found themselves either led out by a mysterious light being. Or sometimes, led deeper in. The stories told around them are often suggestive that when someone becomes trapped in the dark, they measure a person by whether or not they bring light to others. Then choose to appear and lead them to whatever the Illumin wish them to see. Perhaps it is safety or their end. But whether or not the beings truly gauge such things or if they are each with their own whims and choices is not known to mortals. The Illumin themselves are creatures of the dark, deep, and below places. They are often compared to feyfolk or changelings but some scholars have theorized they share things in common with bioluminscent cave mushrooms or spores. They disappear in areas of light, and can shape themselves as they wish. Another more accepted theory is that they are the result of hallucinations and that they do not truly exist.
    Jack O’The Roadside: A tall, pale human man in patched suit who casts no shadow. He is seen by travellers on the side of the road at night, playing a golden harp and inviting them to dance. Should they dance his beautiful melody he will begin to up in tempo until it’s the fastest song in all the lands. It is said that those who can keep up with Jack are granted good luck for 7 years but those who fail encounter naught but misfortunes.
    Altabach: A large snake, in the upper range of an anaconda, with off-white scales and black eyes, fangs, and tailtip. Letters and words crawl over his skin like living text. He hoards secrets, and will answer two questions in return for the tongue of one's lover and the liver of a faithful hound.
    Stro The Patient: An immense egg that, at first glance, appears to be made of stone. It is sunk partway into the ground, and lichen grows over its surface. No one is certain for how long it has lain there, but there is no doubt it is alive: it's surface is warm to the touch, and a slow pulse, almost like a heartbeat can be felt by those standing near to it. Those living in its proximity may find themselves falling under its psychic influence and performing strange tasks. The ultimate goal of the unborn creature, as long as if and when the egg hatch, remain unknown.
    Mother Hornwort: Ancient even by hag standards, Mother Hornwort's hunched figure emanates an aura of power. She rides a giant stork as a mount, and has been known to feed it those she dislikes. She is avoided by sensible folk, but other hags sometimes seek her out for her knowledge, services, or to offer supplication in hopes of earning her favour.
    The Giants Shadow: a peryton that has survived thousands of years feeding on hearts and slowly growing. The creature is now larger than a wyvern and its shadow resembles a giant instead of a human.
    Soul of Winter: a glowing blue light in the shape of a woman that appears on the coldest night in winter. Many have theories on who she is and why she comes but they all vary from culture to culture. One culture believes she collects the souls of the dead to be judged, another says she is a frost hag that revels in making the coldest nights even colder, some say she’s an illusion brought by frigid weather on the eyes of naive travelers, no one will really know for certain.
    Umaraka: a gargantuan sea serpent that guards the entrance into the abyss. Umaraka is worshipped as a god of darkness and the sea by many cultists. Umaraka can speak to its followers through dreams, usually asking for more living creatures to be sacrificed in its name.
    The Forgotten King: a once great king that fell upon a curse that would slowly turn him into a god of madness. The gods knew that while they could stop his horrid new form from arising they couldn’t help but watch as the abomination unfolded before their eyes out of morbid curiosity. The forgotten king has been cursed for 500,00 years now and looks like a deformed werewolf, having one hand being larger than the other, a horn protruding from his eye socket, sickly white colored fur, and pure white eyes. The Forgotten King has never transcended into godhood for the other gods refused to allow it. He now waits in his castles ruins waiting for his daughter (who’s been dead for many many centuries) to come back from her coronation as princess (an event that happened when he was still happy). Hearing him ramble on about how proud he is and how he will celebrate with tea can bring any man to tears.
    Sabaramha, The Dark Empyrean - The daughter of Tharizdun, Sabaramha is a six armed empyrean exceptionally talented in swords and life magic. Instead of the normal healing abilities that life magic would normally imply, Sabaramha's skills lie in the manufacture of diseases that can wipe out civilizations or the forced evolution of violent magical beasts.
    Oreglai, Shadow of Death - Oreglai appears as a giant rotting crow with a 2 mile long wingspan. All plants caught in its shadow wither and die, while creatures are afflicted with a horrible despair that can cause suicidal thoughts. Oreglai is infested with billions of insects that often reach gigantic sizes.
    Krullajer, The Fear Tyrant - This golden great wyrm turned shadow dragon feeds of fear itself. Fearing Krullajer himself will empower him and grant him immortality. Whereas, simple fear in general will also strengthen him, yet to a smaller degree. To seal away Krullajer, the gods built a magical artifact to make everyone and everything forget him. This artifact becomes more fragile as general worry, doubt, and fear spread across the world.
    Asherl-Khan, The Guilt of Gods - Khan, the former god of glory, was slain and reanimated as this undead husk of a god. Khan's artifact, The Mantle of Glory was also transformed into The Mantle of Guilt which now exhales an impossibly black fog that reanimates the fallen and converts undead into following Asherl-Khan's will. The other gods were too ashamed to face their former friend and thus had Sigil's Lady of Pain seal him away in one of her mazes.
    Voltius the Eternal: the oldest known vampire of the world. His large age and the gigantic quantities of blood he consummed granted him god-like abilities relate to his condition. He can smell any warm-blooded creature in a 3km radius, control blood with telekinetic power, making him able to slow down heart-rates, extracting precise quantity of blood, giving blood related diseases, etc..., shapeshift into anything, turn invisible, and is immune to any anti-vampires techniques. You can see his reflection in mirrors, holy water feels like water to him, he can go anywhere no matter if he was invited or not, sunlight doesn't do anything to him...The list goes on.
    The Renegade God: A Nameless God who, in ancient times, sided against his fellows Gods. His name was erased from history, an he was chained deep beneath the earth.
    The King of Flames: A powerful Titan residing in a blinding palace on the back of a giant Phoenix, by which he travels the world.
    The Three-Faced Tree: An enormous and ancient oak with three humanoid faces protruding from it. They will answer any question: one of the faces always tells the truth, one tells what the traveler would want to hear, and the last one always lies.
    Xurv: a death tyrant located somewhere in the abyss. Xurv has no grand scheme or plan to conquer, he simply enjoys inflicting pain. Xurv will float above the abyss scouring one layer at a time trying to find demons. When Curv finds one he shoots a laser at it obliterating any trace of its existence.
    Pam: a frail old human woman who just never seems to die. She has outlived her children, grand children, great grandchildren and so on for so many generations, but the pain of loss just doesn't seem to dissipate. This has left her a bitter old woman. She holds intimate knowledge of ancient societies because, well, she lived there and she often yearns for the "good old days" when only sorcerers could make fire and magic couldn't be learned by any idiot who could open a book. She has attempted and failed at ending her own life and having it ended for her by provocation, but recently she has altered her strategy in life and is using her knowledge to indugle in a little necromancy. If she won't die, then neither will her great-great-great-great-great-great-grand children. If she succeeds, she will be united with her huge extended, risen again, family.
    The Forge: The Forge is a sentient entity...a golem of sorts. The Forge acts more as a portal when a hero commits their first great deed (I.e. slaying a dragon or protecting a kingdom) the Forge will appear out of nowhere, often emerging from nearby water sources of from the shadows. its 12-foot tall stature consumes the hero and they wake up within the Forge. They have the honor of watching the forge create their very own custom magical weapon.
    Old Rambler: A bark-encrusted quadrupedal humanoid with a skull that channels it's slow breaths through pipe-like protusions. It’s breath acts as a thick fog and any living thing that breathes in the fog takes constant acid damage, but is revived with increased vitality an hour after leaving it's presence. The Old Rambler wanders slowly through the swamps of which it is considered a patron.
    The Walker: Nobody's sure of this being's real name, or even what they look like; the Walker has appeared as male, female, elven, human, dragonborn, and many other races besides. Regardless of their form, the Walker is always found walking down a road or path, surrounded by golden motes of light. They have never been seen leaving or arriving anywhere. If the Walker is spoken to politely, they will reply and offer to grant the person "a light to watch their path". When the person accepts, one of the lights that surround the Walker will start orbiting them instead, and will keep doing so until they die (when it flies off in a straight line, presumably back to the Walker.) If questioned about the direction of their journey or why they have lived so long, they will reply, "Does the walker choose the path, or the path the walker?"
    The Myriad Faced One: a colossal entity that has tens of faces and hundreds of arms. He lived for trillions of years and is located at the intersection of all the planes of the multiverse. His goal is to fusion all planes to create a single perfectly balanced plane.
    Ugami: the first ever skeleton, sometimes called the ever-living warrior. Ugami had made a pact with a warlock to remain living forever so he can fight for eternity. The wizard agreed and now Ugami lives in an ancient dungeon waiting for his next foe. Centuries underground has left Ugami completely insane.
    Melezabeth: A severed undead head of an ancient giant, kept unliving only by its unsatiable gluttony. It has no bowels and everything it devours comes right through it, chewed and dropped from between all tangled sinews and veins that hang from its stump of a neck, all resembling grotesque tentacles and pseudopods. Melezabeth is mostly immobile, sitting atop of the ancient bottomless well, losing all its meals to the void beneath it. It can crawl, albeit very slowly. It can't be satiated, even with the help of its many cultists, which sacrifice countless victims to Melezabeth's all-devouring maw. Its minions suckle black goo from its disguisting arteries, like lambs of an undead goat, which gives them supernatural strength to do Melezabeth's bidding. They say the head has hypnotic abilities and when fought, it will often cannibalize its minions to instantly regenerate portions of health, catching prey with veiny tentacles and shooting nauseating goo from its swollen body.
    The Cottage: Deep in the Far Realm, protected by an unbreakable bubble of force, lies a small, picturesque, thatched country cottage, floating on an floating island of land with a small pasture for two or three sheep, a small wooden shed, and a vegetable garden. Two elderly humans can occasionally be seen, puttering about the garden, milking the sheep, or caring for the cottage in some way. Ancient tomes and beings with such knowledge describe them simply as The Husband and The Wife, but that is largely the entirety of knowledge about them. They, or similar beings, have lived in The Cottage unchanged for millennia. The bubble in which they exist is utterly unbreachable, even by divine power or spells that effect the nature of reality itself, such as Wish. Any attempts to reach the inside of the bubble result in the breacher being hurled from the area with insane speed and force. Anyone attempting to contact the couple through the bubble will be greeted with friendly nods and waves, but no other attempts at communication.
    The Abstract: The result of a failed attempt at Lichdom. The wizard was left a torn and deformed being; immortal but cut off from magic. They cannot cast spells of their own. Instead their aura perverts the magic of those around them. Twisting and tainting the effects of spells and magic items or weapons.
    Chirpy: A delightfully round songbird. Nobody can fully identify its species but know it to be a magical being of some kind. Chirpy is a primordial creature and despite having powerful magical potential still has the mind of a bird. They cannot be killed permanently by anything short of a god and when out of sight are capable of traveling from one point to another in an instant. Chirpy finds people interesting and will follow anyone who shows it affection.
    Liliveth: An ancient Oracle of a long forgotton deity who lives on an island in the middle of the ocean. She represents the turning between day and has two presences: She who walks the light, and she who walks the dark. She resides in two temples built into opposite halves of a mountain. The light temple is filled with light and magic based puzzles. The night temple is filled with dangers and fights taking place in magical darkness. At the end of each, she is sitting upon a throne. Small and frail but radiating with power. In the light, she will answer any three questions you ask, three answers, two truths, and one falsehood. In the dark, she will answer one question per individual, but the answer always rings true, and the asker may not like the answer. After a group leaves her temples, they will not open their doors again for anyone for 1,000 cycles of sun and moon.
    83: The Savior: a 7 foot tall angelic being with large white eagle wings, unnaturally pale skin, and no face. The Savior is rarely seen and seldom heard of. When a hero is doomed The Savior will come down and protect them from the fatal blow. Some say The Savior is a solar of the goddess of fortune but it is impossible to say for certain. Sightings of The Savior go back farther than elven history.
    84. Keeper of The Body: a large grey mass that gives off immense amounts of heat and exists just beyond the edge of the universe. Very few have spoken to it but those who have had to pass an intense trail of strength to unlock a stone door with celestial writings saying “I Feel All”. Those who have spoken to The Body gain a feat called Fragment of the body which grants the creature +2 constitution and advantage on constitution saves. The Body tells all it meets that it must reunite with its kin.
    85. Keeper of The Mind: a large blue crystal with other crystals attached to it resembling a pattern that gives off a strange sense of pressure and exists just beyond the edge of the universe. Very few have spoken to it but those who have had to pass a difficult trail of mental fortitude to unlock a stone door with celestial writings saying “I Know All”. Those who have spoken to The Mind gain a feat called Fragment of the mind which grants the creature +2 intelligence and advantage on intelligence saves. The Mind tells all it meets that it must reunite with its kin.

kid quests
    "I don't think Daddy is Daddy anymore."
    A dirty and disheveled street urchin, appears <8 years old approaches you, holding a small baby. “Do you wants ta buy my sis’er so’s I can buy food?”
    "My imaginary friend won't stop hurting people.... He's standing right behind you. He says you're next."
    A child had all his pocket money stolen by a local youth gang. He offers street information if you return the money.
    "There's a boogieman in my closet..."
    You promise a child to find his/her toy, which leads to you finding a Secret society of sentient toys (or whatever toy story plot you want to put into your game)
    There’s a war between the boys and the girls factions in town and you can join either side or resolve the conflict.
    Children slaves are revolting inside a mine and a kid is asking you to help them.
    My doll doesn't like me anymore
    An orphan traveling with a group of gypsies can’t find his most beloved companion, his jet-black cat.
    I owe my life to the blacksmith - well whats left my life. Sure he saved me but a moment to late before the [monster] took my leg. He will save my life for free but won't make me a peg leg with out payment.
    If I were a few years older, I would ask that girl out. I would shower her with gifts and riches and she would like me. She said if I got her gold she would leave town with me. Sarah is a beautiful girl who should get out of here as soon as it is safe. I need money for safe passage and to win her over.
    All the children in a town seem tired and nervous. Upon questioning, you discover that all of the children have been having nightmares every night.
    Every child in town got a particular toy from a traveling merchant a month ago, except for one child, whose family was either too poor or were out of town when the toy was being sold. Now the child is unpopular because they don't have this toy.
    Can you kill the owner of the orphanage in Riften?
    There's something evil in this town and none of the grown-ups seem to notice care. We call it the Copper Sage. We...we think it is going to kill us.
    I know it's getting dark but I can't go home. My friend lost her necklace near the edge of the Swamp. She's gonna get a whoopin if she lost it!
    I heard there was an owlbear in the woods. I'll give you my shiniest rock if you help me pet it!
    I told my friend I beat up an owlbear and now they're asking for proof!
    "I think my poor doggy ran into the woods last night... I would have looked for him if the noises weren't so loud. Can you find him for me, please?"
    my dad went to the store to get some milk last week and never came home! can you help me find him?
    As the party crosses a small bridge, they here the sound of soft sobbing beneath. If they investigate, they find what seems to be a human boy of no more than 12 years of age. But before their eyes, he seems to change.As the party crosses a small bridge, they here the sound of soft sobbing beneath. If they investigate, they find what seems to be a human boy of no more than 12 years of age. But before their eyes, he seems to change.At one moment he's a boy, the next moment a girl or a non binary. He may appear human at first, but change into a dwarf or a tiefling randomly. Sometimes he'll have a random assortment of features and appear as some sort of horrific amalgam.In his anguish, he asks the party "please help me."This boy is a doppelganger who has just reached puberty. He and his parents had no idea of his heritage, so he doesn't really understand what's happening or how to control his shape shifting. His parents kicked him out because they were afraid of the monster he had became.
    A small child, maybe eight years old (girl or boy), begs you with tears in their eyes to help them find their beloved “puppy” that was a secret from their parents and tied up in the woods. Somehow the rope has snapped, or been chewed through, and the puppy has run off.The adventurers track the puppy to a dark cave.The child calls out to it and it slowly emerges.It is a Death Dog.
    A very young child <4 went to the market with their brother/sister and has now lost them.They find the elder child stumbling around with a black eye and a scar on his cheek, the young child gives them a daisy chain necklace for their help but apologizes for only having one. If they try to help the elder child they find a group of children that are being abused at the local orphanage are taking their pain out on others. Should they help the orphans they are taught a phrase the orphans use to signal each-other that someone is to be helped if possible meaning they have a bunch of scouts, pickpockets and distractions in combat should they require them while in the city
    You look strong. Can you teach me karate so big kids don't bully me anymore?
    Kid walks up to you, one leg stretched out trailing behind him, bobbing and slapping against the cobblestone road. You can’t see where the leg ends - it stretches out around houses and trees, disappearing into the horizon. “Hey, you look strong - can you help me get my foot unstuck?” Idiot is a changeling, and got his ankle stuck between some rocks 3 miles away in the Enchanted Woods. He didn’t realize he could just shift his leg smaller to get it out from between the rocks, and won’t understand no matter how many times someone explains it to him. His mom is a good baker though... Cinnamon-Apple Pie for your troubles?
    All the kids play with this one bully, but obviously (except to them), they hate it. When asked why, they say that the kids who didn’t disappeared. There is a Boneclaw bound to the child, who needs to be dealt with.
    A kid is the only survivor of a house fire. She insists you go back and find the “scary dragon” who did it. Let the party prepare for a dragon fight. When you get there, an old woman is playing with the girl in the ruins. The woman is an Annis Hag, and the “kid” is a Goblin Feylock (use the warlock of the archfey in VGTM but make it small and give it Nimble Escape). Then they, with the help of the rest of a group of goblins, attack. When the players dispose of enough goblins, the hag gloats about having eaten the kid already, and how she will make a great hag. She then attempts to leave in the old woman’s guise, and you need to catch her as she flees through the village, and tricks innocent village people into covering her escape.
    Infant asks party "Where daddy?". A man can be seen nearby covering his face with his hands. At this point, the man uncovers his face and says "peek-a-boo!" or silently stands there, continuing to cover his face until forced to pull his hands away, revealing...
    A child has been given a chore by his/her parents but doesn't want to, choosing to ask you to do it instead.
    The children of the village swear there's a strange nude woman that appears in the night, behaving erratically, who won't speak and gives gifts of random trinkets to some children - no one else sees her. If the party chooses to investigate they will discover that it is a local stray cat that turns human on the new moon trying to repay those who've been good to her.
    "Daddy/Grandpa [the king] sent you to kill the dragon? Oh please don't! It's all my fault. The dragon isn't after the treasury, it's after my friend and me. We...took something from it." Discover the hatched dragonling under the prince's bed...
    “The lizard man stole my Toy!”
    A child at the inn spy’s on the party for some time. After 1d4 day’s, the child (one of a dwindling number of children who remain) is caught by/introduces themselves to/leaves a note for the party, hinting that the party is in an entire town of doppelgangers and they will be next to be “replaced.”
    “Ma says that sis ain’t right in t’ head an put ‘er down inna ol’ well. Help me git ‘er out?” (Sister is in the process of transforming into or is possessed by <monster>; the old well leads into a mini dungeon which sister is escaping from/ is the boss of)
    A child speaks to other children in the hearing of the party. “It’s true! There was laughter in the walls last night! And when I looked under the bed there was a hole in the floor that wasn’t there this morning!”
    Two children are struggling to get something largish, squirming and wrapped in a blanket into a window. When the party investigates, they find a badly wounded young phasebeast, which the children wanted to keep as a pet after they healed it. The party knows the pack will be coming for it.
    The party finds a badly beaten child. He/she swears vengeance on the ones who did it to them. Turns out they are actually a changeling halfling assassin and they are now bent on revenge against an entire town.
    "My mommy won't let me play with rex anymore!" Rex is a dragonborn warlord who lost his memory He hangs out just outside of town as he isn't welcome inside after he killed a bounty hunter in self defense.
    Please sir, you have to help me! My mom went into the cellar yesterday, and haven't got out since. Nobody believes me. They call me liar.
    (a toddler sitting, crying, in the middle of house that had been burned down. The ruins are still hot. The kid is unharmed)
    'Ey Wanna play hide'nseek? I bet you won't be able to find me.
    "Mommy is dating a new daddy and she loves him a whole lot...so much that she told me to leave and never come back" (I was thinking Incubus or maybe Vampire)
    Party comes across a child crying in front of a house. "Mommy said I'm not real, and told me to bring her child back but I'M her child" The mother has a curse or illness similar to Capgras Delusion up to you if it can be cured in dnd

new cards
    The Maiden- A random person you have met throughout your adventure becomes hopelessly, obsessively in love with you
    The Wizard- You may choose a spell from the first level list of wizard spells and once per day that spell may be cast without expending a spell slot. Using it at higher tiers still uses higher tier spell slots.
    The Mountain- You permanently grow by one size class. The only way to undo this is a wish spell.
    Sloth (As in the Sin)- You fall into a deep sleep and will not wake by any normal method. You are magically sustained and your body does not age while this effect is active.
    The Mime - You lose the ability to speak. Can only be cured by a wish spell (By TheDirtyDeal)
    The Sun - You glow brilliantly like the sun and shed bright light in a 60 foot radius around you, and dim light up to 180 feet. (By TheDirtyDeal)
    The Comedian - +2 To charisma skill checks and saving throws. -1 to all others. (By QuintTheWarlock)
    Wrath: You gain the flaw "I am quick to anger, driven to extract vengeance from those who have wronged me and a real bear first thing in the morning." (By oddtwang)
    Greed: all non-magical coins, trade goods and other currency, gemstones and art objects on your person, held in your containers (including e.g. a bag of holding), stored within your legal property or held on your behalf in a bank or other institution under your name are instantly replicated 10 times. The copies are identical and indistinguishable, including any identifying features, flaws or serial numbers. If there is insufficient space for them to be held, the objects spill out, rupture or otherwise force their way into the world. (By oddtwang)
    Gluttony: You develop an insatiable hunger. Your normal requirements for sustenance are doubled and you find it difficult to stop consuming. If you do not currently require sustenance, or if you are unable to satisfy your newly increased needs for 48 hours, you develop a need to consume something unusual, taboo or difficult to acquire. (By oddtwang)
    The Void- (opposite of the Sun) Light seems to dim when you are around. If you are in bright light, it becomes dim light for a 60 ft radius around you. If you are in dim light, it become dark for a 60 ft radius around you. Creatures can not see you, unless they have true sight, if you are in dim light. (Similar to the Darkness spell) (By CreepShowGirl666)
    Serpents: You immediately contract a poison that will kill you in 1d10 days. The only way to cure it is with a potato from a different continent. [Your character and party know this] (By LongIslandBall)
    The Orchard:You gain an apple, that, when bitten into, heals itself over time, effectively granting you infinite food. However, if another person were to bite the apple, it would become just a normal apple. [Your character does not know this.] (By LongIslandBall)
    4 Leaf Clover: the card turns into a 4 leaf clover that is unaffected by the use of force or magic and can only be destroyed by the use of the wish spell or Divine intervention. The creature in possession of this clover is imbued with great luck and gains the following abilities. You may pick one ability where any ability checks, skill checks, attack rolls, or saving throws that you make using that skill automatically succeed for 24 hours. Using this feature drains the available luck from the artifact for 1d4+1 days rendering it useless for that amount of time after the 24 hours expire. Once per day, you can change any dice roll you make excluding d100 to be equal to x-1 where x is the number of sides on the dice. This must be done prior to finding out the result of the action intended by the roll. Once per short or long rest, you have advantage on one ability check and one saving throw of your choice. (By Ed_Radley)
    Lust- Every person you meet of the opposite sex must make a dc10 wisdom saving throw or immediately try to seduce you from now on.
    The Orchestra: summons 20 unseen servants that repeat everything you say/sing. If you cast a spell with a verbal component, it counts as being one level higher if applicable. You also have advantage on performance checks. The Unseen servants do not obey your commands and last until killed. (By Capt_Bread_Beard)
    The Liar - you gain advantage on Deception checks but you are unable to tell the truth — your party has to roll Insight checks whenever you reveal to them information (By Researcher_Boi_314)
    The Crystal: Your skin crystallizes. Your speed decreases by 5 feet and you are put under the effect of a stoneskin spell. (By ThanosHeffley)
    Uno Reverse Card - Allows the user to hold up the card to deflect things back at the person who the card is facing, once per short or long rest. (By Abs0lutely_N0thing)
    The Cornicopia: you no longer need to eat, drink, sleep, or breathe, and you do not age. (By Clickclacktheblueguy)
    The Fates: You gain the Lucky feat, but you have also gained The Fates disdain. When you re-roll your dice using the Lucky feat roll an additional 1d4 and subtract it from your new roll. (By True_Empire91)
    The Smith: This card immediately transforms into a +3 Warhammer that deals an additional 1d8 fire damage on a hit. The person who drew this card becomes proficient with Warhammers and loses all other weapon proficiencies. (By True_Empire91)
    The Coin: Immediately after drawing this card the users hand is burned and takes 1d4 damage and drops the card as a reaction to the pain. As the card is falling to the floor it transforms into a coin. If the coin lands face up (Heads) the person who drew this card doubles the amount of currency they are carrying. If the coin lands face down (Tails) the person who drew this card has their currency vanish. The Coin itself is now worth 50gp. (By True_Empire91)
    The Beast: Once per day, you can Wildshape. Upon transforming back into your normal self you take 1 point of Exhaustion. (By True_Empire91)
    The Leviathan: A great beast has your scent. It will arrive in 1d10+5 days or at the DM’s choosing. Only you can slay the beast and all damage not caused by you directly or indirectly (such as through traps) is halved. (By Astr0C4t)
    The Casino: You are transported to the demiplane of luck. This demiplane consists of a silver road in a desert with extravagant casinos glowing with displays of light against the permanent night sky. The casinos themselves are owned by the permanent residents of the plane, known as the Casino Barons. Barons include everything from human crime bosses to powerful wealthy monsters such as cloud giants, red dragons, and genies. The casino's appearances match with the baron or baroness who owns it. (By Sporedian)
    The Blank: When you draw this blank card it begins to emit bright light and smoke, than dissapear along with whatever equipment you had on you. The card then drops to the floor. The next person to pick up the card sees a stylized image of you printed on it. They will recieve an item, ability, or personality trait from your character sheet at the GM's descretion. The effects can be reversed with a wish spell. (By Sporedian)
    The hermit: You gain disavantage on any charisma checks. You gain advantage on any wisdom checks. Can be undone by a wish spell. (By awesomemanswag)
    The Clock. You gain a small tattoo of an oddly-shaped arrow somewhere on your body. The tattoo is imbued with magical power, and will appear as a transmutation effect when viewed with Detect Magic. As an action, you may invoke this power to cast Time Stop. Once the spell ends, the power is lost forever. (By Ae3qe27u)
    Judgement - you forever feel sickened when in the presence of evil-aligned people, and forever anxious around those of chaotic alignment. (By ergotofwhy)
    Temperence - you can no longer feel intoxicated, no matter how much you drink. Furthermore, you are made immune to damage/drain of your int, wis, and cha, but also immune to effects that raise those abilities (By ergotofwhy)
    The world - you are teleported to a random location on the other side of the world (By ergotofwhy)\
    The Pack, 1d6 hell hounds come every 1d10 days to try and bring the person who drew the card down to the nine hells. The player can hear the howls, and is frightened for 1d4 rounds when they come. (By MeerkatArray)
    The Blind Man: your character is now permanently blinded, physically losing their eyes, and gains tremorsense up to 30 feet. (By Silverdragon701)
    The Artist: your character is now exceptionally skilled in a random art(painting, cooking, singing, etc.) and is known around the world for their talent. (By Silverdragon701)
    The Fib: your character is now a pathological liar and must make a Wisdom saving throw to tell the truth about anything their audience doesn’t already know(I.E, can state the obvious, but must roll to explain a plan or tell a secret truthfully). (By Silverdragon701)
    The goblin: Permanently gain +2 to dexterity and Constitution Permanently lose -2 to charisma and intelligence (By fwimmygoat)
    The Mirror- whoever draws this card immediately understands to an instinctual, spiritual, emotional, and/or philosophical degree why their most hated enemy/enemies are the way they are and are doing what they're doing. They are able to completely sympathise. (By AndrewRequiem)
    The behemoth- when next the character is slain in battle, they shall rise again with temporary hit points double that of the nearest healthy enemy. For the battle, they lose the ability to cast spells, but their Strength score temporarily increases to 30 (+10). When the last nearby enemy dies, they return to normal, and are rendered unconscious, but stable at 1 hit point. (By RollinThundaga)
    The Mask: You immediately, and permanently change races into a random race. You retain all of your memories of your previous life, but lose all ability score changes and abilities your previous race granted you. You gain all ability score increases and/or abilities that this new race grants you. (NoireGarde)
    Dead weight - a 5 ton steel cube appears with shackle welded onto it. you are shackled to it. you cant move five feet from the cube until its shackle is removed. if it is removed, the cube and shackle disappear. (By Tobymaxgames
    The fondler - you can cast mage hand if you couldn't before. this doesn't require a spell slot. (By Tobymaxgames)
    The substrate - a boulder, weighing 3d12 tons appears in above a random person around you, and promptly falls down. its made of some type of metal ore. it its in your possession, and you may do what you will with it. (By Tobymaxgames)
    The captain - if the drawer of the card owns some type of vehicle (cart, boat, etc.), they will physically merge with that vehicle. a wish spell is undo the merge. (By Tobymaxgames)
    The Holdout - after drawing, the location you take a long rest at is converted into some type of fortified structure. the structure takes a form that makes scene for its location. a forest will grow a great tree fort. fields become palisade camps. mountains spring forth castles to rock the heavens. caves dig themselves out and become elaborate dungeons. the one who draws the card is considered the owner of this structure. however, 3d10 days later, the structure is attacked by some force. it can be a powerful wizard, a dragon, an ork warband, etc. if the structure is not defended, that force will destroy it. (By Tobymaxgames)
    The Jinx - You are rendered mute until someone says your name three times. You cannot speak or cast any verbal spells during this time. (Your party does not know this). (By Jorster)
    Greater Balance - The next time you roll a d20 and roll a critical success or fail, you receive an outcome beyond all expectations. The impossible happens despite all likelihood. Example: On a success, the Queen not only agrees with your theories and plans for the coming battle but trusts you over her advisors. On a fail, the Queen looks disgusted at your sad attempt of sharing information and banishes you to the dungeon for your ignorance just to get you out of the way. Should a critical success happen during combat, the number of damage dice is multiplied by 4 instead of 2, but if a critical fail happens, you or an ally are damaged by double the dice. This affect is a one time use. (By WitchDearbhail)
    Null: The deck of many things vanishes. (By Sirvantis)
    Discord: For the next hour your character cannot speak common, elvish, gnomish, dwarven, etc.(By Sirvantis)
    Yes: For the next two weeks your character cannot decline any offers for samples, work, quests, magic items, etc. and cannot say the word "no" or similar. (By Sirvantis)
    Butterflies: A force of immense change you may use this card to change one small moment in the past. This will have rippling effects through time to the present day. Choose wisely. (By faerieunderfoot)
    The Damned- you are immediately teleported to one of the nine hells roll a D10 on the roll of a 10 you are trapped between two of the hells roll two more D10 and reroll all 10s. (By minecraftchickenman)
    Surface: Your body and soul are bound to a random humanoid within 60 feet, determined by the GM. Your appearance changes to match that of the chosen humanoid and neither of you may move more then 120 feet away from each other, and attempting to do so will result in running against an invisible wall. A Greater Restoration or Remove Curse spell cast at 5th level or higher on either one of you ends both effects. (By Cruye)
    Talking Head: You become incapable of saying, writing, or otherwise expressing a truthfull message instead, any attempt to do so will result in you telling a lie instead, usually the opposite of what you meant. You are not affected by the Zone of Truth spell, as these lies are not deliberate. A Greater Restoration or Remove Curse spell cast at 5th level or higher on either one of you ends the effect. (By Cruye)
    Father: A Will-o'-Wisp (MM 301) with the memories, mental ability scores and alignment of a deceased relative appears within 10 feet and is bound to you as a familliar. The Will-o'-Wisp acts independently of you, but it always obeys your commands. In combat, it rolls its own initiative and acts on its own turn. It can't attack and loses the Shock action, but it can take other actions as normal. As an action, you can temporarily dismiss your familiar. It disappears into a pocket dimension where it awaits your summons. As an action while it is temporarily dismissed, you can cause it to reappear in any unoccupied space within 30 feet of you. If the Will-o'-Wisp dies, it is gone forever. (By Cruye)
    Experience: Your mind speeds up, enhancing your senses and reflexes but leaving you more exposed to mental assault. You gain advantage on Dexterity saving throws and Wisdom (Perception) checks, but gain disadvantage on Wisdom saving throws and vulnerability to psychic damage. A Greater Restoration spell can end this effect. (By Cruye)
    Door: A magical book appears in your posession, containing the entirety of your memories written on it's pages, even ones you have forgotten through non-magical means. The book updates itself whenever you finish a long rest. Turning a page will always take you to the memory you'd like to see, and the book will always appear to be the same size, regardless of how many pages it has. You or a creature that has stolen the book can modify your memory by writing on the book, either writing fake memories or crossing or tearing out real ones. If the book is completely destroyed, you lose all your memories for 1 week, before getting them back, excluding fake memories from the book, and including memories that were removed from the book. (By Cruye)
    Diamond: You can cast the Creation, Greater Restoration, Mass Cure Wounds or Wall of Stone spells once per day. (By Cruye)
    Company: You gain the service of twelve Guards (MM 347) who appear in a space you choose within 30 feet of you. The guards are of the same race as you and serve you loyally until death, believing the fates have drawn them to you. (By Cruye)
    The Death Note- The first name that is written on this card immediately dies, no saving throw. (By warriornate)
    The infant- Your character immediately turns into a newborn baby. (By warriornate)
    The Mirror- An exact duplicate of the PC pulling this card is instantly created somewhere in the world. This copy has one purpose, to supplant the PC that pulled the card. The copy is indistinguishable from the PC in every visible way, and is physically in essence that PC. This copy differs only in that they believe that pulling the card sent them across the world and supplanted THEM with a copy located at the DOMT. This copy can accomplish supplanting the PC using any method (Violent, non violent, etc) that they wish as long as the final result is taking the place of the original PC. For rules purposes this created copy is the same level, class, and alignment as the PC that drew the card, and has access to all of the items that PC had on their person when drawing the Mirror. (By HimurasanX)
    The Fish - The character reeks of fish in a way that cannot be masked or removed. Additionally, any dead fish with the Beast creature type that the character touches, comes back to life as if had the True Resurrection spell cast on it. All Kuo-Toa are made aware of and believe in this effect on the character making it unremovable, even against the wish spell, except by the complete genocide of all Kuo-Toa. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
    Mystery - Something extraordinary has happened, but the players don't know what. The DM will roll randomly to determine if it is a good, bad, or neutral thing for the players and decide what it is in secret. Regardless of the roll the event will have a significant effect on the entire region (if not the whole world) and, upon encountering the event, the character who drew the card will be made aware drawing this card was the cause. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
    Wayfinder - A gate to another dimension appears before the character. This gate connects to the GM's choice of Sigil, The Outlands, The Astral Plane, or another Material Plane. Regardless of the GM's choice, the other side of this gate is guarded by both an Androsphinx and a Gynosphinx that the players will need to bypass in order to freely pass through the gate. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
    Destruction - 8 bolts of chaotic energy fly out of the card extremely fast and attack all creatures within a 120ft radius sphere centered on where the card was drawn. The bolts acquire targets randomly each round and make a single attack at initiative 20. The attack is a ranged spell attack with +7 to the attack roll and deal 2d8 + 6d6 damage. Each orb deals a different type of one these 8 damage types: Acid, Cold, Fire, Force, Lightning, Poison, Psychic, Thunder. The bolts cannot be harmed or dispelled, do not attack anything that leaves the sphere, and disappear after 1 minute. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
    Creation - Immediately after drawing this card the player who drew it chooses one item that they can create as if they had cast the Fabrication spell and it appears before them. No material components for the crafted item are required and the casting time is instant. Players who don't know how to make anything can create a single item of raw materials such a log or cube of gold. They must still meet the dimension requirements of the Fabrication spell. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
    Animosity - From now on all creatures the character encounters with intelligence 6 or greater are initially hostile towards the character. This effect does not change their opinion of the character's companions and does not necessarily mean they will attack on sight. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
    Friendship - From now on all creatures the character encounters with intelligence 6 or greater are initially friendly towards the character. This effect does not change their opinion of the character's companions and does not mean they will treat them as an equal. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
    The Dragon - The entire contents of the nearest dragon's horde is placed before you. Immediately after, the dragon is made aware of your name, appearance and current location. The dragon believes you culpable and cannot be convinced otherwise. (By rstarr13)
    The Rose- the card puller gains a +3 to all charisma skill tests for 24 hours (By infinitum3d)
    The Flood- a soft gentle rain slowly grows over the next hour into a torrential downpour that follows the card puller, centered over then the entire hour. (By infinitum3d)
    The Fop- for one hour, you fail every skill test, attack roll, and saving throw. You cannot succeed at anything. (By infinitum3d)
    The Reward- for one hour, you have the exact funds to purchase anything you want. Just reach into your backpack and the gold coins are there. (By infinitum3d)
    The Flumph - After 1d4 hours a Flumph painlessly grows from your body and detaches itself. The Flumph is completely loyal to you and you gain the ability to communicate with it and other Flumphs telepathically. If a Flumph dies two more Flumphs will grow from your body in 1d4 hours; this process continues until you have accumulated twelve Flumps. When the twelveth Flumph dies you magically transform into a Flumphp yourself, keeping all your statistics and abilities. (By clivedauthi)
    Granite skin: +2 AC, disadvantage on Dex saving throws as your skin becomes a hardy but unwieldy mottled grey colour (By sjeveburger)
    The Elder: There are no immediate effects to drawing the card until you attempt to sleep, the further you lull to sleep the more a sense of dread begins to build. This effect ends until you sleep or die from exhaustion. If you do sleep your consciousness is transported to a unknown realm outside the material plane, this realm appears to be a endless slab of carved mossy stone ground, floating above a dark abyssal ocean. The only sight within miles being the faint outline of a pillar. You can get closer to the pillar every night before waking up, each night you walk towards the pillar your character loses 5 max hp. It takes 10 nights to get to the pillar, which depicts a large tentacled being with its appendages wrapped around the planes of existence. If you choose not to touch the pillar or give up before reaching it, you awake with your hit points back and a forever lingering sense of dread. If you touch the pillar, the slab begins to sink and you are consumed by water before you glimpse at hundreds of orange beady eyes and tentacles, then you wake up,with your hp back and with the ability to see the world as it truly is, along with the knowledge that something terrible and older than the universe has been unleashed. (By Ford6Fingers)
    Open Chest: The image of an open box resting on the ground grants the person who drew the card a random magical item of random rarity determined by the DM using either the magic tables in the DMG or the DMs choice. (By equinox75)
    Insignificance- You are placed under a modified version of the Silence spell for 1d8 hours (By ControlledChaosJR)
    The Card - This card features the image of a card on it. It negates all effects of the next card you draw. (By The_Incredible_Thulk)
    Beast - next full moon you will transform into a werewolf. (By Dan-Han-Man)
    Self-Control: You gain resistance to psychic damage and are less impulsive overall. Barbarians temporary lose these effects when raging. (By Spearhartt)
    Gentleness: You take a permanent -2 to your AC. All non-hostile creatures with an intelligence greater than 6 now take a paternal affection towards you and are more likely to offer you assistance when possible. You gain advantage on persuasion checks against hostile creatures when the goal of your persuasion is to prevent conflict. If you witness someone close to you get killed you lose all effects of this card and gain +2 AC and +2 Strength for 1D4 hours afterwards. (By Spearhartt)
    Faithfulness: For the next 1D10 days, everything you do is motivated by your deity. If you do not follow a deity, one appears to you and anoints you as it’s new follower. The deity that appears is based on your alignment, race, and background, at the DM’s discretion. If you roll a 10, you gain the Channel Divinity feature at its lowest level, based on the domain associated with your deity. (By Spearhartt)
    Kindness: You find yourself drawn towards charity. For the next 1D6 days, anytime you see someone or something in need and you can assist in any way, you feel compelled to do so. This includes things such as healing, giving away your money, or assisting in a task that doesn’t take longer than the duration rolled earlier. (By Spearhartt)
    Patience: If you’re the last person to enter a room, speak in a conversation, or take your turn in combat, you gain advantage on your next skill check relevant to that scenario. If you are the first, you have disadvantage. (By Spearhartt)
    Peace: You gain the Calm Emotions spell and can cast it for free once per long rest. (By Spearhartt)
    Joy: You find yourself overcome with obnoxious optimism. No matter what happens you always feel like it’s going to turn out okay. You become immune to being frightened but gain disadvantage on insight checks. This can be dismissed by the wish spell or by being knocked unconscious by a hostile creature. (By Spearhartt)
    Love: You fall in love with the next non-hostile humanoid stranger you meet. You have disadvantage on any malicious skill checks against this person. This can be dismissed by the Wish spell or an act of true love by someone else towards you. (By Spearhartt)
    The Diminutive Tree: A random player character of the party is suddenly and unceremoniously turned into a bonsai tree. Only vocal communication is available while in the form of the bonsai. The bonsai speaks only Sylvan. The bonsai is otherwise an inanimate object. The PC retains their HP and is able to cast spells of vocal components or freecast. To revert from the bonsai, the tree must either be planted and grown for three days with plenty of water, or with a wish/miracle/etc. Otherwise the PC will remain a bonsai tree, incapable of thirst, hunger, aging, or sleep. (By RealRedditPerson)
    The Changeling: You immediately exchange powers and abilities with the nearest person or creature with an equivalent power level (as determined by level / challenge rating. (By Methuen)
    The Mind Reader - you gain the psychic abilities of an Illithid but also gain the face sucking tentacles. (By AllHailMackius)
    The Ghost - You immediately become semi-transparent, along with all clothing and equipment that you don (items lose this state if contact is lost). You are unable to change your opacity beyond this; you cannot turn invisible, or be made more visible (except by means of a wish spell). (By vysken)
    Platinum : All platinum you possess (wherever it is) is tripled, but teleported to the lair of a powerful monster or dragon. The name of the monster appears on the card before disappearing. (By Sunkain)
    Gold : You double all Gold coin you possess on this plane (so not in a bag of holding) (By Sunkain)
    Silver : You become vulnerable to silver weapons. When you touch silver at the end of your turn, you gain a level of exhaustion (By Sunkain)
    Bronze : You can always choose to be third in the Initiative Order in combat (By Sunkain)
    The Tolling Bell : Shows a tolling bell with the words of John Donne "Therefore, send not to know/For whom the bell tolls,/It tolls for thee." Throw 1d12. The one who holds the card will die at dawn in as much days. Each day they will here a bell ringing the number of days left. You can pass the card but only unbeknownst to the other person, you can't sell it. When the time is other, instead of waking up, the person will see a gigantic black bell with an eye in its center. It will toll one last time, and the soul of the person will be consumed by the bell. No resurection possible. A tatoo of a black bell will appear on the head of the dead. If it is a PC, the card will disappear. If the person is not the PC who drawed the card, the card will appear in their inventory at the very moment the bell had tolled. Throw 1d12. For whom will she toll now? (By TanhaAel)
    The Prophet - When this card is pulled, a projection of that players Deity forms in front of them, telling your player that they have been chosen as that deities prophet (DM role plays the Deity projection). The twist is that there is no actual affect that is granted to the player, but the DM should NEVER reveal this to the player. If the player has no religion or doesn't worship any deities, instead the card shouts at the player "You are not worthy, heretic!" in a deep booming voice, and then disappears in their hand and goes back into the deck randomly. (By metalzim)
    The changeling- your character dies and the spell reincarnation is cast on your character. (By Chopperuofl)
    Envy- Rather than sharing in their victory, your PC becomes saddened at the successes of those closest to them. Every time a party member besides the players rolls a natural 20 on a skill check, you have disadvantage on your next skill check. (By a combination of Spearhartt and Dan-Han-Man)

descriptive sayings
    As unpredictable as a fey on a bad day
    As noticeable as an ogre at a gnome bar
    As convincing as three Gnomes in a sundress
    As original as a kenku
    Sweating like a heretic next to a paladin squad
    As smooth as a bard with a beer in them
    As tactful as an orc barbarian
    You know what they say in Silverymoon. This is gonna go over like a Xvart in the birch grove. (/u/invisibledirigible)
    As bubbly as a bard (/u/WeHateSand)
    "You're worse than a kobold with a new dragon in town." Said to somebody who is brown-nosing. (/u/SamBeanEsquire)
    Instead of referring to a hardass spouse as "The ol' ball and chain" you could replace it as "the ol' bugbear" (/u/ThumpasaurusFlex)
    You look as nervous as a displacer beast in a paladin convention. (A reference to this art piece done by the famed Fredrik K.T. Andersson.) (/u/Moon_Dew)
    As ugly as the south end of a northbound gargoyle.
    As smelly as something that got crapped out of one otyugh, eaten by another, and then crapped out of that second otyugh, then then set on fire.
    As angry as an owlbear who caught his wife in bed with another man.
    About as subtle as throwing a fireball into a smokepowder storehouse (smokepowder being the Forgotten Realms' equivalent to gunpowder).
    I've had warmer welcomes in Stygia (Stygia being the 5th layer of the Nine Hells, and known for living up to the expression "When Hell freezes over".).
    All the social grace of an orc berserker.
    "He's/She's under rolling thunder!" (they are in trouble) (/u/MojoDragon365)
    "They are connected through stone." (they share a stubborn opinion)
    "You're burning a stone bridge!" (You are only harming yourself, not the target)
    When a player fails stealth checks all the time: You’re as stealthy as a Goliath in a goblin den. (/u/SyntheticMilk)
    I’m so hungry, I could eat a tarrasque. (/u/malnox)
    as tricky as a pixie with a puzzle box (/u/Matkol1998 & /u/proopypants1)
    As uncomfortable as a tiefling among aasimar clerics (/u/BurntNerd)
    As dead as a goblin caught stealing from a dragon (/u/darthfodder)
    As happy as a pixie in a honeysuckle patch.
    As fast as a Sprite with the spell Haste.
    As hungry as a Tarrasque woken from a 1000 year slumber.
    As skittish as a Blink Dog cornered by three trolls.
    As dead as a troll in a volcano.
    As high as a Bard in college.
    As drunk as a dwarf on his brother's birthday.
    As discreet as a centaur tapdancing in a marble hall (/u/herissonberserk)
    Higher than a dragons butthole (/u/VoltasPistol) (or Higher than a giants butthole)
    Chattier than a Kenku at the fair. (/u/ButHonestlyWhy)
    Just as warm as a lizardfolk [re personality] (/u/sweetharpykey)
    Busy as a Gnome
    Temper like a Salamander (or fire dragon if it's really bad)
    Flies just like a Purple Worm
    All the bravery of a kobold and none of the skill
    Upstanding as a Slime
    Reeks like an ogre's armpit
    Smart as a bugbear and mean as one too
    Flumphface
    Go have fun training basilisks (doing the impossible)
    Happy as a sorcerer with their first fireball
    One-blast Warlock (one trick pony)
    Trustworthy as a Yuan-ti
    As subtle as a dwarven tavern during a high feast (/u/Wobberjockey)
    Like a barbarian in a Goblin Camp (/u/Fish_can_Roll76)
    "As plain (or prude) as a wizard at the College of Lore" (/u/RollinThundaga)
    "As lost a ranger in city hall"
    "As lost as a ranger at a banquet"
    "As confused as a goblin with a scarecrow"
    As welcoming as the Nine Hells (/u/Biokrate)
    as dumb as challenging a Goliath to arm wrestle (/u/RowanStimpson)
    useless as tying up a gelatinous cube
    as helpful as a flint and steel to fire mage
    pretty as a nymph in the moonlight
    The time dragged on like a hill giant planning his next chess move
    he is a real Kua-toa out of water
    like asking a Treant to help gather firewood
    happy as a dwarf in a brewery
    As much use as boots for a beholder (/u/ElZoof)
    As happy as a hungry gnoll in an orphanage
    Busier than an incubus in a convent
    About as lively as a lich (/u/Pidgewiffler)
    More mindless than a modron
    Breath smells like a green dragon's (/u/amintowords)
    Hairstyle looks like a gryphon's nest
    As clear spoken as a sphynx
    Armpit hair looks like the forest of (insert appropriate forest name).
    As romantic as a gelatinous cube.
    Beautiful as a beholder with conjunctivitis
    The offspring of a dwarf and a hill giant.
    As graceful as an elf.
    A booming voice like a giant's.
    So beautiful they'd never need to cast charm person.
    As patient as the games master.
    You look as comfortable as an elf in a mine (/u/jakemp1)
    As much personality as a gelatinous cube (/u/tcjaeger)
    As graceful as a tapdancing goliath in a China store
    As dumb as a bag of holding full of portable holes
    They might as well be a rust monster. (clumsy/inept) (/u/LazyRaven01)
    Suspiciously clean, as if chewed up and spit out by a gelatinous being. (/u/invisibledirigible)
    My hotel's as clean as an elven arse.
    Dumber than a box of goblins (/u/joeschmoemama)
    Looser than a dwarf wearing an ogre's briefs
    Murky as the bottom of a hag's cauldron (/u/MildlyConcernedGhost)
    As useless as a giant at an ass-smelling contest. (/u/futureButt)
    Like asking a dragon to light a match
    You are as paranoic as/ more paranoic than a beholder (/u/salocin01 )
    Hotter than a jug of fire beetles (/u/Kronk458)
    Not an anvil's chance in a nest of rust monsters
    Deader than Strahd's ex-girlfriend (/u/ElZoof )
    Crazier than a kuo-toa hopped up on pixie blush
    Dumber than challenging Vecna to a game of "Truth or Dare"
    So by the book they probably have the day of the week engraved into thier Tassets and Faulds (/u/MaxSizeIs)
    as graceful as a bugbear in high heels (/u/3lminst3r)
    meaner than a landlocked kraken

moral dillemas
    You finally have the villain at your mercy, but their child is with them. Are you willing to kill an innocent child's parent in front of their very eyes?
    The village is going to be culled to prevent the spread of a terrible plague. Do you spare the villagers by preventing the cull at risk of millions of lives dying to plague?
    The villain has framed you for a crime you didn't commit, but to resist arrest would make it more likely that your reputation as an outlaw sticks with you permanantly. Do you turn yourself in?
    The wizard sent you on a simple errand: decomission his malfunctioning golem, but when you find the golem it is exhibiting obvious signs of sentience, and self awareness. Does it deserve the freedom of other sentient beings?
    The villain shares a common goal/enemy with the party and suggests declaring a truce to deal with the situation. Do you work together with your sworn enemy?
    You captured some enemy soldiers for information and have them at your mercy. Do you let them go and risk them giving away your position or slaughter the unarmed troops? (u/BiD3sign)
    Your party is guilty of a crime (aren’t they all at some point?) and the local law enforcement has arrested someone else for it. Do you turn yourself in and save the person, or do you let them try him so you can remain out of prison?
    Your party is contracted to deal with a group of bandits that has been waylaying merchants on the road, miles outside of town. It turns out that the spoils of these robberies are being redistributed to the poor citizens. (u/McLellanCM)
    The villain is currently holding a hostage that the party hates but the public loves. (u//MojoDragon365)
    The king, who has proven himself to be a great ally and a terrifying enemy, has charged you to escort a caravan of people to be sold into slavery (u/StromTheHammer)
    A bottle of stolen mead has been found by the party after a merchant warns them to be on the lookout for it. However, the rare mead is unattended and probably worth a nice chunk of change. The party can either steal it, sell it, and tell the merchant what they did, lie about stealing it, return it to the merchant, or do nothing. If the party ends up stealing or returning the mead, a later quest will reveal it was honestly bought and that the merchant, now gone, is something of a scammer. (u/SelfDefibrillation)
    You come to a crossroads and suddenly from the north a girl comes running down saying "please help....they are about to sacrifice my sister" And then a boy comes running up from the other direction "please help...my village is under attack" Helping the girl stop the sacrifice summons a demon but the sister is saved and the other village is slaughtered. Saving the village means the sister is sacrificed and the girl stalks the party waiting for her moment to strike to get revenge (u/whitecloud197)
    You see a bear following a child who was yelling in another language, if the party kill the bear, the girl runs backs to his werebear father while he is dying. (u/alejo1905)
    Your sibling wants to ask hags/fiends for a cure to save your sick mother, but may have to commit some evil deeds in the process. (u/solidfang)
    A mad queen made a pact with a demon lord to always return from the dead, so long as her bloodline remains, some of her descendants may be some people you know... (u/ElZoof)
    The party comes cross an infant gnoll, crying over the corpse of its dead parent. It may be an inherently chaotic and evil creature, but it is still young—do they leave it, kill it, or try to help it? (u/insanityscribe)
    A local mimic wants to stop being used as furniture. Does the party kill it, or take pity and relocate the poor creature (u/iSquirrelyy)
    The party were the only witnesses to a child stealing something from a stall, but the city punishes stealing with death. If the party doesn't describe (and thus likely condemn) the child to death, the blame will fall on the only other possible thieves: themselves. (u/shirking_my_studies)
    A local lord and his knights have recently killed an adult dragon which had been terrorizing the surrounding lands for years. There's one last job: go to the dragons lair and exterminate it's clutch of eggs and the remaining wyrmlings. None can survive or the lairs effects on the region will never go away. (u/DisparateNoise)
    There's a deadly and neigh-unbreakable curse that jumps from parent to biological child when the parent dies. The current curse bearer is a powerful wizard who keeps it at bay with ritual sacrifice of humanoids, using their souls to empower his resistance. The wizard has many children and dozens of grandchildren, and if he's killed, they'll quickly die from the inherited curse, them lacking his ability to resist it. (u/shirking_my_studies)
    A senile old wizard has been secluded in the mountains, summoning mass amounts of monsters to keep himself from being lonely. The monsters run away from him out of fear but savagely kill innocents. Does the party kill him to stop the killings or go to the trouble of trying to find help for him. (u/Elilacky)
    There's a prophecy that a young child, descendant of a great hero, will be the gateway for a great demon to come back into this world by bursting out of the kid's chest. An evil wizard can get the demon out without harming the child, but the demon will be under the wizard's control. Do the heroes wait to see if the prophecy is false (it's not), enlist the help of the wizard and have to deal with that problem later, or murder the great-great-great-great grandchild of the man who saved the entire kingdom? (u/ksgt69)
    Your party gets hired by a wealthy collector to transport an artifact purchased from the town over. When they arrive in the other town, they find out the artifact they are to transport is a little girl. (u/sKoutXII)
    A quest to go slay a nearby ogre is posted in a tavern. The ogre has no interest in hurting anyone but doesn't want to leave either. Gemstones poking out of the walls of the caves hint at why the bounty was placed. (u/Pinstar)
    You are fighting your way to a dragon's lair through some surprisingly smart owl bears, shambling mounds, treants, and other typically dumb creatures. You learn that to destroy the dragon's (or other BBEG) power will be to rob all these creatures of their intelligence that they now prize so dearly. (u/micahaphone partially based on a post by u/SageSilinous)
    A level in the dungeon is filled with monsters and deadly traps, but also cages filled with innocents in the way. If the party isn't careful they are likely to be killed. (u/jediboogie)
    The local village is holding a firbolg named Thorbyrn prisoner, saying he killed one of the local guardsmen. The firbolgs have always been peaceful and all evidence suggests he’s not the culprit. He’s to be executed in the morning and the party must decide if they will save him. (u/datgingerr)
    A village is under the influence of a long forgotten goddess of Fertility who requires blood sacrifices to work her magic. Without the sacrifices, the crops are eaten by pests, die to diseases from the soil, or don't even make enough food for a small child. (u/NotActuallyEvil)
    You've been called to kill a bunch of 'evil' creatures (goblins, orcs, whatever) but find that while they're not the best ever they're also the victims of discrimination and being kept out of 'honest' ways to make a living (u/_Lusus)
    You receive a powerful magic item that perfectly fits in with your character's abilities, but are warned soon after earning it that the more you use it, the more that your morality will be corrupted. Will you use it or destroy it? (u/_Lusus)
    You've come across a group of revolutionary inventors, they've created things that will change the path of history for the better. You find out they've invented everything sacrificing innocent, unwilling, lives in the testing process. Do you stop them? (u/slaptac)
    You come across a prisoner and a guard. The prisoner claims to be a person of good who is being held unjustly while the guard claims the prisoner is evil. (u/gvblake22 inspired by u/slaptac)
    There's a secret group of werewolves among the people in a small village. They've been feeding on livestock; however, they are also responsible for keeping the monsters in the surrounding area at bay. The villagers want their livestock safeguarded, but the werewolves are desperate to remain a secret so they can be with their families. (u/AstralMarmot)
    The party has slain the evil tyrant, and freed the kingdom, but discovered that the reason the tyrant ruled so harshly was to prepare the kingdom to fight against an even greater threat. (u/fwimmygoat)
    The liches phylactery is a small puppy (u/vmos)
    the antichrist has just been born into the body of a human child, but the mother knows nothing about her child's special abilities (u/vmos)
    You're in a cave, a rockslide has blocked the flow of an underground river, a huge beastie is coming down the tunnel and suddenly unleashing a river in it's face is the best way to deal with it, but a gnome has built a house in the way and his wife is sick in bed (u/vmos)
    a magic mcguffin is very important to the survival of a town, you learn that a criminal gang are planning to steal it and they're recruiting new members to assist. A perfect opportunity to infiltrate and save the town, except the mcguffin would be really useful to your master quest. (u/vmos)

why did BBEG become BBEG
    Praise from Husband/Wife
    Land
    Title
    God hood
    Fun(?)
    Creature who believes that wars are bad, and that convictions cause wars, so it is kidnapping and brainwashing all people who sworned total convictions (double-edged as it means both evil warlocks and paladins the same).
    Leader of a radical rebel group doing whatever to advance their cause
    Desperate Lord of the enemy kingom trying to save his people from ruin no matter the cost
    Had to choose between two horrible course of actions. Chose the one that interfere with the PCs objectives.
    Power!
    Revenge
    Adventures murdered their family and now devote their lives to killing adventurers
    Believes the gods are corrupt and seeks to gain godhood to help others ascend, overthrowing the old order by turning everyone into a god. Surprisingly polite about it all.
    Completely unaware that they are a BBEG, just thinks they are running experiments and schemes to further Science!/Magic!/Magience!/Scimagic! which go bad due to bad luck, incompetent minions, malicious lieutenants, and other shenanigans. Once they find out, will be horrified.
    An ancient city of pacifists was destroyed by outside forces, ending a millennia old reign. The BBEG's kin had a Pact with the city since time immemorial, to defend each other against all enemies. But when life loses it's value and is taken for naught, then the Pact is to Avenge.
    -An eldritch being that believes itself the creator of the universe. It is sickened with its creation and wants all life to return to its hive mind so that it may restart old testament style.
    A queen obsessed with beauty. She was a kind ruler until, in the hopes of catching her affection, her faithful servant gifted her an ancient magical mirror. The woman in the mirror staring back at the queen began to whisper dark, twisted desires. Now she is a shell of her former self, her servant still aiding her in a vain hope of reaching the queen. Every day, she grows more and more vain, viewing total tyranny as the only way of assuring the rest of the world becomes as beautiful as her.
    A tyrannical president of a company. Prosperity is their ultimate goal, and your planet is just another pool of resources to gather.
    They saw an ill omen in Divination class which led them to obsess over gaining power so he could defeat any threat.
    One of the PC's parents/siblings murdered the BBEG's significant other/child and they have spent their lives plotting revenge.
    The brutal tactics employed by both sides in a recent war caused this BBEG to go from hardened sergeant trying to survive to sadistic maniac who kills at the first sign of disobedience.
    The BBEG ate too many magic mushrooms and believes the PCs are assassins from the future, so naturally he tries to kill them.
    The BBEG got bored with bullying people and joined a mercenary group, then went AWOL deep in the jungle. He emerged with strange powers and several loyal, deadly followers who now serve his his dark agenda.
    She was an actress, well-known for going to extremes for roles. She was captured by slavers but escaped and became an advocate for slaves. She is also incredibly brutal and uses her political stature to influence events without getting her hands dirty.
    Ex-cop whose son was killed by criminals. The cop killed the criminals and their whole gang, then killed himself in grief. His angry spirit survived on the Material Plane with its intelligence intact and seeks to destroy anyone who it sees as a criminal, including those who adventure haphazardly.
    A crazed old Druid who learned how to Wild Shape into an Aboleth and went mad with old eldritch dreams of planar domination.
    A Beholder who had their mind magically altered to remove the paranoia without curbing psychopathy. They have a globe-spanning agenda with agents in every major settlement.
    Leader of the Kobra Kai Dojo of evil Monks and Fighters. Just hates that which is good.
    Started as a terrorist who hated their government, found a taste for mass violence, has been building weapons ever since.
    Is trying to do enough evil acts to be declared worthy of the lichdom ceremonial rites by the death god they worship.
    A mad archmage who accidentally sent his mind back in time, so he is in his 10 year old self's body. Had a tantrum about eating broccoli for dinner and decided to destroy anyone who eats, sells, or grows broccoli.
    They told an old flame that they wanted to rule the world but would never be able to do it, and they responded with why not try starting small, like ruling the entire tri-state area. And thus an EVIL dream was born.
    The BBEG wants revenge on either a major faction, race, or organization for effectively ruining their lives via the killing of loved ones, the destabilization/destruction of their homeland, etc. If its a specific race, like elves for instance, the reason could become even more chaotic due to how the faewilds and its people act.
    hey were once heroes, but in time saw enemies everywhere
    they ran out of coffee
    their parents always said they would never amount to much, and they want their name burned into the history books.
    they just wanted to raise baby dragons in peace, but some villagers got uppity
    Wants to become some form of Lich or transcend their form in some sense. Makes for a fun battle.
    Complex social factors.
    Fetishizes the concept they are trying to force over the world to the point of madness
    Made a bad bet with eldritch/fae
    One bad day
    Cursed - Acquired a cursed artifact that set them on the path to become the BBEG
    Cursed - Cursed by a god to become become the BBEG
    Cursed - Family curse
    Never really planed to become the BBEG, it just sorta turned out that way
    Power - BBEG seeks power for the sake of being more powerful
    Power - BBEG seeks power to defeat a (greater evil / world ending evil)
    Power - BBEG seeks power so that no one can ever push them around again
    Revenge on those who have disrespected him or her
    Revenge on those who have harmed him or her
    Revenge on those who have harmed the BBEG's (clan, family, friends, people, race, school, tribe)
    They are just following the path their god set for them
    To destroy it all
    To destroy something that they hate
    To find a way out of their contract with a (devil, demon, god, greater old one, outsider, etc)
    To find the heroes capable of saving the world from a greater evil
    To fulfill their contract with a (devil, demon, god, greater old one, outsider, etc)
    To fulfill a prophesy
    To make a mark on history
    To put their (clan, family, people, race, tribe) at the top of society
    To rebuild an empire
    To remake the world, in their view they can make it better than it is now
    Wealth
    Fearing mortality, they wish for Lichdom
    They actually believe they are the force for good and those opposing them are the BBEGs...
    Just tried to get it's race saved. They are about 50 of his Kind left and he/she is the leader trying to get enough Land and Power to not go extinct.
    Current BBEG sold his soul to the Undying to save his son, now he’s trapped in an endless loop of raising more dead to please the Undying unaware that in the town he’s had to flee from it left his son to die after he was gone.
    Their friend dared them to, and they’re not one to turn down a dare.
    Who has two thumbs and wants to live forever? (Points thumbs at self) This guy!
    He was attempting to find a cure for some world problem (plague, world hunger, etc.), but was discredited as he was coming up with a possible solution.
    He had a hard life and saw many horrible things. Now, he wants to make things right. Unfortunately, it's in the worst possible way imaginable.
    He was 12th in the line of succession to be king in his kingdom, so he thought he'd jump ahead in line.
    He was 11th in the line of succession to be king of his kingdom, so he decided to be first in line in another kingdom.
    Money
    For the lolz
    for the evulz
    Lived long enough to become the villain
    thought the government was shitty and he could do a better job (lawful bent)
    thought the government should have less influence (chaotic bent)
    boredom
    to get laid
    used to be an adventurer, got tired of people asking them to fix everything
    Town guard that snapped after adventurers kept murderhoboing everything
    Wizard who after a long enough time reached the bounds of the research they could do via ethical means, resorted to unethical means
    Wizard who stumbled upon dark magic and was corrupted by it
    Goblin warboss who got tired of everyone thinking they could just push goblins around, gets 20 levels in fighter and organizes goblin hoard
    druid who became tired of society destroying nature decides to have nature destroy society
    Their patron told them to
    barbarian who thinks the weak should serve the strong (evil conan?)
    the party killed a family member in the last campaign
    Noble who thinks peasants should serve the rich
    He realised to be a hero you needed a villan, and after he killed his bbeg there was too strong a shift in the natural balance, demons were breaking free from hell as the natural order tried to balance itself and the only way he could save the world is to try to destroy it, because for every bbeg there is a true hero. For extra the pc's can find this out after they kill the bbeg and have to balance the universe somehow
    Librarian who snapped after years of being told paper cuts were not "that bad"
    Chronic splinters, nuff said
    cursed to never sleep, and driven mad by it
    crones disease/celiac disease, why shouldn't i be evil in a world where everything gives horrible intestinal problems.
    allergy to alcohol or precious metals, forever barred from the finer things
    traumatized by sock puppets as a child
    A hero drew balance from the deck of many things
    Someone killed their dog
    Just a kid playing games, not realizing the adults playing with him are actually following orders and doing things he said to do to real people
    Trying to avenge a family member
    Some wandering adventurers wrongly ruined his life and now he’s been plotting to end theirs
    The BBEG is a time agent who failed to protect the original BBEG, and since the original BBEG's reign (and the actions taken to bring them down) include a number of critical fixed points, the agent needs to fill in.
    Someone shoved a Helm of Reverse Alignment on the sweetest kid at the magic college as a prank. Having successfully faked a cure, the now-evil student took power over the college through deception and murder, and uses it for their own wicked ends under a veneer of sweetness and light.
    Informed of an ancient prophecy that he'd tear down his own kingdom and unmake his entire line, a noble warrior prince leaves on campaign... not knowing that he had been abandoned by his royal parents, rulers of the kingdom he's invading, because of the prophecy, and adopted by the rulers of his current homeland.
    Mistakenly diagnosed as terminally ill by an incompetent cleric, a paladin suffered a psychotic break, turned Oathbreaker, and is now lashing out at the world
    Revenge
    Vast treasure
    Magic powers from a divine being he's aiding
    Control over idiots
    Because they think humanity was a mistake and only XYZ should be in charge
    Population control
    Fight pollution and colonization
    Trigger revolution from a corrupt system
    I feel like our campaign our characters are going to become the bbeg. It started with a drink night a misunderstanding pride and then revenge. What started as 300 lost is now the party working on a plan to destroy a whole town.
    Denied their birthright to rule because they were banished for being too dangerous/cruel.
    Alien perspective: a curse has twisted their vision so they see all humanoids as demonic apes who seem to have taken over the world.
    Eco-terrorism: a druid driven mad when their grove was desecrated is indiscriminately clawing back land for nature.
    Unity: after numerous other attempts at rousing action have failed, a noble has become a BBEG to make themself into a common foe for multiple factions in an effort to get them to band together.
    He's just a cunt. He's a bad person because its fun for him.
    Don’t forget hate and revenge
    Reshaping the implicit caste system of society.
    Only way to save the world
    An already powerful being became insane
    "Sometimes the only way to stop something terrible, is to become terrible yourself."
    His/her family was a casualty from the last adventurers adventure.
    BB"E"G lich isn't really evil, just wanted to resurrect friends.
    He or she was chosen by a dark entity, slowly corrupting them from the inside out.
    Started just to gain pact power, but slowly realized that he/she enjoyed causing destruction, and now thrives in it.
    You killed the person they were honor bound to protect, and are now honor bound to avenge.
    He just wants to forget.
    To cure a seemingly incurable disease
    He is the spawn of a Great Old one, just trying to fulfill dad's legacy.
    My bbeg accidently killed his family. Then went mad trying to bring them back to life with hundreds of failed attempts, now hes trying to steal the power of a gid to recreate them.
    In hopes to find someone who can end his immortality
    Who you think is the BBEG is actually possessed by something that's the real BBEG
    He’s trying to “fix” the world
    A goblin said he couldn’t gain domain over the nearby city.
    A dog who was once asked who the good boy was and received no answer, devoting the rest of his life searching to acquire that knowledge so his mind may finally be at peace, no matter the cost, but in his pursuit of this forbidden knowledge has fallen down a dark path, willing to destroy the whole world just so he’ll be the only boy left, making him the only and by extension THE good boy. The irony of all of this was that it was in fact he that was the good boy all along. But a lack of affirmation for this led him to fall to his own hubris and now must be stopped at any cost.
    Amnesia
    Religious Fanatic
    A cursed overconfident do-gooder. Everything positive he does to save or help someone has an opposite destructive reaction elsewhere in the realm. If approached about it, him and his followers immediately claim its a hoax.
    Due to a series of unfortunate events and dyslexia, all of the spells he knows are one letter off which has caused some big problems in the area and the folks have had enough.
    Is lonely and only knows how to get negative attention by being a BBEG
    Is the evil twin of one of the party members
    Is from an alternate dimension and thinks it's all a game because he is OP compared to the rest of the world
    Got there by accident due to bluffs and cons that got out of hand and now he can't leave without getting killed
    Random crazy dude(t) who accidentally got gifted powers
    A bunch of patrons are competing to see whose warlock can become the most powerful and this guy is currently winning
    Unifying warring states to end interminable wars
    Religious fervor
    Unwittingly controlled by bigger badder eviler something
    Imprisoned in this reality and trying to destroy it to escape
    BBEG is a literal toddler of their race who was given this world/universe/plane as a toy by their parent
    A series of well-intentioned mishaps gone awry.
    Honest misunderstanding.
    Disgust.
    High market prices.
    Fell for a con.
    Couldn’t find the exit; destroyed city trying to leave.
    Curiosity/ambition.
    Needed fuel for a powerful spell.
    Dog told them to.
    Genocide of phobia (spiders, snakes, commitment, etc).
    Accident; isn’t even aware of trouble caused.
    Corrupted by an extra-planar influence
    Possessed by an abyssal entity
    Controlled by an artifact or powerful sentient magic item
    To finally teach that bully from their childhood a lesson
    To compensate for an extreme physical disability
    By accident/luck. They started having some success with what they were doing at a small scale and things escalated quickly.
    They truly believe that they are the only person who can make the world a better place. From their perspective they're the only one with the vision, resources, and will to do what they believe needs to be done. They are aware of the atrocities they commit and the horrific acts they orchestrate, and they regret them, but they view them as necessary for the greater good and perform them anyway. Because once they've won, once the world is completely under their control, they can bring an end to all war, they can ensure equality for everyone, they can achieve world peace. But it has to be them, anyone else could be corrupted by the power or loose sight of their goals. Anyone else would do something wrong. They do what they do not because they want to, but because they believe someone has to and everyone else is too afraid to try.
    To bring fortune to their country
    So that they can live a quiet life
    To make their vampire father proud
    To amass enough strength to kill their brother/sister
    In preparation of facing a great future threat to all of life, an ancient race of superbeings that will soon return
    different groups of adventurers keep coming into his town and murderhoboing people. It's all he can do to keep back the tide.
    All of life is suffering. Only death and rebirth into The Oblivion can end suffering.
    Doing something bad with good intentions, such as bringing back the dead
    Some people just want to watch the world burn.
    Boredom
    In order to bring his dead wife back to life, the orc warlord seeks the crown of a lich that was long ago defeated. His shaman has had visions and divinations of the crown being in the Emperor’s treasure room in the capital city. The warlord seeks to unite the goblinoid clans into a great war-band that can destroy the Emperor’s armies and lay siege to the city, so that he may claim the lich’s power source and be reunited with his departed love.
    They wanted to provide for their family, and got caught up in the thrill of violence.
    They were enamoured with an [other] and were rejected by that [other]. Rejection led to resentment, resentment led to revenge.
    Power overwhelming.
    They aren't the BBEG to their people. They are the savior bringing hope to [oppressed other].
    Boredom
    Revenge
    Has some really cool toys but no one to play with
    Hates everyone including self
    Just wants to see what will happen if_____
    Sibling got all the love
    A deal made with a powerful being
    In search of knowledge
    Was a hero who realized heros solve nothing
    Thinks hes the good guy( like MCU thanos in infinity war)
    Someone killed his dog

